Haikus for Coconuts (Palo Alto).... I keep hearing this: Coconuts has gone down hill Back-A-Yard's better! But I must admit I've not been disappointed By Coconuts once! Jamaican? I'm not So no inner meter for Authenticity! So I understand Take this with a grain of salt Coconuts is bomb! Fave jerk salmon meal All the sides, other entrees All that I've tried....Bomb! It's been awhile So maybe something has changed Since my last visit! I know Chef Robert Has a new San Jose shop I'm sure he's busy! Service has been good Not perfect, in transition But good overall! To me, it's still bomb Still the best Caribbean In Palo Alto!
so, after all these months, nothing has changed. I drag as many people as I can get to go with me here! I've now had jerk chicken, pork, the n.y. steak, the lunchtime wraps, coconut shrimp, curried goat, oxtail, mac'n cheese, guacamole with plantains, root vegetable au gratin, irie tofu, beef ribs and the patty sampler. All of which are phenomenal, EVERY time. if you're looking for the vibe, the food and artisinally made drinks, go here. Better yet, if you want people to be impressed and think highly of your tastes in local treasures, Coconuts can make it happen! speaking of making it happen, lastnight (8/25) I had my birthday party here! (definitely not the last time,) It was the best birthday party I've had so far! Honestly, in any successful company, you should give props to management. I speak with the staff and find them to always be happy, attentive, and enoying what they do. A good manager brings morale, and at coconuts everyone is your best friend. Anyways, we ordered all of the above mentioned since I know they're great, we had a table and also spent some time at the bar. Roberto has got to be the best bartender in the bay area, he's very good at what he does, and I've never heard negative comments from my friends on his creativity and quality of drinks.  He'll shake those things forever! The food: the curried goat is impossibly tender, as are the beef ribs, jerk pork and steak. Jerk chicken is heavenly spicy, and never dry. They even ask dark or white meat! Last but not least, I would highly, HIGHLY recommend their catering services. I took a pamplet in anticipation of hiring them for future events, and the pricing is great for such high quality ingredients and flavors! There's just nothing else like it. And I'll never get enough of it. I love you, coconuts. please don't ever, ever go away. :)
I went bar hopping the other day and Coconuts was my last stop. honestly, I wish I had gone there... Read more 
If I'm ever jonesing for Hawaii or the Caribbean, I think about this place. The only things the drinks are missing are the palm trees and the sand. I especially love the Dark and Stormy's (heads-up: super ginger-y). They catered my best friend's wedding and everyone raved about the food. The service was what you'd expect from the islands: laid-back and super friendly. Family style is recommended here. It's a great place for groups (don't forget to make reservations). My suggestions: * jerk wings (I'd rather just order this than the jerk chicken dinner itself) * coconut shrimp * patties (they're like hot pockets ... the beef ones are my favorite) * jerk salmon (the sea bass is good, too, but it's more like a curry) * six-hour braised oxtail (tasty, but really fatty)
The apetizer dishes are a little small (crab and avacado plus the guac dish) but the wings were ok size.  All the dishes were unique but none of them great.  The plantain chips were not too good but the fried plantains were very good.  Entrees were hit and miss.  The curry chicken is very good but the mix jerk plate of chicken breast and salmon was half and half.  The chicken was tough and dry but the salmon was outstanding.  Overall the food averaged out at three stars.  The chicken and pumpkin soup was not so good.  The guests I was with commented that the dishes seemed better in the past.  Good company made up for the food.
GET THE COCONUT SHRIMP! I came here with my boyfriend at around lunch time on a Sunday afternoon. The entrance had a fun and laid back feel to it which was nice. The host desk was empty, so we were a little bit confused. Turns out, it's open seating during lunch time. The waitress brought out the menus and our waiter brought out water. We ordered the lunch plate of the jerk chicken, the lunch plate of the short ribs, coconut shrimp, and corn festivals. The total came out to be around $40 for 2 people, which is not bad for the amount of food they give you! Jerk Chicken Lunch Plate with brown rice and salad: I love Jerk! Oh Lord, this was too good. My favorite would still have to be Back A Yard's in East Palo Alto, but this is a close second! The rice was very flavorful and the salad? Well, I didn't really care for the salad. Short Rib Lunch Plate with brown rice and salad: The short ribs are slowly cooked and then marinated in wine, which gave it a unique texture and taste. It wasn't my favorite since I'm not really into wine, but my boyfriend enjoyed it. Corn Festivals: I don't think anyone can mess up Corn Festivals lol. These were huge! Coconut Shrimp: OH MY GOD, PLEASE GET THIS! This. Oh God! This is probably one of the BEST dishes I've had. The huge shrimp were covered in coconut shreds and then deep fried served with a mango marmalade-type sauce. YOU HAVE TO GET IT! Good food, good prices, good atmosphere, good service. What more can you ask for? GET THE COCONUT SHRIMP!
Unusual for me, but my favorite part of my experience here last night, apart from the company I was with, was my cocktail! OMG. If you don't read anything else I write in this review, read this: KIWI LEMON DROP. It's sort of stupidly expensive when you compare it to the pitchers of mojitos available, but I'm here to say you can afford it... Just this once ;) We had reservations for a party of 7 for a birthday celebration for twins! Ambience is loud (and we didn't help much with our pitchers of mojitos), but it was definitely fun for groups. Basically, I wouldn't recommend it for a romantic date. We went with a family style approach, sharing a few dishes so we could try more things! We shared the Chef's Sampler Platter (Ackee Triangles, Mini Patty in Pastry, Coconut Shrimp, and Jerk Wings). All good but I would just opt for an order of Coconut Shrimp next time -- delicious!! For dinner we got 2 orders of the jerk chicken, which was a bit spicier than I had bargained for, but quite tasty! I am confused by one of the reviewers below claiming that the chicken is smothered in BBQ sauce -- this is a spice rub, not a barbecue sauce! We cut the spice with 2 side orders of baked mac n cheese (tastes very homemade and a bit sweet), 2 orders of plantains (necessary! yum!!!) and an order of sweet potato fries (the usual). We also tried the oxtail stew, which was good but really not a stand-out for any of us. It's the only dish we didn't finish. For dessert, our server was wonderful enough to bring out TWO complimentary slices of the Warm Sweet Potato Pudding with a candle each (one for each twin!) I think that was incredibly sweet and thoughtful of him, and really shows that this place knows how to deliver great customer service. I loved the pudding, but a few of my friends thought the texture was confusing... not as light as a bread pudding, not as smooth as a pumpkin pie. Whatever, I ate a ton of it! But the BEST part about dessert was definitely the homemade ice cream, which we all raved about. Honestly, if I could have just had my kiwi lemon drop and a bucket of that ice cream, I probably would have been a happy camper. The rest of the wonderful meal was just icing on the cake.
If you can't physically go to the Caribbean Islands, go to Coconuts Caribbean Restaurant!  The fam and I came for dinner on a Saturday night and after being seated outside (you should make a reservation if you want to sit inside), we felt like we were at the Caribbean Islands.  There was live music - a steel drum player, people were dancing, there were lights, the whole shebang (literally he-bangs on di drums)! Anyways on to the food - it was family style, perfect for trying different "tings" ;) Coconut Shrimp - the mango dipping sauce was a nice sweet balance to the fried shrimp with coconut crust. Jerk Chicken - packed full of flavor and spices, had a nice kick to it, though a tad salty in my opinion. Six Hour Braised Ox Tail - they might not be exaggerating about the six hours, the meat was definitely really tender and falls off the bone as you pick it up. Sweet Potato Fries - crispy and a pretty large portion, very yummy. Roasted Vegetables - should have ordered the plantains, but it had squash, okra and some other veggies I can't seem to remember. Brown Rice - alright, had a hint of coconut to it. Coconut Creme Brulee - if I wasn't already so full, I probably would have finished it all myself.  It wasn't super sweet, and was a nice end to the meal. If I'm ever craving Caribbean food, I'll be back!
Came by for dinner the other night and was pleasantly surprised. It was my first time enjoying Caribbean food and I was impressed! Started off with the Oxtail and it was excellent! Just like the description, the meat fell off the bone and the meat was flavorful. The curry chicken was also super tender and flavorful! The coconut milk inside the dish made the dish less spicy! Sides were excluded from the main course. I'm usually not a fan of brown rice but did enjoy the brown rice. I've had bad experiences with plantains, but must admit that the plantains were good! Finished off the meal with the coconut creme brulee which was okay. I've had better desserts! Service was decent by the staff and pricing was ~$25/head after tax and tip.
Great food.  Love the jerk wings.
These folks are doing a lot better in the space than the restaurant they replaced, and it seems like it's a good, loud place for big groups.  Not so much, maybe, for the couples we saw trying to have a nice date in the middle of it all. The food is heavy, as island food often is.  They have things like ackee on the menu, sort of, as well as a goat curry and jerk.  Though the beer list is nothing special, some of the cocktails are surprisingly good for a place like this - complex and refreshing rather than sweet and fruity. We tried the appetizer sampler - a good overview, though again somewhat laden with fried food.  The ackee triangles left us still wondering what, exactly, this special fruit actually tastes like, and the jerk chicken wings were mild enough for the most timid palate. The oxtail and goat curry were huge servings of beautifully braised meat on the bone, and excellent deals.  They were also disappointingly similar to each other in flavor and character - I would recommend ordering only one of the two, depending on your preference for size of bone.  The goat was not particularly strongly flavored of goat.  The Corn Festival - basically cornbread hushpuppies - was something that, if you were not already full, would make you full in short order. Service was friendly, but often scattered, with parties who arrived after us being served before us, and servers often hard to track down with requests.  The kitchen was relatively fast, especially considering the dinner rush. In the end, it looks like a good deal, a good place to take a group, but maybe not the place for a quiet, light dinner.  Which I guess is the point.
Came here with my cousin yesterday since we looked on yelp and decided we've never tried Caribbean food and was interested in trying it. I tried their 2 item combo which came with rice and was about $14. The 2 meat I chose were the oxtail and ribs. The ribs came with 4 pieces and was just fall off the bone! It was so tender that I've never had ribs so soft before and it didn't have too much fat on it either which is definitely a plus for me. The oxtail was definitely a pleasant surprise. I've heard of it being really good but was always hesitant to try it. This meat was ever softer and more tender than the rib itself! Seems like it has been braised for many hours. It was mixed with carrots and some other stuff inside. My cousin tried the jerk boneless pork over rice which was only about $9 or so. The pork was a little bit on the tougher side but had a strong kick of flavor to it. I think he really liked it since he killed his whole plate in about 10minutes.. We both tried their Ting soda which says on the bottle it was made from Jamaica! Definitely pretty cool. It was a grapefruit soda so it was a little bit sour but mixed with a soda taste. Highlight of the meal? There was this group of people outside the restaurant and one of them was leaning on my car so I set off the panic button and he jumped up and the group left LOL...
yes Im a FAN! Came here with husband when we began dating and come here for special occations. Usually for my husbands birthday because he lovessssss the Jerk Chicken and Ox tail. I recommend if you are going with more than 4 ppl to do family style. You get more for your money. I love it when chefs go and say hi to the patrons it makes it more personal and a great environment. The Jerk chicken: Awesome Plantains: Legit. Im from latin america and this is as close as it gets. Jerk Pork: very juicy and tender Drinks are great and the bartender is not stingy with the alcohol (thats a +) Cant wait for my next visit
Family style eating in a private room, easy to make reservations (just call) and great tasting food! Perfect place for large parties or for happy hour! Delicious cocktails - my favorites include the regular mojitos, and the guava mojitos. Amazing! Can't wait to come back.
I'm a bit skeptical on the service I get when your dealing with a party of 10 or more. It's very hit or miss. I think the server is either overwhelmed at how many waters they have to start off with and so on, pissed off that they think they might get shorted on the tip at the end of the night based on their past experiences, or the simple fact they have to make multiple trips for things they would only have to make one trip for...? I don't know and I don't think I will ever know. As our party were seated we all started our casual conversations...wait no menus? 5 minutes later menus in hand. 15 minutes later "Where's our server". 20 minutes later "OK this is getting ridiculous", 22 minutes later bro has to flag someone down to take our orders...? I think our server was watching the Laker Playoff game against the Nuggets. lol. Finally water, Sangria, and drinks are free flowing. Let's make up for this delay. I'm a true believer in the "tip based on performance" mantra. Perform well I tip well.  It's that simple. "Sh***y service equals sh***y tip". I'm saying shotty by the way, not what your thinking.lol. Started off with the Jerk Wings. Good flavor with a kick of spiciness. Nothing I can't handle but some of the guys in my group were sweating trying to play it off like everything was OK. For the main entree I opted for the BBQ Beef Short Ribs which were delicious. You can really tell how they incorporate their flavors to give just the right taste of the Caribbean. The boneless Jerk Pork with rice and beans made up for the slow start. Great menu items, great taste, and great Sangria. I can honestly say I will go back to Coconuts Caribbean Restaurant. But what I can't say is when I'll go back.
Walked in an assumed we would get good authentic jamaican food and was treated to Ja'fakin food. Drink had no alcohol in it which cost ten dollars. Sweet potatoe fries were frozen Ore-Ida fries. The waiter hardly checked on us and the worst part is the jerk. I'm no jamaican but my jerk dances circles around this sorry excuse for jerk chicken. Those who have said its good have obviously Never had real jerk. Asked for extra spicy and got extra sauce on the side which did not have any kick what so ever. Real jerk should burn good! On the way out the host tells us they have habanero sauce, thanks, now that we're done eating, that's going to help. Never again. Best do yourself a favor and get yourself some walkerswood jerk marinade and make your own, it will be cheaper and atleast have some flavor. I can assure you a real jamaican would agree with this review.
This place is awesome.  I came here with the family to celebrate my birthday.  The cocktails, pitcher of Pain Killer, were tasty and strong.  We got the sampler for an appetizer and it was, hands down, the best sampler plate I've ever had.  For dinner we got the ox-tail, jerk chicken, curry shrimp, corn festival, & beans and rice.  Every dish was excellent.  To top it off, the service was great!  I will definitely come back and highly recommend it.
What more can I say about Coconuts Caribbean Restaurant & Bar? It's hands down the best Caribbean spot in town!  As most have pointed out in previous reviews, the oxtail is a MUST have, whilst you can't go wrong with the jerk chicken... NOM to the NOM NOM! But what most don't know is the best kept secret of Coconuts, the drinks served from the bar... Ask for Robert, he is like a personal bartender who can read your mind and make any cocktail concoction that will satisfy you... I don't even recall most of the drinks I've had, but I must say he has been SPOT ON everytime! Coconuts definitely gets my approval.  Check it out for yourself and prove me otherwise.. Cheers!
1st time dining at Coconuts (but have been to the original restaurant Back-A-Yard at Menlo Park a couple of times. More items on the menu vs BAY which was a plus as that means they are trying to meet the different customers demands. The happy hour deal was great. I don't drink but got my bucks from the 1/2 price food items. We ordered jerk wings, ackee triangles and fried plantains as appertizers.  For main, we tried jerk pork (yummilicious), curried goat (very very good) & Roasted seabass wt okra coconut sauce. When it comes to dessert, we settled on coconut creme brulee, warm sweet potato pudding and key lime pie. Sounds like too much food for 5 of us??? I am there to taste-test and what better way to do it with a group of friends. Special Note: Jerk pork is an absolute must-try. Its slightly pricier than BAY but hey, it has nicer deco & menu. Highly recommended if you are in Palo Alto. There's a lot of families dining there on the night we were there. Decent space where they can combine tables to accommodate groups. Heard that they opened another place in SJ Downtown. Need to check it out next
Between of the 3 of us girls, we shared the: Rice & beans - perfect portion Jerk chicken - tender w/a kick of spice! Braised ox tail - delish! Literally fall of the bone Goat curry - strong in flavor much like indian curry There was enough leftover for another HUGE meal to take home! Decor is fun & colorful and the resto is pretty spacious. Service is good. Would def. come back again or frequent their sister (more hole in the wall like place) resto, Back A Yard.
This is probably my first time having Caribbean food... good thing it was at Coconuts, cuz I am definitely going to be trying more Caribbean food if it all tastes like Coconuts. I ordered the Lunch special (you choose 2 out of a list, & it comes with Rice/Beans/Salad) with Ox Tail & Jerk Chicken (dark meat of course!) Oh goodness, the Ox Tail was so tender. It was super saucy too, so it paired perfectly with their seasoned rice. I scarfed it down so fast. The chicken was super flavorful as well. I wish it had less bones, but that's more of just my own laziness kicking in. I also ordered the curry guac & plantains. It was really good. The plantains were tender but crispy. I wish they gave more plantains...it only came with ~8 slices. & there was a buttload of guac...but I just put the leftover guac on my entree. :P This was the perfect place to open up my palette to Caribbean food!
This was my first time trying Caribbean food and I love it.  Perfect combination of spicy and sweet. A friend and I shared and it was way too much! Jerk Chicken- Spicy and delicious! Fried Plantains- Sweet and savory- wish is came in a smaller portion Pork Bites-my favorite- sweet potatoes and tender pork Rice and Beans- Unnecessary I'm marking down a star for the cocktail prices.  For 12 dollars, I would hope they would be strong.  I will definitely be back!
Dog lovers, don't go here... the owner CLEARLY does not like dogs, otherwise, he wouldn't make his customers chain their dogs outside, on the sidewalk, and not in the regular patio area like every other patio owning restaurant does... and when we attempted to go, there was NO one out on the patio (we were having a late lunch, like 2pm). We had our twelve pound terrier with us. Really??? Stick my incredibly HUGE dog outside of the gate, on the fricking sidewalk and not under the table, quiet and well behaved? This was a doubly whammy because we a. got a frustrating, negative experience with this stupid, out of touch place and b. were forced to go that horrific excuse for Caribbean food aka Mango's down the street. Either way, my impression is both places suck, and for different reasons. Won't be trying this place out at all and will take my money to other dog-friendly, patio owning restaurants (and there are MANY of these,  Coconuts Restaurant!).
Great service and food. Made a 6:30 PM reservation on Yelp. Ordered the fish special, which was delicious but very spicy. 1 star off for not telling me how much it was ($30). Friend got the jerk chicken, which seemed ok. I would get the snapper again if it were available. Also got the special cocktail (sex on the island or something), which was quite good and not ridiculously sweet. and finished it off with the sweet potatoe pie (just ok). Would come back
I came to this place via Yelp. It received great reviews and the food looked delicious in pictures. This place didn't disappoint! The owner/chef Emmanuel came out to great us, superrrr friendly and told us some of the best things to order. We had the sampler plate which gives you a nice variety of food. Emmanuel brought us a couple of samples and also his gumbo. We had suchhh blast eating there, enjoying the atmosphere and chatting it up with the owner. He does everything straight from Jamaica and it's delish! I had the kiwi lemon drop which I highhhhgly recommend if you like a nice tart drink. I will definitely be returning to this fabulous joint. Thank you again for the awesome experience!!!
Some of the worst food i've ever eaten...
the cuisine here is so good it's nuts! after trying to get into nola's, which is also superb food but too long a wait, we found this treasure trove! quite possibly the best mac n cheese i've had in my life! authentic, flavor-filled, just plain delicious! everyone at our table reveled over what they ordered! our waitress, darn!, wish i could remember her name, she was so down to earth. what a gem! oh, and i can't leave out the ginger beer!!!! what!?!?! so fresh! its so good that i made a reservation 2 minutes before writing this review. i'm pretty sure this celebration will be just as exciting as the first! Thank God for great food!
I've been here twice now, both times a great experience.  I love the Caribbean ambiance (and it is very unique to the area).  If you like plantains, jerk chicken or if you are looking to try something a little different (curried goat, oxtail,... ) this is the place to go.  Warning: the food has spice, so this isn't for some people. Pros: plantains, okra, goat, jerk chicken, curried sea bass.  Cons (and a loss of a star for me): some dirty plates on the table and some lack of knowledge about the menu on the part of the staff.  Will be returning and soon.
A great Caribbean restaurant in DTPA.  Last time I was there, I had plantains and curried goat.... Read more 
My first time visiting this restaurant was for a work party for my best friend's last day/new job celebration. We'd call ahead a day before to reserve tables for 20 people. We made the reservation knowing that we would have some stragglers coming in at least an hour into the dinner. The food that night was amazing. Out of all us, I think we got a pretty good selection of their menu. I had gotten their six hour braised oxtail. It was spicy but so delicious. Their cocktails were pretty strong and our waiter was so helpful in offering up drink suggestions. The whole evening was turning well enough when at 9:30pm, some in our party just placed so more food orders, the manager comes along and informs some of us that they had another party coming in at 9:30pm and that we shouldn't have ordered more food. He was rude about it as well. Well, come 9:30, the other party was nowhere in sight! It was unnecessary and that ended the dinner on a bad note. My second visit was for lunch on a Saturday afternoon. Here's what I think happened with my curry shrimp order: the kitchen staff reheated curry chicken and added cooked shrimp to the plate. How do I know this? Bottom of dish of curry was cold, as if it just been refrigerated, and there were pieces of chicken in it. It saddens me to think that they couldn't have taken the time to thoroughly heat up my order, when I know fully well they did not have to really cook anything. The food is enjoyable and I would visit again, but hopefully this practice gets addressed.
We came here for my wife's birthday and I really enjoyed my food, but the service was a little slow, which was probably due to our large party. I found out ginger beer is not actually beer, but their specialty drink they make with no alcohol.  The rice and beans and chicken were my favorite dishes and there was good energy from everyone who was there. It was really a fun place to eat and socialize.  The ox tail stew was very tasty and the sangria drew great praise from everyone at our table.
I can taste the food just looking at the pictures!!! The real deal!!! Come back to the Island!!!
GREAT, GREAT, GREAT, FANTASTIC!!! Oxtails~yum, Mojitos~yum, Jerk Chicken~yum. Plantains~yum. Curry... Read more 
The sea bass stew and side fried plantains were the highlight of our meal. The side Mac n cheese and rice/beans were good, but not great...though they did compliment the food well. We had heard a lot about this place as well as its' sister restaurant 'Back a Yard' so decided to try it out and were very happy with our food. When ordering, definitely keep in mind that their 'Da Big Tings' portions are family style, so one is enough for two or three. Also, order a few of their sides do you can have a variety of foods. A note for those who like it hot...ask them for their habanero sauce on the side. Would do it again all over and this time, try their jerk chicken. Coconuts is a must try Caribbean gem!
I've been dreaming about coming back here for food, but I was less impressed.  I get how servers ask how the food is, but couldn't bear to tell them how rock-hard and over a day old the corn bread was since it wasn't her fault!!!  It was dry, couldn't crumble unless I really dug into it with my nail..for $3.50.. Disappointing. Jerk chicken had 2 slices half inch thick of white meat-dry as the deserts and don't understand why that was even plated.  Otherwise, the chicken was tasty and more spicy than I remembered although little overcooked including dark meat. Short ribs were so tender, covered in a bbq sauce.  Good flavor and loved how it was slow cooked.  Potato gratin was tasty too. Salad with a mango dressing was mediocre.  Liked the squash with lettuce but didn't like the cucumber with it as much. Waitress was nice and apologized for the wait but there was none.  Just wish the white meat jerk chicken and cornbread muffins were moist and more palatable.  (Actually that the cornbread muffins were even edible..)..
First thought: colorful walls/paintings...AM I IN JAmAICA? OK ok warning, it is my first time eating... Read more 
Everything I had ranged from great to amazing: Coconut fried prawns, curried shrimps with fried plantains, coconut creme brulee and the Painkiller cocktail (IIRC). So yummy! The service wasn't very good, they were a bit slow, but the place was swarming, so we kind of expected it and I've seen much worse. After all, when the food is so tasty, who cares about perfect service? Also, we had a reservation for 9:15, we arrived half an hour earlier and still got a table immediately. +1 point for that. They had free Wi-Fi it seemed, but the signal was pretty bad from our table so I couldn't connect. Overall, I very strongly recommend this place.
I was very unimpressed with Coconuts, I have been there twice now, the 1st time I went was about a year ago for a friends birthday and the food was ok, not extremely fresh, but still pretty good. The owner came over and talked to us and it was nice to get his input on the menu. However, I went 2 weeks ago for a dinner party for a friend of mine who is moving away, and I got there at 9pm (after the rest of my party because I had just gotten off work), as I sat down at the table, what I BELIEVE was the manager (an older man in business casual attire) came over and informed me that they had another party coming in at 9:30pm so I needed to "keep that in mind when making my selection". He was very rude about it, and after that nobody even addressed me or got me a water or anything and all I wanted was a glass of wine. (My party hadn't even received the bill yet) After everyone signed their checks and we left it was 9:45pm and still no other party. All in all I was very disappointed and would not recommend going there if you have a larger group that wants to have a relaxing visit. But for small parties of 2 it seemed to be much better.
I've never really tried Caribbean food before coming here (with the exception of Jerk chicken), but I must say that Coconuts have gotten me hooked. My friends and I ordered the Slow Cooked Jerk Chicken and the Chicken Shrimp Pelau, and they were just absolutely delicious; the meat was succulent and tender, and both dishes were jam packed with flavor. Read the whole review on my food blog here: http://bit.ly/NSCOxT - featuring yummy pictures of the two dishes! :)
Great place to enjoy a very tasteful Jamaican dish. The interior decor makes you feel like you are in the middle of a Caribbean island. I had the curry chicken and i had no complaints about it. I love it and i definitely have to come back to get a feel of their night life. :)
Very few dishes good and price is totally not worth it.
Jerk chicken and oxtail are the best, highly recommended :)
Coconuts is my favorite restaurant in Palo Alto.  Friendly staff, great food. Their service during lunch has gone to shit.  I don't know why. Unfortunately, their service has completely fallen in the past month (Spring-Summer 2012).  This is the third time in a month we've been there, and the third time in a row we've had terrible service during lunch.  As my coworker just said, "something changed there, but at least nobody's food was cold this time." Today: - Ordered appetizers the moment we sat down.  Host didn't place the order with the kitchen. - Waited 15 minutes to place an order - Flagged down a different waiter and placed order.  Put in the order again for appetizers. - Appetizers arrived 20 minutes later - Food arrived 10 minutes after appetizers, but they got an order wrong. Time in: 12p.  Time out: 1:30p. The time before, they forgot they had seated us outside, and every host/hostess interaction required one of us walking inside to get them. I've been going to Back-a-yard (and now Coconuts) since I moved here many years ago.  The food is amazing.  But we won't be going back to Coconuts until they find a way to staff the restaurant appropriately for the number of patrons they allow in during lunch.  Bummer.
Had lunch.  Service and food were great.  Goat curry lunch plate was a tad spicy but I'm a wimp so most people would think it was right where it should be.  Lots of food for price.  Coconut Shrimp appetizers were perfect.  Key Lime Pie and Coconut Creme Brule were each good.  Would definately like to go back for dinner and adult beverages.  Loved the tropical decor.
This was my first time eating at Coconuts. I gave it four stars only because I didn't love the main course I ordered, the Braised Oxtail. It was very well cooked, don't get me wrong. I think another person would've loved it. It just wasn't really to my particular taste. The shrimp and the three sauces (mango, hibiscus, and BBQ) that came with the Chef's Sampler Platter were amazing, though, and the Coconut Creme Brulee was very good. I will definitely come back to try some new things. The service was very pleasant. We brought my 19-week-old Guide Dog puppy in training, and the entire staff was very welcoming of him. Also, I love the restaurant's website. I know it has little to do with the eating experience, but it did get me excited about going.
Friggin awesome place! Food = kick-ass. Ambiance = fun and chill. Service = very helpful. We really loved everything about this place. Everything we ordered was great. Highly recommend jerk chicken, braised oxtails, rice and beans (pour the oxtail sauce all over it), plantains and the funnel cake like corn festival. I'm not sure what it is, but get it. The drinks were really good too. The special spicy raspberry margarita, but also the white and red sangria were real surprises. They make it in house and it'll knock you out! Not many places around that will give you such different, vibrant flavors. We loved the place. You'll love it too.
There are lots of awesome points about this place, don't let the 3 stars fool you, so let's gain some perspective. I picked this place b/c we were celebrating a birthday. Upon stepping into the restaurant, I was a little disappointed because I thought it'd be fancier. It's NOT. It's a very homey, mom and pop restaurant type, with the kind of decor that's so tacky, you can't help but find it a little charming. Deducted 1 star, but that's based on expectations. Deducted another star b/c of how big the tables were...which is good and bad. GOOD: you can definitely FEAST your heart out, BAD: you're shouting across the table, which ultimately makes the entire restaurant SUPER loud. AWESOMES: FOOD. FOOD. FOOD. The food was delicious. The service was awesome. Food was delicious, again. Everything we ordered was good, the only thing I didn't care for was the plantain chips..they weren't really chips as much as mashed...pods...of some sort, most likely with plantains. Overall, GREAT food, would definitely come here on random nights, but probably not for birthday or anniversary celebrations.
We love caribbean food, spicy the better.  We tried this place July 21st for my husband BD and we love it.  We ordered the jerk chicken an the special fried fish. Friendly atmosphere.
Been here a couple times on a whim for lunch and/or dinner with friends. While my personal bias is towards the sister restaurant up 101 off Willow (back-a-yard), this place still serves very good Caribbean food. I would also recommend the ginger beer, just don't forget to add a bit of water or the spiciness gets a bit overwhelming.
First time I tried Carribbean food, and I loved it! I got the Jerk Pork lunch special with brown rice, so delicious and a little kick of spice! I also tried my friend's beef oxtail and it was good! I never had oxtail until now. The curried chicken was also good, but I still would prefer the jerk pork or oxtail over it. It was a lovely day so we got a table outside, just be careful for the flies that fly into your drink!
Cute, casual place in Downtown Palo Alto. Although the restaurant isn't huge, it can accommodate parties of all sizes. All if their entrees looked tasty. I ordered the Curried Shrimp, which came with about 8 shrimp, some vegetables and fried plantains. It was great, but with 8 our so shrimp, it was on the lighter side. One of my friends, on the other hand, got the Curried Chicken, which looked like it came with a half of a chicken. Needless to say, she definitely had leftovers. My second friend, a vegetarian, got the Irie Tofu, which came over spinach and lentils, and looked really good too, but I didn't get a chance to taste it. This will definitely be an option when I'm craving Caribbean food. I say it gets a 3.5 start rating, overall.
I'm still debating if I should give them 3 or 4 stars... Too bad we can't give half stars here.  Food was great but the wait sucked.  :( Came here tonight for dinner and arrived around 7:30pm, 30 minutes before closing time.  The place was jam packed and loud.  We were seated quickly and ordered.  It took about 30 minutes or so before we were served. We ordered the jerk chicken, oxtail, coconut shrimp, corn festival, and sweet potato fries.  Out of all the items we ordered, the sweet potato fries seemed to be the most disappointing.  While it was crispy, it lacked flavor.  The corn festival sounded like an interesting side to try and it ended up tasting like a funnel cake/doughnut-y.  It was very filling.  My favorite out of the 3 main dishes was definitely the jerk chicken.  The oxtail was not bad either.  The meat was super soft and fell easily off the bone.  The coconut shrimp came with fried plantains and that was super yummy! Overall, the food was good, the restaurant was loud, and the wait/service was slow.  I'd like to come again at lunch time.  Maybe it will be more quiet then?
I really, really want to like this place...but I don't. It's just meh. We ordered a shrimp appetizer, jerk pork and jerk salmon. The shrimp was well cooked, but didn't "pop" for me. Both jerks were fine, but didn't get me salivating like I was hoping. I don't think jerk and salmon really goes together...the pork was better. The sangria is overpriced, and our's only had citrus rind in it, no fruit to eat (my favorite part)! Service was not great. The servers kept hitting my head or back when they came by the table. It took actually waving down our server to order - she NEVER looked at our table, we had to grab her each time. Every dish was brought out by someone new and they just put it down and took off. I will probably be back, just to make sure. I would really love to love a Caribbean place in PA.
Thanks for the great recommendations all ! I went for dinner with my husband and we thoroughly enjoyed the Jerk Chicken, Curried Goat, Beand n Rice and Fried Plantains. I was really tempted to try the Curried Shrimp too but saving it for next time. The drinks were good, strong and the pomegranate mojito complement my meal well. Wil go ack soon !!
Whenever I'm in Palo Alto, this is one of my go-to places. Located in the downtown area on Ramona, Coconuts is a laid back kind of place that serves delicious food and drink, and the folks who work there are super friendly! Everything I've had here has been absolutely delicious. However, if you had to try one thing, I definitely recommend the oxtail. Do it. You won't regret it. Some other yummies are: jerk salmon, jerk chicken, and the dry rub steak. You MUST order plantains with your meal. If you're into drinks, my fave is the spicy mango margarita. It makes me happy:) Go here with a group of friends so that you can try A LOT of different dishes. You'll leave happy and well fed.
came here on a lunch date with my girlfriend. the ambiance is very calm and lighthearted. food here is pretty good. it's better to eat here during lunch because of the specials. lunch menu and dinner menu are almost the same, but it is cheaper for lunch. had the curried goat and jerk salmon rice plate combo and a order of curried garbanzo avocado guacamole as an appetizer i really enjoyed the jerk salmon. really really tender, kinda melts in your mouth, great flavor. i was slightly disappointed with the curried goat. it was in a small bowl, a good amount of bones in it. flavor was good, but the portion was small. and goat is typically a bit more on the dry side than most meats. the curried garbanzo avocado guacamole was served with plantain chips dipped with guacamole. really good. overall this place is good for lunch
Until couple of weeks ago, I had actually stopped ordering, everybody working there knew what my order was and I had food sitting in front of me in less than 10 mins. Also, they knew I loved their habanero sauce, and they knew I could handle a lot of it, they just brought lots of habanero sauce along with my food. Not happy today :(. I ordered my usual guacamole and tostones, jerk chicken. During my last visit(last week) the tostones were overcooked and today they were undercooked. I also did feel that the quantity and quality of guacamole has gone down. It took about 15 -20 mins of wait time for the main course. Today I had to ask for the habanero sauce(which I am totally fine with), but the problem was I had to actually ask three times for the extra sauce and I got the sauce mid way through my meal. Usually a trip to coconuts during lunch time costs me about 50 mins, but today it was 90 mins :( I saw a few new people working there, I should probably give them a benefit of the doubt for the time part. I also saw a lot of food being taken back to kitchen, maybe a lot of messed up orders. Bottom line, the service was no where close to what it used to be. The food was still good for which I am giving the review a 3 stars
What can I say, I love this place. Amazing food, I can never get tired of their Tostones+Guacamole... Read more 
This was my first time having Carribean cuisine and I'm a fan! Went with the special which was a combination of Jamaican Jerk Chicken, Shrimp and vegetables.  All of which was tasty, however I'll probably need to try another restaurant's Jamican Jerk sauce to really compare.  Paired that with their white sangria which was also tasty. The dessert was what really took the cake (no pun intended).  I'm not even into desserts but they had a special Coconut cheesecake that the head chef was experimenting with.  BEST CHEESECAKE EVER.  We quickly gave the chef 2 thumbs up and told him to put it on the menu. Server was very informative, attentive and made some great recommendations.  Will definitely be back.
So the food is pretty damn  tasty which is why I can't muster less than 3 stars despite the following: The place gets packed which is great if you like yelling during your meal or saying "excuse me?" every few sentences. Not so great if you like good service or a relaxed dining experience. Service seems nice at first then goes AWOL. After your food is delivered, your water glass will sit empty. You then will sit with an empty plate until they notice you after it slows down.  Very UnCaribbean. Ambiance isn't all that.  I don't see the hype.  Maybe lunch is less lame than dinner. There is a seriously anti-climatic bar with a bartender in outer space.  You will stand there ignored as you wait for your table.  People are eating at the bar, no one's really drinking. I'd return here if in a large group, noticed the food price in general  (especially for the group menu) seem pretty reasonable,  likely why they get busy. Because I'm pretty sure people don't go here for the service. And not such a great place for a date unless you know there person really well or just don't care to talk to them.  Or both. Unfortunately we kinda wanted to talk not yell.
It was a Friday and I needed a Pain Killer. I'm not talking Tylenol or Advil, but I'm talking about Coconuts Caribbean's libation - the one with rum, cream of coconut, and a splash of pineapple and orange juice. What a great way to take the edge off the work-week - and wait, it only gets better. My friend and I started our dinner off with one of "di small things" - their twist on green plantains with an amazing avocado mash (aka guacamole). Please order the Curried Garbanzo Avocado Guacamole. If you love guacamole, you won't regret it. Our waitress had a couple recommendations for "di big things" - the jerk chicken and the goat curry to share. Good pick, ma'am. The jerk chicken certainly comes with a kick, and the goat curry was melt-off-the bone good. Don't forget to order a side though, as the entrees come solely as they are listed. Brown rice - quite buttery brown rice, in fact - was, perhaps, not so healthy anymore, but definitely tasty. The portions are generous, and I was able to savor the Caribbean goodness for lunch the next day as well. Although I'm not entirely going coconuts for this place - it's still a solid Palo Alto pick. The only downer is that the price is a bit on the higher side. I plan to come back another time though, as I look to cap off my meal with something from "di sweet things," the sweet potato dessert. And maybe another Pain Killer.
I am not an expert on Caribbean food so I can't comment on authenticity and such, but I know that I liked what I ate and saw. I think the menu was also well done in that they divide it between small plates page and a big plates page (which you all share family style with your table) with a small section for vegetarian dishes on the big plates page side. They also have a dessert menu page and a page for groups over 10 people, so it makes it nice where it's a balance between having a good amount of choices without having too many to choose from. The (ox tail?) stew we ordered (described as having falling off the bone meat) was definitely falling off the bones and flavorful - as were all the other dishes we ordered. My fiance loved the jerk chicken - it was moderately spicy (having both the taste of flavorful spices and a slight hint of hot spiciness) - as he did with the steak that he also ordered. I requested that we order the ackee triangles as I was curious to try "Jamaica's national fruit" as indicated in the description of the dish. It was flavorful on its own so I say it was great with or without the dipping sauce it came with. We did not order desert though they did seem to have a pretty good selection (maybe next time). We did order more than we could finish (I'm still enjoying cooking with the leftovers today as of 2 days later) but with all of that + the 3 or 4 beers that the boys ordered it came down to about $75 for the 3 of us.
I am coco for Coconuts (Caribbean Restaurant & Bar)! Went here tonight to celebrate and their drinks are very yummy.  I had the Swaddling Bird (?) and my sister had the Pina Colada.  I have to say I actually liked the Pina Colada more, it tasted like a yummy coconut ice cream.  The jerk chicken was amazing and the pork bits had a really nice spicy kick to them.  The pork bits also come with carmalized sweet potatoes which were to die for.  The goat curry is also good and my sister loved to the guacamole with plantain chips. The only negative was the service, although very friendly, was a little slow.  It wasn't that the waiter wasn't working hard, poor guy was working too hard and I think they were a little understaffed.
I loooooove coconuts!! Best place around to go to for Jamaican/Carribean food! Their jerk chicken is the closest that i've had to the one from jamaica :) For dessert.. make sure to try the sweet potato bread pudding or the coconut creme brulee. It's a must!!!!
The ox tail is amazing! Also delicious: plantains and coconut shrimp with mango sauce!
The place is fairly good.  Came here as a 12 person group on the weekend and the service was responsive.  We shared and ordered the sampler which was so-so.  We got guacamole which had banana as the "chips"....Both these chips and the fried plantains weren't much to sneeze about--I was expecting them to be more ripe or softer but they were BLAND. We did family style so I was able to try a number of dishes.  The jerk chicken on a sizzling platter were delicious.  The oxtail was swimming in too much liquid IMHO; it was spicy. A vegetarian in our group ordered a tofu salad...Tofu was SPICY! I waver between 3 and 4 stars due to the mixed food performance, esp. in the appetizers. However, overall, the main course/entrees are good and wonderful service so I would come again!
great for groups and for those who love to try new things/share amongst friends and family. - sangria - tasted waaaay too sweet for me so it was a great dislike from me. those who prefer sweet alcohol loved it. - crab and avocado salad - should really be called more of a crab and avocado dip. with the fried plantains, this was a good mix of texture with the softer 'salad' - mini patty sampler - reminds me of little empanadas since the fillings were chicken and beef. - brown rice - ok, this is a side dish. but i have nooo idea what they put it in because it was delish.. creamy brown rice. - jerk chicken - very nice spice to it and mixture of different parts of the chicken. a bit too spicy for some, but hey.. its jerk chicken! - curried shrimp - flavor combos reminded me of like.. half thai half indian. eitherway, i loved it especially atop the brown rice. i wish i had a baguette to dip in the curry :) all of that was split between 5 girls and we were stuffed with a few bites of leftover. average of $16/person.
I went Nuts over COCONUTS!!! I absolutely loved the coconut shrimp! Served with mango sauce,... its so choice I highly recommend it! My drink was a bit weak, but considering it was a dessert drink with chocolate sauce and rum... I wouldn't want the liquor to mask the flavors of the chocolate or the coconut cream. The fried plantains were ok.... not for my palette. I didn't get to try much here, but I plan to definitely go back.
I've been to Coconuts 3 times so far, all during weekend lunch time. Service has always been friendly, attentive and prompt. Food I like: Sweet potato fries Jerk chicken - very spicy! Ox tail -  well I always like ox tail Beans and rice that comes with the combo plate - very tasty Warm sweet potato pudding - as a rule I dont like warm dessert but this is really really good! Food I don't like: Fried plantains - too oily and blackened Jerk pork  - too dry
It was my first time trying Caribbean food, so for now, I'd say I am super happy I went.  Located near Caltrain, there is a festive indoor seating area and outdoor area.  The sun was out, so we ate out near a fake coconut tree - cute.  I got there early, so sat at the bar and the bartender was super nice, offering advice on the food and servings.  I ordered Da-Pain Killer drink which has a homemade coconut cream and a dash of nutmeg on top.  It was delicious.  For dinner, we ordered the 6 hour braised Ox Tail and Jerk Pork (bartender mentioned the jerk sauce was popular).  For the side, we ordered red beans and rice.  The servings were family style and we could have fed 3.  The pork was delicious, maybe a bit on the dry side, but awesome.  The oxtail was delicious, very comfort food.  The service was nice and I definitely want to come back and try more!
Jerk chicken wings. Just give me those for the rest of my life and I need nothing else. Ok maybe one of their mojitos too - best I've had in years. Perfectly balanced. I came here with a work group and we just kept ordering food... more food, more food... I feel like they just stopped listening at one point and started cooking everything they had... I don't remember everything we ate but there was salmon, steak, jerk chicken, plantains, blah blah oh so delicious all of it. Lots of parking, off the beaten path (I think?) and the staff is super friendly - really took great care of us!
Great place, I think every Caribbean Restaurant owner should go to Florida or Jamaica and taste the food then learn how to bring that taste here!  This was nothing like real Jamaican food but it was good.  Hint...  Look up Walkers Wood Jerk Seasoning and you will make some GREAT JERK chicken!!
Try everything as it's all good. We ate here around noon on a Saturday so it wasn't busy. The food came out quickly and our waters were filled. My friend told me that they tend to be packed during dinner. The food is still quick but they rarely fill your water or check on you. So do as I do, order a lot and carry a big bottle of water. The menu suggests that you order family-style and we did. Details of everything we ate. I loved how many dishes were served in a iron skillet/pan. Most are spicy: -Ackee Triangles: one of the few things I was indifferent towards. It looked like a fried wonton. Don't be intrigued by the description "Jamaica's National Fruit"; I couldn't taste it. -Mac & Cheese, Sweet Potato French Fries: good if you're into those sides. -Plantains: I loved them. Thick, fat and not too greasy. -Jerk Chicken: good, I liked the vegetables underneath them too. -Jerk Pork: good. One of the jerks has broccoli too. *Curried Goat: my FAVORITE. This is the first goat I've eaten that tasted like goat. Get this if you're into gamey, don't if you're not. -Braised Oxtail: ok. Good for the spice-adverse as it's one of the few non-spicy items on the menu. Includes broad beans. -Chicken Shrimp Pelau: I love rice so I liked this. We also ordered a couple sides of plain rice to eat with the food. -BBQ Beef Short Ribs:  Someone else ordered the "short ribs" so I was expecting a jerk rub. I was surprised by how American the plate seemed when it was served: BBQ sauced short ribs with a side of broccoli and potato gratin. Consulting the menu, it's a yucca gratin which makes more sense. Good dish for those want to baby-step into Caribbean food. The broccoli was well-seasoned; I can't describe it beyond it looks plain but is not. -Pitcher of white sangria It came out to about $20/person. Considering how full I was, good deal. As someone said, "I feel like I ate a zoo."
Hands down the favorite of the night for me was the Curried Goat. Very flavorful and the meat was heavenly soft without falling apart. It looks undistinguishiable at first under the dim light. But no worries. It rocks in your mouth! We had the coconut shrimp, Sevitched Fish, Plaintain, Pork Jerk and plantains. Not bad. Another standout was the cocktail called Pain Killer. I requested for the most cocconut in a drink and I got what I wanted! Delicious and just perfect! Second in running is the Bushwhacker! Awesome waiter Ace. On point and knowledgeable! The best! Met the chef that night as well. At 6 pm on a Saturday without a reservation we got lucky. At 6:30 the place was packed! But a very minimal wait on food and efficient service the place is like a well oiled revolving door. Garage right across and parking problem solved.
Average tasting food and slow service: just another day in Palo Alto. Just kidding hometown, I love you! Food wise, this place definitely does not replace my go-to Caribbean restaurant, Back-a-Yard - I'll take that ghetto little shack over this place any day. Everything here is supposed to be family style, so the "big tings" do not come with sides. They are also not that big. I found that 2 "big tings" and 2 sides (we chose rice and fried plantains) worked really well between three people. We ordered the jerk chicken and braised oxtail. The jerk chicken is very heavily spiced on the surface but somehow manages to be flavorless inside, not to mention dry. The braised oxtail is more flavored throughout and fork tender but tastes unimpressive/strange/I-can't-describe-it-but-not-quite-right. Also, side of rice is small so figure at least one order per two people if you go. As for me, I won't be back.
Great place to with a good ambience and the food is pretty awesome too. Gets crowded on weekends so booking in advance is a good idea.
The first thing you need to know about Coconuts is not to sit at the bar. Palo Alto, as tech-savvy as it is, is still a college town at heart which means that the places there need to cater to two audiences: big moneyed tech guys and college students. So when you go to Palo Alto on a Thursday night, and all the places you're looking at are filled to the brim, you'll get recommended to somewhere like Coconuts, which isn't bad but certainly has a chain restaurant feel to it. First things first, try not to sit at the bar. Because of the island theme here, there are a lot of frozen drinks ordered which means that the blender will be going all night , often making it tough to hear. In addition, there's a weird wind patter when one of the doors is open so that there's constantly a chilly breeze coming through here. That said, the wait staff is very nice here, and the food was alright though delivered slowly. Started off with the jerk wings, which we figured was a good barometer, and found them small but tasty. For dinner I had the jerk chicken which was disappointingly lacking rice (I ordered some extra) and heat, but the flavor was good. The chicken pieces (there were a lot) alternated between dry and soggy, which made for an interesting mix. Our party also had the cobb salad, which was probably a bad choice at a Caribbean joint but she wasn't that hungry. The salad didn't live up to any sort of excitement, which was mostly just big hunks of iceberg with some stuff layered around. The Caribbean pasta wasn't bad but nothing to write home about. Drinks were made well, and they had some decent rums, which is to be expected a Caribbean joint. It's possible that sitting at the bar kind of diluted our experience with the noise, but I didn't love it.
Oxtails and Jerk Chicken, my favorite combo. Although I was told their curry goat is as good but I'd never abandoned my two favors. Always mad at their bad and slow service but the delicious food always cheers me up and forget about the bad part of the experience.
I had lunch here with coworkers a few weeks ago. The restaurant is a decent size (so plenty of room for groups), and in true Caribbean fashion, the decorations are colorful, tropical, and just overall pretty. Personally I like the food at back a yard in menlo park better, but this place was still good. The food was a little spicier than I would have liked (to be fair, jerk chicken I supposed to be a little spicy - I'm a wimp, I know). The cornbread muffin didn't have as much flavor or moisture as I would have preferred. The service was ok, but not great. One of the people with me ordered a corn bread muffin after wed already received our entrees, and it took a really long time for them to bring it out. When we first sat down, one coworker had to request new silver wear since they looked dirty. Parking wasn't terrible since its a block south of University. They have an outdoor area also, but it was a cold day so we sat inside. I wouldn't come back here for the food since I prefer back a yard and I live north of PA, but I'm really glad I got to try it. And I wouldn't mind stopping by their happy hour for some tropical drinks!
This place is AMAZING!!! The staff is extremely friendly and the decor is bright and lively. Ive eaten here over a handful of times and I have yet to be let down. If its your first time id recommend the Jerk Chicken, Sweet Potato fries and the Mac and Cheese (The BEST!!), If you also want to enjoy a nice colorful drink then id also recommend the "Pain Killer" Make sure to make reservations, this place is a little small and fills up quick.
I've been to Coconuts before, but I wasn't a Yelping fiend at the time.  I'm glad we went back over the weekend so I could review it :)  Like many others, I have been to Backayard, so the bar was set high. I hate to say it, but I was a little disappointed this time. Here's the scoop: We had reservations and were seated right on time.  The place is small, so there isn't a lot of room for squirming around when the place is full (as it was when we visited).  There also seemed to be a party in the bar area that could have led to the line of people waiting outside. The proteins (aside from the salmon) were about the only thing that really were outstanding.  We had oxtail and jerk pork at the table.  Though I didn't try it, my friend needed more jerk sauce for the dry salmon.  The rice and beans were delicious, but the plantains were severely lacking in flavor and were dry.  Fries and corn festivals weren't fresh. Service was OK even though they were really busy.  I'll probably be back if we need a more sit down type of place, but Backayard will be my go to place for my Caribbean fix.
Always a good experience here: Met one of my clients here for dinner and the compliments have not stopped coming! Entree: Jerk Salmon - well seasoned and cooked well. Irie Tofu - Surprisingly good Island Salad - Large salad, enough to share between the two of us. Drinks: Bahama Mama - Another round please Drink of the Day - was surprisingly good. Dessert: Coconut Creme Brulee Always a good time here...thanks to Sharon our wonderful server.
First time here in a while, but always a good experience. Came in on a Saturday night, so parking was... Read more 
I'm Cuckoo for Coconuts I've been a big fan of Back-a-Yard for six years now and was very excited when I heard the chef opened a nice sit-down restaurant in downtown Palo Alto. A place where I don't have to fight for a table and can journey to safely at night! Hurray! (The Saturday line at Back-a-Yard that led out the door for their only six tables had gotten old, and who really wants to eat at night on the EPA border?) The food here is meant to be shared so although the prices are high, the plates are big and feed two people each. And you can get a sampling of appetizers and side dishes, too. I chose this for a Mom's Night Out and the food more than delivered. Plus, we left only paying $20 a person for a ton of food. Appetizers The Coconut Shrimp was my favorite dish of the night. My husband tried it on a subsequent visit and LOVED it. (Note: If you are my husband's mother and might not like that your son is eating non-kosher food, I am only kidding. He did not eat a single bite at all. In fact, since I ate it he proclaimed me a heathen or the Jewish equivalent. I'm not sure what that would be... an evil shiksa?) The Garbanzo Guacamole with Tostones was different and yummy. The Ackee Triangles were tasty but mostly just tasted like fried. Yes, I'm using "fried" as a noun here. Entrees I still loved my Jerk Chicken, but some at my table thought it was too spicy. There were not a lot of vegetarian options on the entree menu (more on the apps menu), but the Irie Tofu was a favorite of the vegetarian contingent as well as one of the meat eaters at the table. My favorite entree was the Chicken Shrimp Pelau. The chicken was very tender and the dish reminded me of a very good arroz con pollo. (My husband was not as big a fan on a later visit. Heathen.) Sides I love Back-a-Yard's Rice and Beans and my passion has not diminished since trying this at Coconuts. However, the subtle flavors of the coconutty rice can easily be overpowered by the aftertaste of other spicier dishes you might also be eating. Another side we've tried (every visit) is Sweet Plantains. Who doesn't love Sweet Plantains? Despite our reservation we had to wait at the bar for 30 minutes. And then when we finally got a table it was SO close to the next table that not all of us could fit into our chairs on one side of the table. A few of us barely slid into our seats and others just gave up until the other table had emptied. It was also very loud and we were grateful when the place cleared out so we could hold a conversation. Coconuts has a Jamaica party vibe with a fun drink menu, but to my surprise also has a kid's menu. The kid's menu is a a bit expensive though so we gave our toddlers food from our plates instead.
Coconuts is definitely deserving of their solid over-all 4 star average.  We've been to Mango Caribbean restaurant, and did not like it due to dry food and sloooooow service.  So we were a bit apprehensive about trying Coconuts for fear of it being a similar experience. But Yelp did not lead us astray! The details: Really friendly waitress. The food was to-die-for! And after we ordered, the food came out really fast. The menu is designed to be family style.  So they have 'small plates' listed first - aka appetizers or salads.  They have entrees, from a range of pork to beef/steak to chicken to vegetarian options.  These are all a la carte and range in price from about $13-17.  Then you can choose from a list of sides (also a la carte) with veggies, sweet potatoes, rice and beans, etc.  These run $4-8. We ordered: -Pork Bites for appetizers ($8).  Pork bites were ok, but I could've eaten a whole plate of was the sweet potatoes they served with them.  It tasted like they were caramelized.  Delicious! -Jerk Chicken as our main dish (it's all served family style) - SO tender, flavorful and juicy! $14 -Sides of Beans and Rice - such a far cry from the dry beans and rice at Mango.  These beans and rice get two thumbs up from me.  It is mostly rice, though, with a few beans. -Sauteed Veggies - They were good - snap peas, broccoli, sweet potatoes and okra.  I think I'd try something different next time cuz the okra was like okra and was slimy. I can't get over how much better it was than Mango.  The one thing they do have in common is their strong specialty cocktails!  Whew!  Ordered a 'Sweet Ting' and it was mostly alcohol.  Same thing with my fiance's Mojito.  Almost too much (yes, for us, it is possible). If you get there and put your order in before 6:30pm Thurs-Sat, you'll get happy hour prices on beer, well drinks and selected appetizers.  We thought we made it in time, but the waitress informed us that the computer changes the price right at 6:30pm and guess when she put our order in?  Right at 6:30pm.  So no happy hour price for us.  Oh well, next time. The only things I have to complain about are:  the hostess who greets people.  She could be more friendly - as in actually greet, smile and be a hostess.  She just looked at us waiting for us to say something to her.  A bit awkward. And because it's such a small restaurant, the tables are super close together so it's hard to maneuver through the restaurant for patrons and servers.  It also gets quite loud, so you have to be in the mood for that atmosphere. Overall, we loved it, and look forward to going back to try other items on the menu.
I found this place on yelp and was pleasantly surprised by the ambiance. The waiters were really nice and always came to check up on us and give us the menu to order more! We were a big crowd so we ordered family style. I would say order 2 of the same dishes. They have happy hour as well :). Guacamole  ($4) - I was sad we had to share. It was worth it folks. Corn Festival ($3)- Also a favorite. It's sweet corn, a party-- I mean, festival-- in your mouth. Collared Greens ($5)- I'd save your money and get the corn festival instead! Who needs vegetables?! Curried Shrimp ($15)- It's cooked in coconuts curry sauce and comes with vegetables with fire plantains. The shrimp was delicious and perfectly cooked! For people who can't take the heat, the curry dishes are what you should order here. Six Hour Braised Ox Tail ($15)- I always try the ox-tail on a menu. The tender, succulent meat fell off the bone and came with some broad beans and carrots. But again, who needs vegetables when there's meat? Jerk Chicken- Spicy! Try it! I really wish I had room to try dessert, more happy hour items, and the short ribs. I'll have to come back instead. Thanks Coconuts Caribbean!
The food was delicious but be prepared for no healthy fare.  The cocktails are strong and tasty.  Our waitress was wonderful.  She made the evening.  I would recommend the guacamole with plantain chips and the jerked pork.
I came here thinking that I could order an actual coconut... Didn't happen.. I've had an obsession with Caribbean food since I went to Jamaica a few years ago.  This restaurant appealed to me after looking at their menu, and reading the reviews on yelp.  I decided to try it out.  I ordered the jerk chicken (of course!) and the jerk salmon.  It came with rice and beans (both mixed together) and a side salad.  Their portions are huge!  The jerk was pretty tasty and spicy. It definitely wasn't the best jerk I've had, but it was pretty good! I'd have to say that this restaurant is good in many ways.  Big portions, friendly service, tasty food, fun atmosphere... I'd probably come back here again, especially for happy hour.  They had some interesting drinks that I'd like to try!
SCORE! We came here for lunch and because of Yelp, ordered the same thing everyone else did. Figured if those dishes passed the test then I'll venture to other parts of the menu. FOOD: - Jerk Chicken: Good. For some reason I don't think I got the jerk sauce. It was a little dry but still tasty. The skin was yum! - Jerk Wings: Packed with flavor! Didn't finish this and warmed it up the day after. Still juicy and tender! - Ox Tail: Melts in your mouth because it was mostly fat. Tasty but not sure if I'd order it again though. - Rice and beans that come with the lunch platter = delicious! - Plantains are to die for - Coconut shrimp was good. The mango sauce totally made this dish - Passion fruit juice didn't taste all sugary and artificial which is a huge plus. Definitely coming back here again.
HITS: Happy Hour (Tuesday - Saturday 5 to 6:30pm with $4 apps and drink specials) Pork Bites Corn Festivals Coconut Creme Brulee (with a sweet potato dessert on the menu I was surprised I preferred this one) Curried Garbanzo Avocado Guacamole with Plantain Tostones (Couldn't taste any curry or garbanzo beans.  It's basically regular guacamole with tasty plantain tostones.) MISSES: Ackee Triangles Corn festivals don't come with powered sugar. NOTES: The server might say the corn festivals are like hush puppies but they are not.  There more like a heavier version of beignets with out the powered sugar.
Went here after work with some coworkers since were just about due for another hangout. Ambience is cool, and the staff are really friendly. We got there 15 minutes before happy hour ended... we ordered all the appetizers on the happy hour list since they only cost about 4 bux each: -jerk chicken wings--definately has a spicy kick to it, but really good and juicy -jerk pork--fatty goodness is all i can tell you!! -fried plantains with umm...guacamole...i think... that's what that was... -one other thing, but i forget what... Waiter said the specialty cocktails weren't a part of the happy hour menu, which saddened me a bit, but given that it was an effin' crazy ass day in the clinic, I decided that I really needed a drink haha...so I ordered the "Pain Killers"...yummy, kind of tastes like Pina Colada, but with a hint of nutmeg... When it came time to order the entrees, we ordered: -Jerk Chicken--given that this is what the restaurant is known for, I somehow favored the jerk wings more...maybe cuz they were smaller,flavorul, but not so spicy? I don't know...Mostly everyone at my table said that the jerk chicken was a bit more dry and for some reason, overwhelmingly spicy...so spicy to the point I downed my Pain Killer in like 5 minutes (no joke...I usually drink my cocktails in small increments haha)...just to eliminate the burning sensation in and around my mouth...good thing I did that or else I wouldnt get the chance to try out any of the other dishes -Ox-tail...fall of the bone and tender...best dish out of all of em... -Sea bass--yummy...the sauce/broth it was bathed in was also delish -two more dishes but i forget what...my goodness, my memory totally sucks sometimes... -We also had beans, rice, and plantains to go along with our meal...if it wasn't for all that grease, I'd eat a whole bowl of fried plantains all day everyday! This place is pretty pricey...but regardless, I had fun.
Wonderful Ambiance, the food was really really good, I had the curry goat and the Beef ribs and rice and beans.  Wow amazing.  My friend had the jerk chicken nice in spicy, and oxtails were favorful.  We shared or combo and got a chance to taste each others order.  I enjoyed all of it as well as the plantian we also, had a Drink that was vote #1 and we Both could see why.   It had a great taste and a kick well worth the price.  We plan on telling others about the Coconuts and also going to experience the other sister restaurants.
I've been here twice and I would say that the best thing about Coconuts is the bar. Really nice bartenders that know their thing. Make sure you ask them for something special, the cocktail menu is all right, but there's much more to explore.
Coconuts is the more formal, sit-down, Palo Alto version of the very casual order-at-the-counter Back-A-Yard BBQ in Menlo Park. Both are exceptional! I don't have Caribbean food very often, but the seasoning is extraordinary. Very flavorful, very tasty. The ambiance of Coconuts has a wonderful simplicity to it. Simple palm trees are painted on the walls, and paintings hang from the walls depicting beaches from the Caribbean. Simple tables and chairs are used to complete the simple elegance of Coconuts restaurant. Service is very helpful, and happy to walk you through the menu. If you wonder what goat tastes like, just ask! They'll happily tell you anything you're wondering. (By the way, if you are wondering what goat tastes like, the server told me that it has a flavor and consistency similar to deer/venison!) As for the food, it's beyond wonderful. The New York steak is one of the most extraordinary things I've tasted, just bursting with flavors. Their jerks are all wonderful, too. It has a great spiciness to it that just comes alive in your mouth. Overall, Coconuts is one of the best restaurants around; Carribean food certainly isn't a flavor I have every day, so Coconuts is quite unique in that regard. I love it!
This satisfied the craving I was having for Caribbean food. There aren't a ton of spots to get curry at in the Bay. I am kinda over eating Mexican every day that ends in a y. There are only so many times a week I want to partake in taqueria eating, yet they seem to be every freaking where. As my options are really scant, this place is passable. This is new to me, but I have never been to any Caribbean place that does not serve sides with the entrees. That was really off-putting. Rice generally comes with the meat that you order. Who it eating a big bowl of meat with nothing? No veggies. No sides. Well, I had to buy rice. This just added to the already not so great value that I was getting. If not for happy hour, no appetizers would have been purchased. I probably won't be coming back to this place during my visits to the Bay. Place was way too pricey for what I got. And it wasn't that good. Average food.
Awesome jerk chicken sandwich. no need to say anymore!
Thank you for your prompt invitation Yelp, to Yelp about  my recent trip to Coconuts. I most certainly will! I can't say enough about this place. The atmosphere the staff, the fooood (sigh). Good Sigh, Great Sigh. Everything I have ever had has been amazing. Amazing to the point of I would have little to no shame actually liking my finger clean, then liking the plate clean, and possibly the table if I spilled, and maybe even the table next to me, and their fingers as well. Not to mention that the staff. The beautiful hostesses, the warm general manager who makes a point to acknowledge you and welcome you back. The Kitchen Manager, who's greeting is as warm as the friend plantains. And Roberto, one can not call you a Bartender. That would suggest you were one who merely tends bar. I would like to call you a Concoction Coordinator, maybe Roberto the God of Rum, possibly just Roberto....like Cher, or Madonna; no need for a last name or title. GO,...you will not be disappointed. But you may need a reservation!
We had a party of 8 and they were very accommodating. Between the 8 of us, we had: *Jerk Chicken - My favorite dish of the night, but on the spicy side so watch out! *Curry Shrimp x2 - The shrimp was fresh but I wish they gave more. The plantains were excellent because they were sweet (many of the restaurants I've been to serve them before they ripen so they taste more like a potato) *Ox Tail - I'm usually not a fan of ox tail but this was deeeeelicious. Be sure to order a side of rice to soak up the sauce *Guacamole - This was on their Happy Hour menu for $4 and was good. They were also nice enough to give us a few extra tostones so each of us could try it *Corn Festival x2 - Definitely worth buying. It was like a fried corn ball (that sounded weird) *Collard Greens x2 - Not what I was expecting. I found the collard greens were acidic, but maybe I'm just used to the salty, Southern style. My tummy gives Coconuts Caribbean Restaurant & Bar...4 Stars!
I confused Coconut restaurant with Mango restaurant for the longest time!!   This place has the best jerk chicken and Ox tail dish!!! I'm so happy to find this sit down place and don't have to go to BackAYard!  Would love to have better plantain dish.  The outdoor sitting area smells like tire!
Food was delicious. I had the jerk pork w/ bbq ribs.  The ox tail stew was just as good. Would go again to try their other dishes.
Highly recommend ackee triangles, pork bites, and jerk wings for appetizers (all $4 during happy hour [Tues - Fri 5-6:30]), and BBQ beef short ribs (comes with this delicious yucca gratin), boneless jerk pork, and braised ox tail (get a side of rice because it's a little salty on its own) for entrees. All the meats are so tender and fall off the bone. A mango mojito washes everything down nicely. Note: Maximum of 4 credit cards to a bill and gratuity is included for parties of 6 or more.
12.11.11 Curry Goat, People said it and I'm going to say it also..Curry Goat was the highlight for me. Oxtail was ok, the Jerk Chicken would not be good without the sauce, the rice is cool, the plantains are a must, and you can skip the drinks...Concentrate on the food. If I'm back at Palo Alto will I come here again? Prob not, but if its the only Carribean food place within range then yes.
We ordered the Beef Ribs & Jerk Chicken.. all I have to say this was the best meal I had in the past full year. Nothing upset me on that menu! The pomegrante Sangria was very good, and strong. The Chicken was hot, and full of flavor. The Beef ribs came off like butter, and made to perfection.. Not a lot of people have beef ribs, this place does it real good!! 5 Stars, service was great our waiter came around often to check if we needed anything. Pricey, but well worth it!
Came here for dinner on a Friday night and they were booked up 'til nearly 9 pm!  Lucky for us, we nabbed a couple seats at the corner of the bar so our little group still got our nosh on. We took the bartender's recommendations and shared the goat curry, 6 hr stewed oxtail and coconut fried shrimp with a side of rice and beans (surprisingly delicious) and fried corn crullers. Originally I wanted a side of cornbread but our friendly bartender suggested the crullers -- that the fried dough was better for sopping up the curry -- and he was right! Everything was delicious (especially the goat curry - to my delighted surprise), the service was friendly and attentive and the island theme of the decor pretty fun. They also have a great drinks menu - and having sat at the bar, I can tell ya they don't skimp on the alky!
Quickly seated even on a busy night.  Super friendly staff. We had the jerk chicken wings for an appetizer and the pork bites and shrimp creole for the entrees.  The wings were phenomenal (and spicy!), the pork bites tender and filling, the shrimp creole full of flavor. The sangria was great and so was the virgin pina colada.  No room for dessert. Skip the fries, they looked like the frozen bag kind. Total bill was $52 excluding tip.
The Goat Curry and Jerk Chicken are out of this world. I'll go back again and again for just these two dishes. Top it off with a Pitcher of Mojitos for a fantastic dinner!
my bf took me here for dinner.  meh.  he seemed to like it, but i am not a fan.  the people there are super nice - i'd give them 5 stars alone! but the food wasn't great and wasn't my taste.  i got the jerk chicken, which was incredibly dry.  we tried the coconut shrimp too. they were ok.  drinks were ok.  not somewhere i would go again.
Went a second time. Had the Chef's Sampler Platter. It comes with three sauces and a mix of Di Small Tings. All good, sauces are great (barbeque, mango, and spicy). I followed up with  a big ting: the peppercorn crusted NY Steak. Had a heavy sauce that masked the taste of what I suspect was a delicious cut of NY steak. Was not amazed. Still this is a great place and they try really hard to have you be happy.
Went for a Friday lunch with a friend. You can order lunch or dinner-sized dishes and eat... Read more 
Real ginger beer!  Dark rum! Ting!  Jerk pork!  What a great place! A bunch of us had sort of a "Caribbean sailors reunion" at Coconuts yesterday and we didn't get a chance to really enjoy the restaurant but what I did see was outstanding!  I'm sure I'll upgrade my review to 5 stars once we go back and try a few of the entrees. Their housemade ginger beer is the best I've had this side of Antigua.  The stuff you buy at BevMo isn't even a close second.  Their ginger beer has a bite to it and is definitely spicey like it's supposed to be.
The food here is amazing!  Jerk chicken, braised oxtail, curried goat, corn fritters and the best beans and rice ever.  The fired plantains are also a must. The drinks are pretty fab too.  Great rum punch and the only place I know that makes a dark and stormy (ginger beer with rum). The people are also really nice.  I loved the food at their sister restaurant, Back-a-Yard so much, I wanted them to cater our wedding, but Coconuts ended up doing the catering because they had more staff.  Great people to work with and by far, the best wedding food ever!
The service and the food are excellent. I ate here with my friend last night.  She has ordered catered food from Coconuts Caribbean on many occasions. I'm so glad that she took me here because I had a great experience. Last night I ordered the short ribs. I was extremely impressed with the texture and the flavor of the entire plate. Ist of all I've never had a short rib with such a large quantity of meat on the bone (I had no idea that there could even be that much meat on a short rib). The short ribs were so tender that the meat fell right off the bone and melted in my mouth.  The plate also came with layered potatoes and greens.  The layered potatoes were thinly sliced and stacked pretty high in a square shape. I didn't know they were potatoes at first since they were so nicely presented.  The next time I go here, I will order that dish again. We also had the ox tail, rice and beans, guacamole with plantines, fried donut, fried plantines, pudding and drinks.  All of which were delicious.
A cultural experience in and of itself, I've never tasted Caribbean cuisine through first hand experience before. Because of this, I was surprised at how often "jerk" appeared on the menu. Thankfully, the waiter was gracious and patient in explaining what "jerk" was exactly...this special sauce which you can decide how spicy you'd like it. Our waiter was friendly, and helpful, and did a wonderful job of making my first experience with Caribbean cuisine a pleasantly fun one. When we requested for extra tomatoes to go with our salads, he was more than willing to give us the extra side to enjoy. In terms of the food itself, we devoured it quickly and enjoyed every bite of it. Both my date and I had the jerk chicken special. The mix of the salad with the rice and chicken was very savory to my mouth, and even now describing it my mouth is watering remembering the combination. It was a unique combination I didn't have before. Overall a good experience...4 stars! :)
3.5 stars I'm koo-koo for Coconuts!  I love the vibrant atmosphere and diverse crowd at this hoppin' island eatery. Saturday nights bring large groups so expect the noise level to be almost intolerable.  Our group actually moved to another room so we could hear ourselves talk. We started off with a pitcher of Sangria and it was quite tasty, not too strong either.  The menu is family-style so we ordered some small 'tings' and some large 'tings'.   I recommend the corn festival, boneless jerk pork, and fried plantains.  The jerk chicken was just okay - not fall off the bone as I had expected and really spicy for my tastes.  The fish of the day was a fried snapper and that was just so-so. The prices here are affordable and portion sizes are good (but not over the top).  The four of us ordered about 6 dishes and a pitcher of Sangria for about a $100 check.  Not bad at all.
While in Palo Alto, decided to eat here since many fellow yelpers had good reviews about this place.  I ordered: - Mini Patty Sampler consist of  chicken and beef patties baked in a buttery pastry coconuts picka peppa sauce. - Jerk Salmon consist of Atlantic salmon grilled with their signature jerk sauce ,wilted spinach and garbanzo. - Shrimp Creole consist of  gulf white shrimp roasted in sofrito sauce, tomato and plantain tostones. Overall I thought the meal was decent but nothing spectacular. The price and the portion size did not match up. Small portion of food for a hefty price.
Food is good but salty. Slow service-They never refilled my glass of water until I requested it.  Maybe I would've enjoyed the meal more. BBQ beef rib super tender and falls right off the bone. Jerk pork is pretty good. It's a little dry at times. Stewed oxtail is super tender but I didn't like the flavoring too much. It was too salty. 2 item lunch combo around $14 Too much food for me.  Comes with rice and salad.  I recommend sharing unless you are a big guy. It would have been a 4 if not for the service.
I've been here twice - once a couple years back, and again a month ago, and then again recently in doggie bag form...which was still pretty good! The food is hearty with big portions. I've tried the ox-tail, sea bass, jerk chicken, and bbq beef short ribs. The short ribs are the best in my opinion. The sauces are rich, sometimes overly salty such as I've had with the ox tail. The place is hopping and loud when crowded. I've been there on a slow night too and it's just not the same! And while a doggie bag wasn't bad, being there along with the food is the most fun.
I went here because of all the good reviews on yelp for lunch with an old buddy. I have to say that my review is going to be very bias. I didn't try anything of what people recommended. However, I have to say if a place is going to get 5 stars on yelp or 4 stars and up pretty much everything on the menu should be tasty and special. I had the half pound jerk burger with crimped fries. It wasn't not tasty but it wasn't anything special. I definitely didn't get the jerk flavor in the burger. The meat itself was well cooked and it was well seasoned but it didn't come off as caribbean to me. Also the crimped fries tasted like they got frozen fries at safeway and threw them in the deep fryer. I paid 12 bucks for this? Lame. The place did have good service though. We sat at the bar and the guy was super nice and chatted with us and made jokes but when we were talking just the two of us catching up he realized that he should shut up. I hate it when servers have no idea when to stop talking and let you enjoy your meal. He was very attentive with bringing more water or condiments. I think I'd give this place another chance though. Maybe try out what people recommended and update my review.
Jerk chicken (and chicken wings), jerk pork w/ plantains, oxtail, and okra veggies yum!  Great for casual lunches & dinners.  Sometimes service is a little slow, but food is consistently good.  Expect a loud atmosphere.  I've intro'd a bunch of friends to this place and they've all enjoyed the food.  Makes me wanna go to Jamaica.
Alright lunches, some fun flavors. This review is for lunch only. Salads - mostly lettuce, not enough other vegetables. Would prefer to go elsewhere for salads. Entrees - Hit or miss. The waitress suggested goat, but I firmly recommend against it. It was mostly bones and gristle. It's a fun atmosphere to hang out in, but not fit for foodies.
Oh my gawd!!!! I wish they'd opened up another location closer to me... Had the unfortunate opportunity to be a patient at Stanford for a couple weeks... But oh, Coconuts made me feel right at home. Whenever someone would ask what could they bring me, I'd be quick to say Coconut's. I think I ate a week straight from here. Jerk wings... Oh sooo tasty. Braised Oxtails... These are the things to be craved! My husband who doesn't like oxtails, loves these! And they come with butter beans and carrots, ahhh getting hungry just thinking about them. Beans and Rice... Sooo good, the plantains are yummy too. Check them out, they are the real deal.
Suggested that my friend and I check this place out for our monthly foodie/catch-up sesh because I saw all the rave reviews. Needless to say, we were very satisfied! We came in on a Saturday afternoon around 1pm and they had opened at noon so the place was pretty much empty. The ambiance and decor were really nice. We looked over their menu, which was pretty extensive. We ordered the coconut shrimp for our appetizer, my friend had the chicken panini with sweet potato fries, I ordered the jerk chicken wrap with sweet potato fries as well, and we both had a Bahama Mama to drink. We both agreed that the coconut shrimp was really good. It was 6 pieces that we split. The mango sauce that accompanied it was perfect. I was surprised when our server came to take away the plate with the sauce on it and didn't even bother asking us if we were still using it. But, besides that, great appetizer. Our food came out at the same time and we each gave each other half of what we ordered so we were able to try different things. The sweet potato fries were standard. Nothing special. But, my friend's panini was awesome. The bread was nice and crunchy and each bite was flavorful. My jerk chicken wrap was huge! It was about the size of a super burrito! The jerk chicken was moist and the ingredients such as the avocado was very fresh. Our Bahama Mamas were good, but we didn't know they were $9 until we got the bill. Final verdict: 4 stars for the food and 3 stars for the service. No complaints about the food at all. Our server wasn't very attentive. But, overall, a really great experience. We spent around $50 not inlcuding tip. So, you can definitely share different plates because they aren't stingy with their portions! I highly suggest this place and on a nice sunny day, you can choose to sit out on the back patio!
Everything was delicious! I knew as soon as I walked in and smelled the place that I would love the food.   I must say, my Jerk Chicken Breast was the best meal at the table.  ;-)  My husband had the Red Snapper and that was super yummy too!  I definitely recommend this restaurant.  Especially since the parking garage is right across the street! I will be going back to re-visit this restaurant in the near future.
Went here for the first time and glad i made reservations because it is a must during Friday night or expect a 40+min wait!  I was seated right on schedule... Food: Jerk chicken was good and is loaded with jerk spice goodness! A little too much spice after comparing to the likes of primo patio and backyard...so it was definitely different. As for the oxtail...good as advertised!  It's pretty much a beef stew with some of the sweet baby Jesus goodness! LOL. Its recommended to get eat it with the corn festival but everytime I took a bite it tasted like a thick donut. Serving size is more than enough for 2-3 people. Rice n beans = yummy mon! I will definitely be back to try their other dishes...
Long wait, good sangria. Came with bobby c and friends many years ago,  I agree with his rating of three stars.
If you love Backayard but want a nicer neighborhood, eat here. More seating as well. Only complaint is that they do not add the fried plantains on the side for free like Backayard. (During lunch time at least.) You have to pay around $3.50, but you get a pretty decent sized bowl that at least four people can share.
Jerk Chicken Craze Just finished having the best skirt steak at NOLA's in Palo Alto but as my best friend and I walked back to the car we were suddenly immersed in the sound of reggae. We looked up at the name of the restaurant and read, "Coconuts." As Pacific Islanders this was a very catchy nomenclature. So we decided to go in and check it out despite our full stomachs; they had a bar!!! We sat at the bar to review the menu and realized that Coconuts was Caribbean food. The only Caribbean food I've ever had was Haitian in Miami. Delicious but not Hawaiian. So I couldn't tell at first if I'd come back to try Jamaican food. Oh well, the menu had two pages of tropical island drinks from rum concoctions to mojitos and reggae was playing. Robert, the bartender, recommended a drink with Dark Rum, Pineapple Juice, Cream of Coconut, OJ, and Freshly Grated Nutmeg. That first sip tasted like I slipped in a hammock, hanging between two coconut trees, with the ocean breeze in the distance. It was pure bliss.  Thanks for the suggestion Robert and next time we're trying the Scrouling Bird. Then Chef Emmanuel came out to greet the people. He made a joke that we brought food to his restaurant. (Leftover's from NOLAs.) He said next time we should try out their restaurant. So we told him we've never had Caribbean food before, and asked, what he'd recommend when we come back.. He said, "wait here I'll give you a taste of some Jerk Chicken wings." Sadly, the only Jerk chicken I knew was Buffalo Wild Wings'Caribbean Jerk, which happens to be my favorite flavor, LOL. So I thought it couldn't be bad, but when I tasted their Jerk Chicken I was taken aback, who knew chicken could be this good. In fact I might even have them start catering some of my events. I'm an event coordinator and I can't wait for my colleagues to try their food. Thanks Chef Emmanuel for introducing me to the best chicken ever, Jerk Chicken. We're definitely coming back.
Two days ago, me and my friends decided to try something new on our food chain. We heard from other friends that we should try eating Caribbean food. Upon arriving, we can tell that it was going to be hard to find parking, even though the restaurant wasn't crowded during this hour. Anyways, i tried the Jerk Salmon and Oxtail combo, and it was absolutely delicious. We told the waiter that it was our first time, and he decided to surprise us with an "on the house, fried banana". I definetly plan to go back again soon and try something new and even have a few drinks, YES! they have a Bar!
This place was amazing in every way! Service: amazing, friendly & informative Ambiance: Family friendly & warm Food: DELICIOUS!! My family and I tried this place for the first time, so since we were a large group we shared almost every dish on the menu & you could not go wrong! Every dish was better than the next!!  Goat curry hellz yah, Jerk Chicken yes please! Shrimp mos def! Plantains ALL MINE! & OXtail OH MAN!!  Will be back here asap!
Awesome! This place was great. Good food and good atmosphere. The waiter actually recommended we get one plate and share. He was right! The portion was huge and we had plenty. Lots of fun.
EEE! Okay, so I've only been here once (so far) but I give it a 5! Service was super nice, patient, and fast.. prices are fairly on the cheaper side, and the food is super flavorful and comes fast! I got the jerk chicken which was HELLA bombbb.. It was tender and packed with flavor.. I also liked the rice/beans it came with. It had some kinda flavor in it, not your typical plain white rice. BF got the five-hour braised oxtail (I think) which reminded me of a stew. Would be great for a cold day. Meat was S00PER tender. Judging from the plastic plates and the not-so-fancy decor, I woulda thought the food was meh, but it was soooo good. The drink menu all looked yummy too but maybe next time!
I thought the food and value were 3 stars, but the service dropped it down to 2. My fiance and I came here the other night for dinner.   We ordered the garbanzo avocado guacamole ($7.5) for a starter.    We were brought out a crab and avocado salad.   After we ascertained that they were in fact different things (both are green-ish mush with tostones on the side), we asked the waitress about it.  She said "crab and avocado salad, that's what you ordered."  I said "Sorry, that's not what we intended to order."  She got really stand-off-ish and said "Well, I repeated your order to you."  I told her sorry but I must have misheard or not understood her and she said, with a lot of attitude, "What do you want me to do about?"  I said "Well, we'd like the appetizer we tried to order."   She rolled her eyes but came back a few minutes later with the correct appetizer (plus her own spit addition, I can only presume).    The gaucamole was ok, a bit too cilantro-y for my tastes.  The tostones were pretty terrible.  They were too hard and dried out.   I've never had such a bad experience trying to send something back, even when it may have been my mistake.  Usually restaurants have the attitude that the customer is always right.   And it was clear that we weren't trying to take advantage of them, since we didn't eat the first appetizer. Our entrees were much better.  I had the jerk salmon ($16), which had a nice but not overwhelming kick to it, and was cooked pretty well (slightly overcooked).   My fiance liked his jerk pork ($14.50) as well, especially the french fry like things that came with it.   We also had a side of fried sweet plantains ($3.75), which were really good except for the fact that they were all charred and blackened (see http://www.yelp.com/biz_... ), which I hate.  This may be the normal way of serving plantains in the Caribbean, but its not the kind of plantains I'm used to from Cuban restaurants. Although our waitress's attitude got better after the appetizer incident, the service was still really slow.    We had a hard time getting our water glasses refilled, which is always important at a place that serves somewhat spicy food.   We are not huge fans of Back-A-Yard, the sister restaurant, but I think the food there is at least as good, cheaper, and you don't have to deal with the service issues because it's take-out, so I would rather go there than here in the future.
Looking for some sustenance in the middle of Christmas shopping at Stanford Shopping Center, I remembered searching up this place in Palo Alto. Not having many encounters with Caribbean cuisine, I decided to give Coconuts a shot. Parking was a hassle around weekday lunch-time, but after about 15 minutes of wandering through side streets and garages, a spot opened up about two blocks away. The dining room inside had the expected tropical theme that made me forget how chilly it was outside. I opted for the Braised Ox-tail (~$11.75?) which was very tender had loads of good flavor. Even for a lunch-size plate, the portions were pretty substantial, and included salad and rice and beans. My friend got the Curried Goat (~$10.75) which also had really good flavor. Being at a Caribbean restaurant, I had to get some Sweet Ripe Plantains ($3.75). This came as a generous portion, and had the perfect combination of sweetness and texture. My mom got excited when I told her about the Ox-tail, so I'll definitely be back to try out dinner here.
Aye. Every carnivorous being has a Caribbean in dem. You come to Coconuts and you eat jerk and you get FESTIVE. Squares are not welcome. Those who fancy ugly sweaters, hamburger hats and mismatched clothing or wild get-ups, you shall find your kind slamming some colourful spirits here. What was on my plate? Coconut encrusted shrimp, ribs, and pork jerk. Most appetizing of the three, de coconut shrimp and de potato cake sides that come with de ribs. Three star eating experience, four stars for appeal for de newcomer. Beercan.
As a vegetarian, I am always a bit leery of going to carribean joints.  After visiting a great place in Atlanta I figured - there has to be some veg options at a place in Palo Alto!  And I was not disappointed. Food: Delicious, loved the fries, dirty rice I think it was...was delicious and reminiscent of indian rajma rice.  Plantains were yummy and well flavored.  There was a tofu dish we got and that was just ok...probably not get that again. Drinks: I had a mojito and others got a smattering of other drinks.  Well they don't try to cheat you out of a good buzz here..the drinks were nicely potent. Ambiance is a mix of date/groups of friends/families so very easy vibe.  The staff was nice and very accomodating to our needs.  It was nice and next time I have to go back in the summer and try the outside seating!
Came for for lunch and ordered 2 combos and the sampler. The coconut shrimp in the sampler was really good.  The jerk chicken was kinda dry and salty. For the main courses, we had oxtail, curry goat, Jerk Chicken, and Jerk Salmon.  The jerk chicken and salmon were okay, not the best or worst, the oxtail was rich, my friend liked the curry goat. Overall, a good place to eat.
This place is packed all the time and requires reservations (for dinner, at least). I've been here twice.  The first time, I got the jerk salmon, which was really delicious.  I definitely recommend that (huge portions). The second time, a few of us shared some things.  The curried garbanzo avocado guacamole (served with plantain chips) was a highlight, though the portion was a bit smaller than I expected.  Love the sweet potato fries (though it took FOREVER to get them.  We were done with all our food and waiting for a while). So overall -- food is good, service is slow, place is packed.  Also, while it does have vegetarian items, it's not the most veggie-friendly establishment.  But that comes with the territory.
This place has improved SO MUCH since I was here last. The Chef's Sampler platter was delicious -- it comes with mini beef patties, fried akee wonton wrappers, jerk chicken, and coconut shrimp. I love the unique way that the akee was prepared. The jerk chicken had a nice blend and everything else was prepared just perfectly. The beef patties were a little on the doughy side but still very good. I got the curried shrimp and my BF got the curried goat. His curried goat was tender (and plentiful) which meant it was delicious. The curried shrimp was different but very good and I especially loved how it was paired with the plantains. Oh and I ended with the Caribbean coffee which was delicious.
Sorry. I was a wee bit disappointed with this place as their menu was seriously lacking. At first I... Read more 
Great little Caribbean joint. Had the following: Jerk Chicken 8/10 Sea Bass 9/10 Rice and Beans 5/10 Vegetables 7/10 Plantains 9/10 Nice waitress and good cocktails.
Went out on a date, it was a fun random place off university. A bit expensive but good. A ordered oxtail soup and curried goat. Both soups were thick and flavorful, and the meat fell off the bone. a plate of rice accompanies the thick soup well. 2 entrees and an appetizer, $50. After this i feel like eating Sweet tomatoes to balance off the meat.
Loved it. Just came back from the Carribean and was very impressed by the quality of food and drinks here. The chef even made it a point to come out and shake our hands and ask us how our dinner was. Will definitely be coming back.
authentic caribbean food at a reasonable price. Cocktails awesome ;) Don't be the designated driver if you are going.
Due to a tight budget and difficulties in our work schedule, my husband and I didn't go on a traditional honeymoon after our wedding last year. Over the course of a year, things have changed for the better in the finance department, so last weekend for our 1 year wedding anniversary, we decided to live it up (: We had a weekend long celebration, which ended with couples massages at Watercourse way, followed by dinner at Coconuts. If you can't have the tropical honeymoon, you can still have the Caribbean food and palm trees, right? The food was delicious. We shared a bunch of small plates: jerk chicken drumsticks, coconut shrimp, Caribbean vegetable salad, and collard greens. It was all absolutely yummy, especially the coconut shrimp, which we had to get a second order of. Our waitress was very attentive and friendly. She brought over pomegranate mojitos on the house when she heard it was our anniversary. The reviews are correct about the drinks by the way. They are extremely fresh and tasty, but seriously potent. This is never a bad thing, except in this case, my husband doesn't drink, and he thought it would be rude to send the drink back, so he encouraged, or rather taunted me like we were in a frat, to drink his in addition to mine. "Drink, drink" he'd encouraged as he lightly pounded his fist on the table. Oh my god. I know I should have said no, but I've been known to party, and hold my alcohol. After two of these drinks I was totally wasted! My husband just reminded me that I'd said when we got home in a drunken stupor, "Call Coconuts and ask them what they put in my mojitos!" Likely, a generous dose of rum (: So thanks, Coconuts for making our make-up honeymoon, and one year wedding anniversary a night to remember!
i used to park right in front of this place for years before i actually gave it a try.  it seemed from the outside somewhat tacky... Caribbean place called Coconuts?  I mean, how original is that? The inside is pleasant, but no frills.  But they really make up on it with the good.  Came here with a group of 5 for dinner, and we ordered a variety of dishes family style.  I have to say, almost everything was all amazing.  Really love the jerk chicken and the ox tail... literally falling off the bone and full of flavor.   Snapper was good as well.  Also got these corn fritters called "corn festival," which looked dubious but kept me fighting for the last piece.  Their sweet potato fries are some of the best I've had out here.  Their rice was a little lackluster, but hey, it's rice.  Unfortunately, I didn't even attempt the ribs. Cocktails were surprising.  You'd think they'd just have some run of the mill, uninspired, overly sugary drinks.  Instead, they actually get quite creative.  I'm  a sucker for cocktails with pepper in them.  And, lo and behold, they had a mango margarita with chili pepper mixed in.  it was exactly what I was looking for.
Wonderful!!!! Jerk chicken, plantains, red beans and rice, hush puppies are SOOO good!!! Family style decently priced per dish. Also the pomegranate mojito was very refreshing, not too sweet, most mojitos at restaurants are too sweet in my opinion, but not this one. Then you have to finish off the meal with a piece of pecan pie!! So good. The pie has the pecans chopped and pretty chunky throughout the pie, plus they add chocolate. Delicious!
I went to Back A Yard for the first time last month and to my surprise I liked the Caribbean food!  So when I heard that they have a nicer restaurant in Palo Alto, I did not hesitate to give it a try. I tried the Jerk Chicken (dark meat) and BBQ Ribs rice plate. The meats were good.  I still loved their rice and bean. But minus 1 star for not including the fried plantains on the rice plate like they did at Back A Yard. Also tried the Shrimp Arepas. The shrimps with that nice creamy sauce and soft onions were yummy!  But the arepas were on the tough side. So minus 1 star.  I almost wanted to ask them if I could get this next time with pasta instead of the arepas. And of course I got to have the Corn Festivals!  I didn't care that I was already stuffed at that point.  I had to have that plate of hot ugly looking fried corn doughy things.  Who needs American doughnuts if you can get these Corn Festivals! I will definitely return and try their oxtail (it was very good at Back A Yard), corn bread and other stuff.  Hopefully I will upgrade the rating next time.
We sat a t the bar because it was too busy to get a table without a reservation, but the food was great and the drinks were strong. Loved the coconut shrimp, jerk chicken and the sauces were delish!
Food was ok, my problem is with the owner, at least I believe it was the owner. A women who seemed to be in charge. Granted we did not have reservations so when we asked for a vacant two seat table that I saw away from the traffic she told us it was to be used to make a larger table shortly. We decided to sit outside and she said fine. We sat down and after a few minutes, because it was cold, asked if they could turn on the outside heater, but alas it did not work (wish they told use before we sat outside). We asked nicely if we could move back inside, and the table we saw before was still empty but no dice on that one. She was upset we had moved back in ....so we sat in traffic. But here is the rub, 2 minutes later she sat two people at the table that she said was to be combined to accommodate a larger party. On the way out I asked about it...she told me it was none of my business. Guess she will will not be getting my business again either.
My current favorite restaurant for Jamaican cuisine and ambiance. The restaurant is moderate in size with walls dividing more of the bar with some casual tables with the main eating area. The walls are painted with bright Caribbean-esque colors and playful decor. The background music is always laid back with a strong Caribbean vibe. Service here is pretty good, where the wait staff is pretty attentive, friendly, and helpful in giving you their opinions of different dishes to try. Also, a couple of the 5+ times I've been here already, the chef came out and talked with me and my friends and made sure we were happy-- which I thought was very nice. Both times I had friends, but once was with a small group of maybe 3-4 and the other time was with a large group of about 8. The food here is sooo awesome. Everything is very flavorful and dishes are definitely memorable. Also, since I've frequented this restaurant enough times during happy hour and dinner times, I've noticed that ordering the same dish doesn't necessarily mean you'll get the SAME dish (aka identical plating and items on your plate). I'd have to say, I don't mind that at all... I think it's unique, and keeps things fresh. But I could see how that might bug some people who like consistency. However, I personally like it, and have enjoyed all the variations I've gotten to try. I'd also like to note an example of a variation I've seen on a plate. One example is when I've ordered the jerk pork on a couple of occasions. One time I received the rice as a side, the other time I received their (what I believe to be) caramelized yucca root/fries on the side. Also, I haven't personally tried the drinks at the bar, but from what I've seen, they offer interesting drink combinations that sound really good. And from the friends I've brought here and have tried drinks at the bar, they were very happy with what they got. Warning: Most dishes are fairly spicy. So if you have a hard time with spicy food, this place may be a challenge for you. Dishes that I really love here so far: *Jerk pork dish *Jerk pork bites (good if you're a light eater, good for happy hour) *Sweet potato pudding (comes in a form resembling a slice of cheesecake. Nice to finish off a meal if you have a sweet tooth)--topped with this heavenly sweet rum/raisin(?) sauce *Corn festival (tastes like a non-glazed, plain, very lightly sweetened doughnut)---it's such a simple side dish, but it's somehow really addictive with the slight bit of sweetness, lightly crisped exterior, and chewy insides. *Roasted vegetables (so good!) *Plantains (nice and sweet)
The food is great. We had Jerky Chicken and Short Ribs. It is a noisy and fun place. The restaurant is a little cozy, but it goes well with the atmosphere. We made a reservation but they could not seat us for a while. We got complimentary appetizers and wine. We very much appreciated it. The bar area is small, but you can have food there too. Definitely check it out - loved the food.
Yummmmm!  After going to Jamaica, I crave caribbean food every now and then.  Although the food in the bay isn't comparable to the authentic food, this place is pretty good for the price. What we loved: *Appetizer Sampler: comes with patty (meat filled pastries), jerk wings, crab toast and creamy curry dip.  I especially loved the jerk wings, theyve got a good kick to it! *Jerk Chicken: very tender and tasty - good if you like spicy *Braised Oxtail: fall-off the bone goodness.  The sauce is great too. *Mahi mahi: surprisingly moist, very well cooked. *Rice and Beans: good, but nothing too special *Brown Rice: yummmy! I think they add some sort of buttery sauce to it, probably the best brown rice I've ever had What I'd skip: *Kiwi colada: we saw this on the yelp site and it looked so delicious that we had to try.. definitely a let down.. The portions were surprisingly large and all the entrees are family style here.  I liked the service, our waitress was really nice.  Oh, and the bathroom was very clean - always a telltale sign of good management!
Vegetarian Burger + Avocado + Jerk tofu = Awesomeness! nuff said
Like it but don't really love it. There are a couple good dishes but not everything are excellent. I like the jerk salmon and the curried goat. The rest of the dishes were too heavy or didn't have the right texture. Given the very limited options when it comes to Caribbean food it is not hard to understand why this place is always quite busy. I like the ambiance but the service could be slightly lacking during weekend prime dinner hours. The restaurant is quite lively and it is a great place to hangout with friends. The seats are not that comfortable though. If you expect a more laid back place, Coconuts might not be the right choice.
The Curry Goat is AMAZING!! I lived in Hartfors,CT for a while and had A LOT of Caribbean Food and loved it, but when i came back to CA i just couldn't find me some good Curry Goat. So i heard about COCONUTS..i was SOLD ..not only are the servers friendly: the cook amnd manager are always around to see how everything is going. BEST PLACE FOR CARIBBEAN FOOD! Just wished they made me some boiled dumplings and corn beef !!
Hands down; best Caribbean food in the valley. If you've traveled to any one of the beautiful islands in the Caribbean, you'll undoubtedly remember "peas & rice". And boy, does this place deliver. Classically spiced with gently roasted kidney beans, it's a delight each and every time I eat there (which is now about once a week...it's a top choice for my company's team on our restaurant day). Of course, it's called "beans & rice" but it's there. As far as "di big tings" we have tried the jerk chicken, pork, salmon, and ox tail. The chicken is still our favorite and, if I had to order to impress someone, I'd order it first. The other things are good, mostly because the jerk sauce is so tasty, but nothing compares to the tender dark meat you get with the half chicken. The breast meat is good too though it tends to be less moist. Sides? Well other than beans & rice, try the collard greens. They are gently sauteed (or maybe steamed) and then served in a mildly spicy, slightly sweet sauce. The cornbread is authentic and tasty, the plantains are a sweet treat. You're going to need to go more than once to try all of these "tings". But that's ok. You'll want to go back after your first visit. Stop reading and go eat there.
The food here is similar to Back-a-Yard in Menlo Park since they have the same chef and recipes... Get the Jerk Chicken and Pork Combo with rice and beans for the Lunch special!!! B O M B! ! ! It gets crowded for lunch!!! It's a cool place but the service sucks ( fill in the blank )!!! The waitress never came back to get us refills, to check up on us, or to give us our check!!! Boooo!!! And she didn't even thank us for coming!!! Make a trip to Menlo Park, their service is better...
Decided to opt for something different for lunch with a buddy one day... We ended up ordering the 2 item combo lunch plates and tried all the 4 different kinds of meat. Salmon: Not too dry, the sauce definitely makes up for it. Good but not great. Pork: nice thick slices, and was pretty good... Chicken: we got the dark meat which didn't taste like your normal bbq marinade (in a good way). Skin was crisp and meat was juicy. Oxtail: This was something I had to try due to the rave reviews... they were spot on. It comes served in a small bowl, like a broth. Soup was good and the meat was really tender. We also got the plantains which was pretty good and served in a generous amount. I can't vouch for the rice/beans as I opted for white rice. Parking wasn't too bad and the place was pretty empty on a late weekday lunch. Definitely a great spot to try different tastes and I'm planning a visit soon with the wife and baby.
Aaron the manager was the best. He made my boyfriends party magical. I loved the food, and the prices weren't bad at all. I had the chef platter with beef patties, coconut shrimp, jerk chicken. It was the best! And all 35 of my quest loved there food:) I will definatley come back.
Thanks to Connie C. I had a blast here at Coconuts Caribbean since I would have never otherwise found this cute little spot. One of my best memories of Caribbean food was in Seattle at this little spot that was so similar to coconuts so I definitely appreciated the hospitality and the atmosphere. The wait staff is extremely friendly and the food service is fast! They sat our party immediately and we all ordered to our hearts desires. Interestingly enough, Connie insisted on the oxtail which I've had terrible experiences with but upon actually trying out their oxtail it was pretty amazing. I have to say it was one of the best meals I've had in a long time involving a not so common animal part! I recommend this place for a relaxing, flavorful meal since their lamb was also out of this world and everything was most definitely delicious!
First time eating Caribbean food. Shared a few "big ting" dishes with a group of friends. We got the jerk chicken, ox tail, and curried goat. My favorite was the chicken because it had so much flavor. The ox tail and curried goat meat were soft, moist, and flavorful. We also got sides of vegetables, collared greens, and beans and rice. The collared greens were kind of sour and I didn't really like it. Rice and beans were a good side to eat with all the different types of meat. The waiter was also nice enough to give us the side called "corn festival" because we were hesitant to try it. It basically was what he told us, like a fried doughnut. It was so good! It was doughy and chewy and went great with our food. We sat outside where there were heat lamps and a light up fake coconut tree. Food was delicious for the first time trying it and service was great.
Still an awesome alternative if you are in Palo Alto downtown.  Great food and vibe. BUT let me make this simple Back-A-Yard is still THE ONE...THE MAN! (even though they are sister restaurants)
This is my first experience at a Carribean restaurant, so I don't have much to compare to, other... Read more 
Always wanted to try the fancier version of "Back-A-Yard", finally got a chance to go~ Like the interior, nothing fancy, but make me feel relax and happy~ Jerk chicken and jerk pork have always been my love.  I tried to try something different, but really couldn't go without jerk chicken, so I decided to get the dinner special with jerk chicken and curry shrimp, which was really really yummy! The jerk chicken tastes even better and more tender than "Back-A-Yard", a bit more pricey, but still reasonably cheap and with better environment, faster serving, it definitely worth that couple more bucks. Good spot for friend get-together!
Had the jerk chicken and braised oxtail.  Really really yummy.  Service was fast and attentive although it would have been nice to have my alcoholic drinks before my meal arrived. Braised oxtail was tender, juicy, and flavorful. Jerk chicken had a nice kick and was delicious.
Jerk chicken is awesome
I came here with my bf and his relatives from out of town.  The bf has come here fairly often during lunch hour so we thought we'd try out their dinner service.  I'd never had Caribbean food before and was pleasantly surprised by the fun, Caribbean ambiance from the beach paintings on the walls and the Tiki bar. The place was a little loud for my taste because I could scarcely hear any conversation across the table. The food, however, was really yummy and each entree had at least a touch of spiciness... which was a lot spicier than the typical Delawarian restaurant for the out-of-towners I was with.  The restaurant's entrees were served family style and we had jerk salmon, jerk chicken, the night's special, red snapper, and sides of coconut fried shrimp and plantains.  You HAVE to try the jerk chicken, it's their specialty and the sides were my favorite parts of the meal. Overall, everything was very flavorful and has definitely turned me onto Caribbean food.  However, I wouldn't recommend this place if you're looking for a quiet or formal meal because it's pretty loud, dimly lit and the waiters are super friendly but don't mind interrupting the conversation with a joke or two.
I came here with a party of 5 around 6pm on a weekday and there was no wait. The outdoor patio is clean, open and private, but we opted to sit inside. Happy hour ends at 6:30pm, so we were able to get some appetizers for $4 each! Definitely a steal. Since the dishes are family style, we all picked an entree dish to share, which was an awesome idea since I really, really hate eating one type of thing. Jerk chicken wings (x8) - crispy, moist, seasoned well, especially loved the dipping sauce! drools Pork bites (x3) - slow cooked pork on Caribbean bakes with salsa, so satisfying and delicious! Six-hour braised Oxtail - great portions, extremely tender Curried goat -  super flavorful, also very tender, this was a favorite! Boneless jerk pork - moist, crispy, also came with sweet potato fries! These fries were coated with something candy-like. Delicious! Shrimp cobb salad - the shrimp was crispy and the corn was good Special of the day: jerk chicken and curry shrimp with black bean rice, veggies and plantains - oh the plantains! It's like having dessert and dinner at the same time. They were sweet, soft inside and crispy on the outside. These disappeared before my eyes! The chicken was full of flavor and fell off the bone. However, I thought the black bean rice was just okay. Coconuts definitely switches things up the usual Asian, Mexican, American foods out there. The staff was super helpful and friendly. The ambiance is Caribbean-like with the colorful walls, trees and music. If you want something different, give them a try.
For a living I travel to the Caribbean and when I get home I am always craving something new that I tried but could never have it back at home until....... COCONUTS! Since coming back from Jamaica in January I have been back to this place so many times! If I am looking for fried plantains (their version of French Fries) and Rum Punch, I ask to be seated in the back patio that has Caribbean music playing and for that moment the sense of the Caribbean. Have you heard of Jamaican Jerk? You definitely have to try the jerk ribs! I was so amazed how identical it was to that of Jamaica's that I needed to meet the chief and sure enough after meeting him I knew that this was definitely work of a local, "Ya' Mon".... Never been to the Caribbean, not a problem because "Every little thing go'in to be alright" when you go to Coconuts. See you soon :)
This place is amazing. Caribbean food at its best FYI. Back a Yard in Menlo Park is run by the same owner, but this location is much nicer. Just thinking about all the awesome food on the menu makes me wish they had a restaurant by my house - jerk pork, jerk chicken, braised oxtail, fried plantains, sweet potato fries...it's all so good. One of my favorites is the jerk pork panini. The waitstaff is always very friendly and attentive. It can get really busy during lunch and dinner so make reservations if you are coming with a group larger than 4. And the outside seating is a great place to escape work for a lunch break.
Went here last night to celebrate my fiance's brother's birthday. I wasn't sure what to expect but was pleasantly surprised that it was very good. This is what we ordered. We were a party of 5. The dishes are family style. Starters: -Caesar salad: Basic. It had a lot of cheese on it making it a tad bit salty Entrees: -Half Jerk Chicken: The meat was so tender and juicy. The spices were great. It was a little spicy but not too spicy. -Curry Prawns: The spices are definitely different than a Thai curry or an Indian curry. We all enjoyed this dish very much because not only were there prawns in dish but there were green beans and onions. They served it with 4 large slices of fried plantains which complemented it well. -BBQ Chicken and Half Ribs: Love the ribs! The ribs were very tender, the meat fell right off of the bone. I would have expected the tamarine bbq sauce to be tart but it wasn't at all. The bbq chicken wasn't as tender as the jerk chicken. Sides: -Sweet potato fries: always good -Fried ripe plantains: So good. These are on the sweeter side but it matched perfectly with the spiciness of the Jerk Chicken. -Corn Festival: This is actually fried dough that tastes like corn. So yummy!!! It's super crispy on the outside but nice and soft on the inside. This is a great pairing with the curry. -Rice and Beans: More dirty rice than beans. There were not that many actual beans in our rice. Dessert: -Carrot Cake: This one is on the lighter side for sure, the frosting isn't the usual cream cheese thick super sweet frosting. The cake part wasn't super moist but wasn't dry either. I'd probably order the key lime pie next time, that's what I wanted first. -Coconut creme brulee: This was surprisingly light and not too sweet. It was good so it sucked that they only filled the dish with the custard about a 1/4 of an inch. Cocktails: -Sangria Pitcher: Not bad. They put tons of fruit inside of their carafes. -Guava mixed drink: This was very good. *They have a lot of fun mixed cocktails. The type that you expect to really drink on the islands. They had the perfect potency, not watered down. I plan to come back and try some more things out! Restrooms: They have one bathroom for women and one bathroom for men. The women's bathroom was clean and stocked.
Came here tonight for dinner with my bf-made a reservation last minute on Open table and had no problem getting seated on time. The atmosphere here is energetic and loud and fun for groups. I ordered the jerk chicken with rice and beans and a side of mac and cheese. My meal was just ok- it came out very fast which was nice, however the chicken was way to spicy for my taste. I wanted to taste more flavor but all I tasted was spice! The mac and cheese was also kind of plain. Service here was ok- at times it was hard to flag down a waiter to refill our waters. Would return again but definitely try something else on the menu.
4.5 stars.  Came here with a bunch of friends.  Large party of 9. Came in at 7:30ish on Sunday.  It was about half full of patrons.  We were seated in the back area where I guess their office is.  Kinda weird as the chef was in the back working on something and he and the employees were constantly going back and forth to that room. My friend was really excited to have me try this place out.  i've been meaning to try Caribbean food but there really isn't much in SoCal when it comes to good Caribbean food.  This was a great first experience for me. We ordered a few cocktails and a pitcher of mojito.  The cocktail was good.  I would say too good.  In a bad way.  If that makes sense.  Bad because I barely tasted alcohol and I'm assuming it was just pretty weak on alcohol.  I ordered the Bahama-mama.  The mojito was okay as well. For the appetizers, we ordered two orders of jerk chicken, coconut shrimp, and pork bites. The jerk chicken was really good.  It was tender and amazingly juicy.  Combined with the jerk sauce -- simply amazing. The pork bites were also good.  The pork is cut into small cubes and cooked.  It was then put over some crispy pastry.  The crisp was perfect which resulted in the world's most perfect texture mindfuck.  Crisp and juicy, tender meat. The coconut shrimp was okay.  It was cooked well (not overcooked like many places) and rolled into probably a tempura and coconut shaving mixture then deep fried. For the sides we ordered the brown rice, rice and beans, corn festival, and fried plantains. The brown rice was amazing.  I was expecting just plain simple steamed brown rice.  But it was more of a risotto textured brown rice.  It was sweet and really creamy. Rice and beans were forgetful... not bad, not good. Corn festival was really sweet and worked well to absorb a lot of the sauces that came with the entrees. Fried plantains are as you'd expect as well.   A bit on the greasy side. As far as the entrees... we ordered the oxtail, the jerk salmon, curried chicken, shrimp creole, and chicken crab pilau. The  oxtail was amazing.  Braised and wonderfully seasoned.  Also, it didnt have excessive fat chunks that you get oftentimes when you order oxtail.  Great soaked up with the corn festival or over the brown rice. The jerk salmon was also great.  Perfectly cooked with a wonderful sauce.  The veggies served with it was great and it came with a ton of chick peas.  I freaking love chick peas. Curried chicken was great also.  Not much that differentiates it, but it was really good.  Also good with the corn festival. The shrimp creole was ok.  Sauce was missing a little wham.  It was served with a smashed plaintain.  eh. The chicken crab pilau was very good.  Very, very well seasoned.  Tender chicken. So good.  It competes with the oxtail as my favorite item, followed by the jerk salmon. One thing that really bugged me throughout the night was the server.  At first she was great.  Until we ordered our entrees.  She noted that 5 entrees was not a lot for 9 people.  She told us that it wasn't going to be enough unless we all eat very little.  Woman, please.  I am a pretty big eater, and I was stuffed after dinner.  We did kill everything collectively, but we were all pretty damn full.  It wouldnt have bugged me much, but she kept coming in hoping we'd order more.  I dunno if she wanted more tip, or if she was related to the owner (she was the only server with a Caribbean accent so it's quite possible).  One of my friends mentioned it was great service because they kept checking up on us.  Eh, I truly believe there were ulterior motives. Anyway, it was really good food.  $28/person after tax and tip.  Give it a try, you won't regret it.
The food is great. Try the jerk sauce based dishes. You can't go wrong there. Also try the mango passion on a summer day.
Make reservations for dinner... I recommend the roasted sea bass. A seafood recommendation is rare for me as I am pretty picky about fish. This dish is cooked to perfection and won't disappoint! I ordered a side of sweet plantains and dumped them in to absorb the delicious sauce. Bottom line: Good food and so-so wait staff. I would go again...
THIS FOOD IS NOT AUTHENTIC, and the old waitress couldn't stop flirting with my friend, just because he laid on his Jamaican accent (he grew up in NY!).  What if we were on a date? (We weren't, but still, that was rude & out of order) Of course, he got king treatment.  They gave him everything on the house and only charged him half price for his meal, and the cook came and asked HIM -- not me -- how everything was.  Wait a second, I'm just as Jamaican as he is, and I had just come from the island (but I don't ever put on a show, with the accent...sorry, I'm not here to entertain).  We were only there because I felt homesick, and needed some good food and a good dancehall... When my food came out, it was supposed to be curry chicken, not curry water with a lonely half cooked drumstick!  I was so far from pleased, it was ridiculous.  And it was a la carte (nothing is a la carte in Jamaica!) Now, his feast:  he got escevich fish (which the waitress called seviche...a Mexican version).  His dish "included" rice & peas, a bowl of plantains, & greens...  hmmm...wow.  Everyone in the restaurant wanted to know what he thought of the food.  I swear, 5 people came to ask him how everything was...and not a soul cared for my opinion.  He told them all that it was great, but when I tried a bite, I was not impressed (neither was he, apparently, but he didn't want to be rude/honest).  The escevich, we both agreed, tasted like they deep fried the fish and poured straight vinegar on it, with a garnish.  Escevich is supposed to be pan fried! I'm frustrated that these people are serving up crap and calling it Jamaican, thereby misrepresenting my culture!  All these other reviews saying they had good this and that...how can you know if you never had the real thing?  Go where Jamaicans go, then come back and see if Coconut's bland, poorly cooked food compares...it won't.
Pitcher of red sangria to start off.  Ok, cool. Fast, attentive service and very friendly wait staff.  I followed the suggestion of fellow yelpers about the jerk chicken wings.  So glad I did because they were a godsend.  I wish more came in an order, or that we could just order multiple plates.  I can't quite remember what other entrees we ordered but I sure remember they were yum. So quick word of advice... If you're looking to try something new and spunky, give this place a shot.  I'm happy I did!
I picked this place for a surprise date night with my boyfriend, I didn't tell him where we were going but gave him directions. Luckily there was an underground garage right across the street. We walked in and they found my reservation on open table right away. We were then seated at a small 2 person table. OMG, the corn bread was soooo good! The place had such character, the music and the atmosphere. From where we sat, we could see the Sharks playing on the bar tv. We got the braised ox tail, sweet potato fries, plantains and the pork bites. All the food was so good. It reminds me of my cruise to the Bahamas about a year ago.
Cute fun place. Great drinks. Love the plantain chips. My fave is the curry shrimp! A little grungy. Would love to not have sticky menus & tables. Great otherwise!
Boss took us here to celebrate starting at IMVU and it was delish! Since we had a group of 6, we went family-style and ordered a whole bunch of things: - jerk chicken: moist and spicy, bone-in - ox tail: came in a stew, the ox tail was weeeird - too much bone, but the accompanying lima beans and veggies were delightful - goat: also in a stew but with less cool beans(hah) and a little chewy, but still pretty solid - shrimp: came with little wafers and spicy tomato-based sauce. So good! - rice and beans: highly spoken for by one of our web designers, and sooo good! Very different from Mexican rice and beans, these are mixed together and spiced. Oh.. and mojitos... but I'd rather not mention it because for the rest of the work day I was paranoid I was acting drunk. Pro-tip: come here a little early and avoid the wait for a table at lunch!
After getting married in Jamaica and experiencing what their food has to offer, it was only appropriate we make our way to Coconuts in PA after hearing good things from friends.  And yes, I know what you're thinking, if we got married in Jamaica we probably stayed at a resort and were served buffet food amongst the other hordes of pale whities with their fanny packs and socks with sandals decor.  NO.  Not to brag, but we stayed at houses, had local chefs prepare our meals daily based on what was fresh and what we wanted.  I say this only because the menu at Cononuts was every bit as authentic as what we had in Jamaica (plantains, festival, jerk pork/chicken, etc.), including the very stiff cocktails. Despite the fact it is funny to be eating Jamaican food while being accompanied by steel drum music in Palo Alto, this place is legit.
The flavors prompted me to visit this place again. I decided to play safe and avoided ordering the pelau, ordered the mutton curry with some brown rice instead. This place seriously managed to surprise me! I mean, we ordered a simple bowl of brown rice, how difficult is it to get this dish right? The brown rice like the pelau we ordered last time was floating in fat, I am not sure what fat it was, could have been oil, butter, animal grease. The excess fat sets always manages to get my tummy upset. Definitely not visiting this place again :(
We decided to visit this place after reading all the good yelp reviews. We ordered the chef's... Read more 
Had the pork bites and chicken jerky entree. The pork bites was the appetizer and it was amazing, more amazing than my jerk chicken entree. The chicken was extremely dry and that alone ruined the dish. I will give this place another chance...
Went here for our Wednesday Lunch Club (WLC) 1st year anniversary. I tried the curried chicken lunch special. It was pretty tasty and more like tropical Caribbean flavors compared to Indian curry chicken dish. I also had a piece of a friend's curried lamb dish and it was complementary to the chicken. Overall, the service was quick, the food was good, the price was decent ($10-15 for lunch specials) and the WLC lunch company was AWESOME!! Happy One Year Anniversary WLC!!! Bon Appetit!!!
Went there for lunch almost by accident and what a good surprise! Staff was very nice. We tried a few cocktails that were too easy to drink. Food was very tasty: I had the goat curry (recommended by our waitress) and it was really good. Excellent balance of spices and tender meat - better than other goat curries I had before (goat sometimes has that huh strong goaty flavor). My date had jerk pork, a little spicy and had the right texture (a little crunchy) with some definition given by the sauce. Rice+beans side - can't go wrong there. I am mouth watering as I write this so I am going to stop now. Definitely will find my way back there sometimes!
I've only been here twice but the food is great. We had coconut shrimp, pasta, jerk chicken, plantains, collard greens, and sweet potato fries. It is best to go family style here so everyone has a chance to try their variety of dishes. This is definitely my go-to place when I am in the mood for Caribbean food :)
Jerk chicken appetizer = yum, salty with a spicy kick Braised oxtail = double yum, super tender... it's a good idea to order a sidedish with this entree (we got rice with beans) Jerk pork = yum, but my favorite part was the sweet potato sides it came with... so good! Also, they have happy  hour Tue-Sat until 6:30!! $4 on select appetizers (including jerk chicken wings) and $4 well drinks, beer, and wine.
There's outdoor seating... until it starts to rain on you. They eventually put us into the party room, communal style. I'm smart enough to pick the far side seating, that way other customers arent crawling over us to their tables. The jerk chicken wings is AWESOME. I could keep eating it, but I'd go broke. The BBQ meat is so so.
The pork bites are great. For an appetizer that lists mango, you get like two teaspoons worth. The... Read more 
First time to try Caribbean food and it's safe to say I'd return! FOOD: Jerk Chicken - I don't know if it was just my plate, but the chicken we ordered was dry. VERY SPICY - but good kind of spicy. It's topped with sweet/spicy tomatoes and crunchy skinny potato strips. I wish my plate had more of these toppings because it was really good with the chicken (then again, I'm a veggie lover). I guess I'd order this again, but to be honest, dry chicken is not impressive. The flavors were great though. Stewed Oxtail - My FAVORITE of the night! Mmmm, it was full of spice and flavor. Very tender! The meat fell right out of the bone and mixed with the stew sauce - I'm salivating! GET THIS. Curried Goat - Eh. Maybe I didn't try this enough when we ordered (I was kind of occupied with the chicken and cow), but it was okay. I don't eat goat, but I was willing to try it. My friend said that it tasted like chicken, so I don't know if that's a good thing, considering goat should be gamey. Lots of flavor, but not much of a standout. Rice & Beans - Must order with the main dishes. Perfect blend! The beans were really good. Don't expect large bowls of the oxtail or goat. It's just right, but if you're expecting huge (because of the price), you may be disappointed. The jerk chicken was plentiful though. SERVICE: Outstanding. I love the guy who served us. He was really nice and honest. Checked my table all the time. Made sure we enjoyed the food. He even thanked us for coming to the restaurant. Food came out quick too, which was surprising. I wanna come back and try the other dishes! But I'll always get the oxtail. :)
So-So.  A bit on the salty side for me.  I am a picky eater so it could be just me thoough. They had live music last evening and it was so loud that we could not even had a conversation.  Food was okay with average cost per person of $30.  Will I go back?  Probably not.  For that price, there are way too many (better) options for me. ... I am trying to write more for you in this review but I could not think of anything else cause there isn't anything great nor bad to right about.  So here you go Yelpers.
I don't think I've eaten Caribbean food before. But if I ever go, I know what to look forward to. OK...sooooo...I am allergic to Coconuts. SAD, I KNOW! Why did I eat here?! :) Luckily not everything on the menu is made with coconuts. The host, Mike (I believe) was well accommodating (and funny) to let us know which dishes contained coconuts. I had lunch here with some friends and ordered the chef sampler platter, which consists of empanada looking things, rolls, wings, crab dip, some type of tangy dip and coconut island dip. I loved the empanadas and the crab dip. I think the crab dip was made with some curry type. Really good! We also ordered the Jerk chicken, curry chicken, corn bread, coconut mixed bean & rice (I did not try this one). The chickens were really delicious. I like curry and anything spicy. The jerk chicken was tender that it easily peeled off the bone. Everything was delicious. We even met one of the chefs. He was cool. If you're ever in Palo Alto, this is the place to check out & try.
Highlights: -happy hour pork bites are amazing!! -jerk chicken wings are saucy and good Cons: -their happy hour is short. -drink specials are limited -seems to be a fusion spot, and if you're a purest like me, it's a little disappointing Overall: It's close, relatively inexpensive and does the job when I'm missing being home in Jamaica
Get: Mixed place with Beef Oxtail and Jerk Chicken, Festival, Kiwi Colada Co-co-nuts! Co-co-nuts! If anyone remembers Coconuts' old website, then you know what I'm singing. I love their sister restaurant Back-a-yard over in East Menlo Park but Coconuts is a great place to get the same food in a slightly nicer setting (University Ave). I've come here for lunch and dinner a few times now and always get the same thing, and I suggest you do the same. You can't go wrong with their jerk chicken, and the oxtail falls off the bone. Get an order of festival (fried doughy goodness) for the table, or just for yourself ;). Their kiwi colada is also one of my favorite drinks, but that's because I'm girly and love pina coladas. And getting caught in the rain.
I really recommend the jerk cheeseburger.  Although, I think everything on the menu is great. I would have given this place five stars, but sometimes the service is a little slow.  I went today and it was great though.
What can I say that hasn't already been said about Coconuts Caribbean Restaurant?  I went with a very large group and I think everyone was fairly happy with what they ordered.  However, I think the star of the night was the Six Hour Braised Oxtail.  Seriously, this should be the very first Di Big Tings item you order. You won't be disappointed. Other honorable mentions: - The side of brown rice I ordered was more like a risotto (which wasn't bad, but not what I expected) - Jerk Wings are packed with flavor and a great transition into your main course - Yummy mojitos!  (I hear the sangria isn't bad either since the group went though 5-6 pitchers) I can't wait to go back!
We've been wanting to eat  here for a long time, and finally did last weekend. Since we were meeting another couple, and i heard this place gets busy, I made a reservation on opentable. They seated us when we arrived, which is always appreciated. ( I know a lot of places won't seat you until your whole group is there.) We all had some fun drinks, some were better than others. I found the white sangria to be a little weak. We shared the mini patty sampler, which was tasty, but not as amazing as it sounded. Between the 4 of us we had: braised oxtail, jerk chicken, jerk pork bites, and the chicken crab pelau. We also had an order of cornbread, which we had to send back since the bottom of the muffins were black,. It was replaced quickly, and was pretty good. The oxtail wasn't really for me, a little too much fat, and i had the same issue with the jerk pork. Although, the jerk chicken was good, and i liked the chicken crab pelau. My biggest complaint was that I thought the crab in the pelau would be out of the shell. It wasn't ,and was REALLY messy. The sweet potatoes that came with the pork were really good too. Our friends have eaten at Back A Yard several times, and seemed to think that the food there was a bit better, and cheaper too. Prices were pretty reasonable though, especially for Palo Alto. I liked my food, but wasn't blown away by any one dish. I would still like to go to Back A Yard at some point though,and would return here if someone else wanted to go.
Sat night dinner with my two girls in my life, first thing this place is tight. And alittle loud but that's OK not a big deal. Didn't have to wait for our table, which was nice we were late by 15 mins. we sat by the back door to the patio, table for 4. Service, first thing the guy with the hangover needed a shave. We ordered a sangria, Red stripe and a mixed drinks. All good and cold, no apps. I ordered the oxtail stew, also the jerk chicken salad, the jerk salmon and steak. Now the jerk chicken is spicy so watch out, mine stew was a little greasy but OK, the salmon was done just right all good there. Also a Cesar salad. The salad needed more of a punch. Steak was also good. Overall I liked this place and will go back they have a bar and outdoor seating. The mens room was clean this is a plus. I say when in need of a "jerk" check them out!
Good place, great food! The oxtail lunch plate is delish! I will definitely visit this place again :) Oh, and they have this nicely painted wall which is great for group picture! =)
This place was very flavorful but very fattening. I saw the layer of grease just sitting on my goat dish. I also ordered the ox-tail with rice and beans. Like I said, the flavors were definitely a winner but this is a very heavy meal. So get ready to exercise after this meal. I love the ambiance here and it's a really cool place to grab drinks.
I honestly wanted to love this place, but sadly it was not meant to be.  I went with a couple of girlfriends and we ordered the Jerk Wings [supposedly their must have], sweet potato fries, rum glazed mahi mahi & chicken crab pelau. 1. The jerk chicken was tender but it was SO BLAND.  The saving grace of the dish was the sauce which had a nice kick to it. 2. The fries didn't do much for me...meh....nothing great about it but nothing horrible either. 3. DO NOT order the rum glazed mahi mahi.  It looked like frozen food and tasted like frozen food heated up.  The mahi looked like chunks of frozen chicken. 4. The pelau was soggy and i ended up just putting ketchup in it to season it. I would not come back because the food wasn't good and the service sucked.  She got our order wrong TWICE.  We wanted the Pelau and she brought out plantains; she said to keep the plantains "on the house."  We get our bill and she charged us for it so we had to bring it up with the hostess and the hostess took care of it because our server "forgot" that she said it was on the house.
Went here tonight for a late dinner. For dinner most of the dishes are family style and don't include beans/rice or plantains. We ordered the ox tail, jerk chicken, plantains, roasted veggies, rice and beans, and their special fish of the day (this was actually an individual plate so it came with sides). The ox tail meat literally fell off the bone. It was spicy but really tender. The sauce paired great with the rice and beans. I ordered a really delicious kiwi colada to cool down the heat from the ox tail. The chicken was good but not the best (I prefer Back-A-Yard for chicken). The fish was okay too but i'm not a huge fan of fish. Next time i'll try the jerk pork! Service is also excellent! The waiters know how to make people feel welcome :)
I went here with a few of my friends for dinner, and the food was delicious! It was a little on the pricey side, but the coconut shrimp was amazing! The waiter suggested a Raspberry Hurricane that was the drink of the day - I do not adivse you taking the waiters up on their suggestions. It was a great drink - but when we looked at the check and saw that 2 were 24 together, we agreed it was NOT worth 12 dollars. Other than that, it was worth the money. I'd definitely go back.
Good for large groups and drinking, not for food. :/ We were looking forward to going here for a few weeks.  We always drove past it and tonight finally decided to go in. As the other reviews has stated it is Faux-macain (Fake Jamacain).  What I love about Jamacain is the spices and rich flavors. For me, Coconuts is flat.  My wife and I agree - they need to be on Restaurant Impossible.  Their menu needs to be saved.  Help us Robert!  The fries tasted frozen, the collard greens tasted like the cooking oil, the polenta cakes had no flavor.  SO FLAT!!! I wanted to like the place, I just couldn't.  The decor is poorly executed, the food lackluster.  On a positive note the service was great (probably because they knew they had to make up for the bad food) and prices are reasonable.
Our service was really great.  Our waiter didn't forget about us once even though we requested to sit outside because it was SO FREAKING LOUD inside.  I normally don't complain about noise, but it was so loud I couldn't think (wow, don't I sound like a mom?). I had the Tun Cornmeal Cakes.  They weren't bad, but they weren't good.  When I think of Jamaican food I think of flavor.  They just weren't exciting.  Such a fun idea too.  But lacking spice entirely.  We also ordered sweet potato fries, and they tasted like they had been frozen.  Maybe they weren't but they didn't taste fresh. All in all, I wish I could say we will try it again, but with so many good restaurants in the area, we probably wont.
I have mixed feelings about this place. The food is great, but the service seemed odd. Will later clarify. First, the food! Corn Festival - $3.75. Please oh please do yourself a favor and order a side (maybe TWO) of the Corn Festival. A side comes with 3 pieces of fried corn bread. It's delicious and goes so well with any of their entrees. And plus, it's fun to say! Rum Glazed Mahi Mahi - $15. The menu says it has okra, chayote, pumpkin and yucca cake. Never tried 3 out 4, so why not. It was just okay. We got a side of rice and beans for this entree for $4.25. I oddly enjoyed the rice and beans more than the Mahi Mahi... Complimentary Sweet Potato Cake for the birthday boy. Different, but worth a try. Especially with that scoop of vanilla ice cream on top. :) The service is...oh, where do I begin! First of all, my party of 10 were seated in a private room. The room has a tiny office at the distal end of the room...which was constantly accessed throughout dinner by various managers and an owner. Really? We will not pardon your rudeness! Second, our waitress seemed like she was having a constant battle in her mind deciding whether or not she should act out her impatience on us. So what if we're not ready to order, please don't shove our coke order to the first person you see. Third, their card machine was not working. The same waitress comes to us twice, demanding that our cards are not readable, that it was dirty, blah, blah. She takes a third card and doesn't come back for 30 minutes. The hell? We ended up paying the rest in cash. Your machine is broken, don't place the blame on us! Come again? Sure! But only if the service doesn't come with a side of attitude. :P
Had a very mixed experience. The food was terrific but the service was terrible. I had to ask for one dish three times, each time being told it was coming, but it wasn't. As it was screwing up my meal I was getting frustrated. In the end the waiter banged it down on my table and stomped away. Considering we had asked nicely every time it was very annoying and very unprofessional behavior. Maybe an off night? Don't know. But service is a big deal to me so I will not go back. You may have better luck
Deliciously marinated meats and very good curry sea bass. Sangria is very good as well. So is the service. Will come again.
Come to Coconuts to experience "the other white meat." Don't get me wrong, Coconuts jerk chicken is good, but I always order the pork. Why? The jerk spices are on the skin of the chicken, but the spices are rubbed on the flesh of the pork. Plus the chicken has bones and the pork has no bones about it. The pork also comes with a "garnish" that should be its own side dish. When you order the jerk pork, don't forget to ask for an extra side of the jerk sauce (free) to dip your tender pork in. The incredible jerk pork "garnish" is a sweet potato and green beans mixture. I normally don't like either of those two things, but trust me on this one--it is so unique and flavorful. Together with the amazing sauce--I'm still dreaming about that dish. (My mother will never believe that her meat-loving child had a dream about a vegetable side-dish.) Coconuts is a great place to come with friends and order a bunch of items to share. Everything is served family-style. One entree is enough for two people. But we always order more, because the leftovers are so good. Take your leftover jerk pork (if you have any) and mix it up with some eggs and re-live your Coconuts experience the next morning in the privacy of your own home. The perfect compliment to your jerk pork is a creamy Caribbean cocktail. I sailed through the Caribbean over two years, so I've drank a lot of "Painkillers" in my life and this one is the best one you can get without hopping on a plane. A "painkiller" is a creamy drink that has dark rum, pineapple juice, cream of coconut, a splash of orange juice topped with grated nutmeg. Come for Happy Hour and get half off the cocktails--even if you are sitting at a table eating dinner. There are many Caribbean concoctions to choose from: Dark & Stormy, Mojito, Bahama Mama, Rum Punch and Bushwhacker. (Note: If you ask for a painkiller at a typical bar, they may give you an Advil instead of the delicious drink you really want.) I didn't love the sweet potato fries or the fried bananas. Both were a little dry. The atmosphere is fun and service is friendly and attentive and I will be back often.
Coconuts is a great place to dine with friends on a summer Friday night. I have tried their jerk chicken, ox tail, and shrimp angel hair pasta, and each of them was delicious! We also enjoy pitchers and pitchers of fresh  mojito! I will highly recommend this place to all my friends and family. Just on a side note, if you don't care much about ambiance (aka not for date), you can visit their sister restaurant, Back-A-Yard, which has all the signature dishes (jerk chicken and ox tail) but cheaper!
This food is yum-yum-yummy! The oxtail in particular is delicious.  The rice and beans were good.  The jerk chicken was dry though -- don't get that dish, but everything else was really good. We came in a large party and they were very accommodating.  The waiter was very friendly, took our pictures, cut up the birthday cake on the house and took great care of us.
While a friend and I were walking up Ramona towards University to grab some lunch a server was outside on his phone and motioned us to come back.  We checked out the menu outside and decided to give it a try due to his outgoing personality. We didn't really didn't know what to expect since we were unfamiliar with Caribbean food. I got the chicken, rice and beans, and salad lunch special and my friend who's a vegetarian got the plantain panini with crinkle-cut sweet potato fries. Both were absolutely delicious!! The jerk seasoning on the chicken was amazingly spicy and also tender, I got the dark meat.  The rice and beans were fantastic with a hint of cinnamon to complement the spiciness. Right before our food came one of the chefs came out to introduce himself to us and the group next to us, he was really friendly and funny. I will definitely be coming back to try the coconut shrimp!
jamaican/carribean yumminess!! i thought the food was great, though i dont have much experience to base it off from! the service was good, though they were very, very busy on a friday night. they tried. the food came out in good time and tasted good. we asked one of the servers to take a picture for our group and the chef came out and got into our picture. great, friendly guy! would recommend this for something different than your norm- esp if you're craving something unhealthy! haha we ordered: jerk wings mac'n'cheese sweet potato fries rice and beans fried plantains creole shrimp jerk pork curried chicken red sangria pitcher FYI - Happy hour (tue-fri 5-630pm) 50% off well drinks; $3 red stripe; 50% off appetizers
Great lively ambience, amazing food sums up my experience at this place last week. We were a group of 6 with a 2 children going out on a Friday night. Made a reservation for 8pm but had to change to 8:30 and they were glad to do that. I was doubtful how this place is going to be, with kids etc, but as soon as we got there we realized that it's going to be fun. There's a band playing in the patio on the side of the restaurant and the whole place is busting with people having a lovely conversation. This is not the place to expect a calm and silent atmosphere. Its the place for hanging out with friends and family with great food. When it comes to food, we had chicken wings for appetizers. They were juicy, spicy and overall delicious.
Overall a fine place for dinner- you eat family style and there are many drink pitcher options. I didn't think any of the food was really stand out though. For apps we had plantains with guac and the fried shrimp- the plantain dish was super salty, but the shrimp was good (as any fried shrimp should be!) My favorite entree was the salmon over sauteed spinach and chick peas, even though it was a little oily, it was pretty delicious. The famous jerk chicken was fine. I think I can use a jerk rub and make equally good chicken. The shrimp and plantains stew was below average. Drinks were all good- gotta love a place that does pitchers of mojitos!
This is the best Carribean restaurant I have been to in the Bay area! Lucked out with walking in on a Saturday night 6pm with no reservation and was able to get seated outside on the patio(heating lamps available). Yes, date night starts early! Make sure you do make reservations as this place is small and seems to accomodate large parties, so will take awhile to turn over smaller tables. Highlights: -Happy Hour until 630pm(Jerk wings for $4 delicious!) -Order the oxtail stew(melts in your mouth but order a side of the rice and beans with coconut) -Jerk Pork so good! -Make sure to order the plaintains -Mojitos pretty delicious -Keylime pie(made in house drizzled with guava sauce really?) -Prices very reasonable Try this place out! It will not disappoint!
This place has moved into my Top 3 favorite restaurants EVER. I've been there twice. Both times were very crowded but I didn't mind. The service is great, even though they were busy I never felt like I was waiting too long for anything. The second time I went with my family, the owner and the head chef both came outside to the patio (where there was only one other family) and chatted with us. Our waiter probably told them that we didn't leave a crumb on any of the plates we got! Try the jerk chicken or pork (i think i liked pork better) I've gotten: Coconut shrimp (always a good choice) Mac and Cheese (mmmmm) Shrimp and Crab pasta, and Baked eggplant. its family style, so depending on how hungry you are get a few "big tings" and make sure you get rice and beans!
Bought my family here and it was packed! luckily the outside patio was available. I am glad that they seated us outside because it had a Caribbean feel to it. The outside patio is perfect for a nice date as well. I love the fact that it was family style so for a family of 5, we got 4 main courses, appetizer and drinks.  When the food came out the portions were huge, enough to feed 5-6 people. We ordered what was suggested by fellow yelpers and it did not disappoint everything was good. The jerk sauce was amazing! it had a nice mixer of spice, tanginess, and herbs. The sauce went well with everything. I definitely recommend the jerk wings as an appetizer, it reminded me of momofuku's chicken wings. I believe the first steam the chicken to make it juicy and they grilled it. The jerk sauce went very well with the wings, I can jerk to these wings anytime. if you order the ox tail I recommend also ordering a side of the corn festival! make sure you dip the savory sauce with it. they make really good cocktails! make sure you order the pain killer! the drink is refreshing and perfect for a sunny day My parents are asian and they are very hard to please but by the end of our meal all the plates were cleaned out. I am already dying to come back.
Having two Jamaican parents who cooked quite I a bit when I was at home, I was really happy to see that there was a Jamaican/ Caribbean restaurant here in the Palo Alto area. When they originally opened, I thought their food was very good, delicious and authentic. However, on recent visits, their food has been WAY TOO SALTY. Nonetheless, their food is still pretty good, special note going out to their oxtail, curry goat, salmon, and guacamole garbanzo bean chip dish. Their service is also very quick and their drinks use real Jamaican rum and leave on with quite the buzz on the way out. If their food becomes less salty again, they'll get 4 stars.
Note: This is from a visit in November, 2010. I arrived here long before any dinner rush, but it still felt like a fun place. The servers were very affable and easy going.  The food and drinks were great. I tried their Jerk chicken, Mojito, and Roasted vegetables; everything was great.
I met friends here last night. When I walked in, my friends were laughing in disbelief about how rude the waitress had been to them. I was late, so I asked for the waitress's recommendation, and she pointed to the vegetarian ital dish. The sauce tasted great, but there was no seitan. I asked the waitress about it and she responded with a curt, "I don't know what that is." I showed her that the menu listed seitan as an ingredient in the dish, and she responded with, "No I know it's on the menu, but I don't know what that is, what is that?" I explained it as vital wheat gluten, and she gave me an impatient, confused look. Since most non-vegetarians haven't heard of seitan, I explained that it was like fake meat, and made up the bulk of the dish. It's like getting chili and the beans are missing. She again stated that she had never heard of it, that this was one of her favorite dishes, and it always looked like this, and asked if I wanted the chef to come out. I said, sure, and she came back 10 minutes later and told me that the chef said they didn't have seitan. Even when I worked in food service in a crappy little deli as a teenager, I knew that when you don't have a vital ingredient, you tell the customer when they're ordering or take it off the menu altogether. I asked for some rice to add to my meal of sauce & thinly sliced veggies, and she brought me a yummy coconut rice & beans, just like what we used to make in Punta Uva, Costa Rica Caribbean side. Hence the extra star. Basically, food was great, service was terrible. Later, I asked the host for a bag for my friends' take away food, and he couldn't acknowledge that I had just spoken to him. Having lived in the Caribbean, where friendliness is overabundant, I'm really saddened that the Caribbean culture hasn't managed to leave the kitchen at this place.
I had walked by Coconuts many times and decided to give it a try.  Upon walking into the entry way, I detected a funny, rancid, stale smell. I ordered the "crab" dish but could not see any crab in the rice.  The waiter said it was mixed in but if that were the case, it was invisible! The plaintains and rice were heavy and greasy. Would not return.
Coconuts has a great vibe that's both fun and inviting. The decor is very Caribbean and reminds me a bit of Islands. Happy hour lasts till about 6:30pm so be sure to arrive before then to get $4 draft beers. All the jerk items on the menu are delicious but I wouldn't recommend getting too many of them in one sitting as you might get overloaded with the saltiness. Parking in downtown Palo Alto can be a pain but fortunately there is an underground parking garage across the street from Coconuts. Coconuts is also pretty close to University Ave. so I would recommend eating here for dinner and then walking over to the main part of downtown.
WOW! A kick of different flavors all at the same time. I really enjoyed the jerk chicken and jerk salmon. They had a perfect mix of spice and sweetness, a little hard to explain. Also, their brown rice was perfectly cooked and their corn festival was the perfect side for both the chicken and the salmon (it kinda reminded me of a funnel cake, so not healthy but good). large portions and great service! i will definitely return!
Came here last night for a late dinner and a couple drinks. The food and service were both excellent. There were quite a lot of people and our food came very promptly. Our waiter really knew his stuff when it came to the food and drink options. I had the rum glazed mahi mahi. The fish was cooked perfectly and the sauce was delicious. The pumpkin and okra was a nice touch and complemented the fish well. The yucca cake was essentially a friend triangular prism of tastiness. Not sure I tasted much yucca in there, but it was perfectly fried and added a nice sweet/salty finish to the savory main dish. My companions had the jerk chicken and the chicken crab pelau, which they each raved about. The portions were hearty without being too large. As far as drinks, I had a mango mojito. It was pretty tasty, not too alcoholic (though they never are really). The mint was a bit too finely chopped for my taste (hate it when bits of mint come up through the straw). But it was still a good drink. My friend had the "dark and stormy" (house made ginger beer with rum). This is not normally a drink I would have any interest in, but I was actually surprised by the flavors and drinkability of it. Just make sure you really like ginger, because this drink is HIGHLY gingered. Next time I come I am definitely ordering something off the vegetarian section of the menu as well as some fried plantains. Can't wait!
They changed up the Menu and many of the great dishes are no longer.  I don't understand but my 2nd and 3rd trips were underwhelming.
WOW, i was extremely surprised here.  I wasn't expecting much, but the food was delicious and... Read more 
This restaurant is a hidden gem - away from University Ave, a couple of blocks from it, on Ramona. The best thing about it is that it is open from 12 to 8 or something on sunday... went here for a late lunch. Loved the plantain appetizer with a spicy avocado dip and the drinks that we started our meal with. Ordered a corncake entree and some tofu akki entree. The latter was a bit on the spicy side. Both the dishes were very flavorful and satisfying. We were too full to try their desserts. Next time, cuz I am surely going back!
Alright, I know how it is...out of 538 reviews, my one is going to make a BIIGG difference...Just wanted to say this place is on the same block as my work and for years i did not go in. Once i went in, had some of their splendid  chicken and pork, with a cocktail (why do they call them cocktails anyway?) well, we are now regulars. The bartender knows our names. We like that! ~T
Last week I joined two of my co-workers to try this place for the first time, one of my co-workers is a "foodee" so he didn't have high hopes that the food would reign over the Jamacian restuarants in New York.  I ordered the Goat Jerk lunch special which comes with rice and salad, another co-worker ordered the same, and the third person ordered the Ox-Tail jerk which comes with rice and salad.  From the time we ordered and received our plates it couldn't have been more than ten minutes.  The plate sizes looked more like dinner size, the first bite that I took was orgasmic!  I loved the food, and the weight staff was phenominal!  I highly recommend this restaurant and I can't wait to go back to try more!
From the moment we walked in the door the service was amazing! The host started with an bit smile and, as soon as we sat down, excitedly went through the menu and explained all the favorites, his favorites and good combinations. He really looked like he enjoys his job! To make things interesting, I'm currently on a restricted diet (the paleo diet) for 45 days as part of my training. So I can't have anything with added sugar, soy or grains. I explained this to the host and he informed our server, the chef AND the manager to make sure that I would be taken care of. During our meal they all stopped by at least once to make sure everything was correct. I felt very well taken care of. Our waiter was really funny and always made sure we were having a good time. Now to the food. Like so many other reviews on here, it was fantastic. I ordered the ox tail and my date had the jerk salmon. Both were perfect! Coconuts is my new favorite Palo Alto restaurant.
We had the Jerk chicken breast and the curry chicken. They were both very tasty. The jerk chicken was a bit dry. We also had the Curried Garbanzo Avacado appetizer. Very nice!
I haven't had much experience with Caribbean foods prior to my visit here to Coconuts.  And given this singular visit, I was neither impressed, nor felt the need to really more. For drinks, I had the Mango Mojito which was delish, and very refreshing.  The blending of Mint, Mango, Lime, etc all worked well together.  Loved sweet and tartness of my drink,  and probably my favorite part of the meal. =) http://www.yelp.com/biz_... For starters, we ordered the Jerk Chicken Wings.  Erm, chicken was overcooked and dry.  Without the Jerk sauce, these wings would have tasted as if they were burned on the grill.  Pass. http://www.yelp.com/biz_... Entree, I ordered the Boneless Jerk Pork.  Just like the chicken wings, my pork seemed to have been overcooked as well.  It wasn't tender, and was a bit difficult to chew.  I enjoyed the assortment of sweet potatoes and green beans that complimented the dish. http://www.yelp.com/biz_... Also shared an order of Sweet Potato Fries. Standard. Enough said. http://www.yelp.com/biz_... Service was quick and easy, and our server Stephanie was patient and attentive. I'd visit again, in hopes that the meat can somehow stop being so overcooked.  Maybe the cooks were having an off day.  Cute little island feel.  Great place for a large get together.
Came here w/ 4 girls from my work. we got a variety of food and a pitcher of sangria (which you should mix before pouring - the first girls got juice/fruit, the latter girls got alcohol). The food overall is decent - more than decent. . with pretty good portion sizes The service is jovial and good. But... wait a minute, Backayard has the same thing.. plus they give you sides, you don't have to pay for extra!. I guess I'm paying more to sit in this interestingly decorated, "swankified" restaurant...  but yeah. anyway, some tips/shoutouts Corn festivals: fried pieces of cornbread. mm mm good plantains: delicious sweet potato fries: delicious cobb salad with shrimp: ask for the dressing on the side, otherwise way too salty.  but it was pretty dang good. I tried the jerk goat.. ate goat for the first time.  Probably not going to do that again.  Other ladies had chicken, salmon etc.  I mean, all solid offerings, but they SHOULD be right? if each dish (And i use that word loosely, since really, it's just a piece of meat, and you have to order extra sides) is $15.  right? I like it.  It's good.  ESPECIALLY for Palo Alto.  It's just not "yay I'm a fan" because I'll probably never go back (unless it's on the house).
I held a business meeting here for a nonprofit that I volunteer for and I have to say there were many times where we all didn't want to talk because we were so busy enjoying our food. The coconut shrimp are to die for!  The eggplant dish is amazing. The only down side is I don't think leftovers hold well.  I did take a half jerk chicken home for my husband to try and it didn't fit my raving review of what I had at the restaurant.
A year ago when I first came here, I would have given this place a 4 star review, but since then they've changed their menu and I've tried 'Back-a-yard Caribbean'.  I came here the other night, and I found the place was playing ridiculously loud music.  It was nice that it was a one man live music outside, but we were sitting inside close to the entrance, and I still couldn't hear my friends very well. My throat actually hurt quite a bit by the time I left since I was half yelling to be loud enough for my friends to hear me. For the food, I really didn't like how they changed their menu.  It used to be about $18 for a plate of jerk chicken that came with rice, beans, and fried plantains.  Now, in the new menu, the meat doesn't come with anything else, and you're supposed to order side dishes to go with it.  My friends and I didn't realize this, and had ordered jerk chicken wings as an appetizer, then 2 orders of jerk chicken, and 1 ox tail.  When the server asked if we wanted any sides, we ordered rice& beans and fried plantains. We were super surprised by the amount of chicken that it came with, and then we also realized that if we had known the portions would be so big, that we should have ordered three different entrees. JERK WINGS APPETIZER ($8.25 ) - Pretty good, because I love chicken wings and jerk sauce.  I would definitely order it again. HALF JERK CHICKEN ($14) - Good, but was on the dry side since most of it was white meat.  I felt like the jerk sauce wasn't really coating the chicken very well or there might not have been enough because parts of the chicken tasted pretty plain. I think 'Back-a-yard's jerk chicken tastes way better. SIX HOUR BRAISED OXTAIL ($15) - This was good, and actually tastes like the oxtail that I get at Chinese restaurants.  I liked the sauce that it came with too. RICE AND BEANS SIDE ($3.25) - Pretty average, just like any other rice and beans. FRIED PLANTAIN SIDE ($3.25) - I just noticed from their menu that they have a 'fried ripe plantains' on their menu.  I think that would have tasted better since ours tasted like it wasn't fully cooked throughout, so it wasn't very good.
3.5 stars Had a fun dinner here with some Stanford classmates.  It's a great place for large groups.  They have lots of good appetizers, plates to share, and, most importantly, pitchers of mojito, margarita, and sangria for $20! I agree with Sasha, though, that nothing really stands out, and many of the dishes were overly salty and oily.  By far my favorite dish was the curry chicken.  The "famous" jerk chicken didn't do it for me.
Jerk Chicken, and Curried Chicken, both tender to the bone, well seasoned, and provides just the right amount of food with two scoops of their seasoned rice and a side salad. Lunch time is well worth it, and outside seating is a must. Buddy from work and I trekked all the way from Lytton avenue to try this. I'll definitely come here and suggest it to anyone. PS. The Jerk dishes are not spicy, they're almost mild.
Fun change of pace.  Flexible staff, responsive to requests. I love the plantains
Went here after it was recommended by a friend. Love the jerk chicken and the curried goat!! Food is really good! And yummy cocktails too!! :) I had the Dark and Stormy...was really good!!
Delicious food, incredible service, great ambiance. Only area for improvement is more veggie options, but regardless, a great restaurant and dining experience!
Went tonight and had an amazing time! Great service, super fast and friendly. We ordered the oxtail, the half jerk chicken and the curried goat, all of which were simply delicious! We will definitely be coming back for those! If you like spicy, then go with the jerk chicken or the goat. If you like spice but not too hot, the have the oxtail, it was amazing! For appetizer we got the hummus-guacamole served with plantains, that disappeared immediately! For side dishes we got the plantains and the rice which were decent. Next time though I will go with the sweet-potato fries that sounded interesting. The rice was a bit on the too sweet side. For drinks we got a margarita, tasting just fine, an alcoholic kiwi colada which was heavenly refreshing, and a pain killer (!) that was a deliciously sweet pineapple cocktail! We were 3 people and had PLENTY of leftovers but got pretty full too. Tab was $90. Looking forward to trying more of their appetizers and maybe some desserts! Recommended.
We were looking to go some where new and interesting for my birthday and my wife found this place on Yelp. We zipped over from my work and rolled up about 515 still within happy hour so that was pretty sweet. I ordered a Dark and Stormy an my wife got the Mojito. The Mojito was pretty tasty, but the Dark and Stormy was delicious...made with fresh ginger beer. I love ginger beers, so it's like this drink was made for me ;_) We decided to skip the appetizers as we were gonna share two of the big plates: 1/2 Jerked chicken and the BBQ chicken & Half ribs plate with two side, collard greens and fried plantains. Wow, the jerk chicken was delicious. I like spicy food and didn't find it to be very spicy, but all the flavoring was spot on and the chicken was cooked perfectly. The BBQ chicken and ribs were equally delicious and also juicy. The collard greens were seriously some of the best of we've had. We like making these at home and man, if I could get the flavor down like Coconuts has I would be pretty stoked. The fried plantains were aight. I think I like the overripe fried ones better because they turn out a bit more tender. And last but not least our server was awesome! Very friendly  and welcoming and just had a good vibe about him, Cande was his name. He'd overheard my wife talking about my b-day and totally surprised us with a piece of the warm sweet Potato pudding complete with candle on top ;-) Double bonus 'cause my wife is Gluten Free and she was totally able to enjoy this dessert! Also love the bright Caribbean color scheme. We sat outside and although it's not quite summer weather yet, it was super relaxing. I can't wait to come back and sit in the patio with a Dark& Stormy in hand, once the weather gets a bit more stable and warm! Next up to try: Oxtail stew and Curried goat.
Coconuts has gotten worse for group dinners because they now serve everything besides the vegetarian menu family style. Although some of the dishes are still individual portions - like the salmon. So it's very confusing and makes ordering and splitting a check a huge headache. Also, Coconuts NEEDS more waiters.  I'm not sure what the waiters are doing during dinner but it's almost IMPOSSIBLE to get their attention.  I had to get up to get the waiter's attention upwards of five times throughout the evening - and at least five times trying to find him to sort out the check.  The service gets 1.5 stars.  They aren't unpleasant or anything they're just NEVER THERE. Now for the food - there's a new vegetarian set of offerings and they have several dishes, which is very exciting.  I tried the lentils with okra and polenta, and it was pretty good.  It did taste suspiciously like butter, but I can't confirm either way, so I'll assume it was honestly vegan. The food is still good and worth the trip - but I'm starting to think that you should really only get takeout here or come during an unpopular time - trying to have a dinner here on a Friday night with 7 people was a logistical nightmare.  Plus it was way too noisy to hear each other talk.
One vegan gluten free entree - curry tofu, from the lunch menu. Sadly the jerk seasoning Coconuts and... Read more 
A nice change from the normal fare in Palo Alto. We went on a day where they had a special menu, so we decided to try something different.  I must say, this is the first restaurant in-I-don't-know-how-long that really challenged my taste buds.  I had a salted fish and some-interesting-fruit- saute that really overwhelmed the senses.  The other dish that was there was the crab, and spinach omelette which was tasty and had a generous portion of crab!  The bloody mary's were nice, tasty and spicy!  It was a great way to start off the brunch.  Otherwise, what I liked most about this place was the warm atmosphere, great service, and steel drums!   You really do feel like you're in Jamaica!
Just had one of the best vegetarian lunch dishes ever! Glad to be working nearby!!
During one wonderful meal at Menlo Park's Back A Yard last year, I heard the staff mention that Coconuts was their sister restaurant. They even rotate the chefs between the two locations.  Since Back A Yard has such a huge reputation, and is often overcrowded, this news was too good to pass up. Sure enough, the recipe for Coconuts can be described as follows: Start with Back A Yard; Switch the one-room, hole-in-the-wall, cinderblock look for a larger, rambling space with a more upscale Caribbean vibe; Reduce the portion sizes slightly; Raise the prices a bit; And add cocktails.  It's not as bad as it sounds. Despite the menu adjustments, it is a beautiful space, and the food is still outstanding. -- Jerk chicken plate: ($9.95) Slightly higher price than the Back A Yard version; Unfortunately, unlike Back A Yard, it does not include plantains ($3 extra for a plate of those); But it is still delicious and finger-licking good.  Probably worth the extra price for the easy parking and crowd avoidance. 4 stars -- Braised Ox tail plate: ($11) Smaller but also slightly cheaper than Back a Yard version. Very good. Tender. But it was also fatty, and half of it was bone. Plantains are included with this plate; The rice 'n beans were phenomenal as usual. Not a repeat order though, since it left me a little hungry. 3 stars. Rating is a little tough, with my lunches so far.  But then again, while running errands in Palo Alto lately, I recently found myself trying to come up with an excuse to eat here again. I think that means I'm a fan.
THUMBS UP: - Curried Garbanzo Avacado Guacomole (vegetarian dish) - Corn Festival (tastes like funnel cake - yums!) - Jerk Chicken - Curried Chicken - Rice & Beans - Pineapple Mojito - Patio and cool Caribbean music
We took our family to Coconuts for dinner.  Maybe my problem is that I have never had carribean food?  We thought dinner was good, but not a place I would rave about. We had the jerk wings and pork bites for appetizers and both were great.  In my opinion, the jerk wings are the best thing they serve overall at the restaurant. We then had the BBQ chicken and half ribs.  This dish was just so so and nothing very special.  The ribs were oversauced and nothing special.  We also had the half jerk chicken which was fine, but again, nothing I would rave about. I really would have given the place 3 1/2 stars, if yelp allowed that.  The service was good and the atmosphere is casual.  But I usually go somewhere for the food...and the food was just okay.
I came back for dinner and it wasn't as good... not the food, not the service, and not the prices.  Still solid but I am not as  head over heels as I was the last time I came.  Perhaps I'll stick to coming here for lunch.
I don't know why this place isn't more popular... but it might be because it's a bit off the main... Read more 
Coming here on a Thursday evening this place was easy to find, but gosh do I hate parking in downtown PA.  After parking 3 blocks away and running in the cold to keep warm I walked up to this restaurant and was pleasantly greeted by the friendly host.  Warm, bright colors welcomed me and my friend was already seated at a small table.  The table is in the opening room though and it felt like a table that was situated in the foyer.  Little uncomfortable and a little cramped but ok.  I loved the colors of the restaurant and everything felt orderly, clean and well kept. The service throughout was friendly, polite and attentive.  Really nice service and later the Manager I think asked how the jerk was and asked about our meal.  It was nice to give some feedback and appreciated as a customer.  Good service. We had the braised oxtail to share which while it was very soft and tender liked they promised you don't get very much meat and I guess I'm just not a huge fan of oxtail.  It could be awesome for someone else who likes oxtail.  We also shared the jerk wings which were pretty darn good, slightly spicy, good, tender meat and plenty of food.  Good jerk chicken!  I also got a side order of sweet potato fries - sooooo good! While I didn't go crazy for the food, I would come back and try other dishes.  I would then probably find a main dish that would suit me better. Really a fun, good Jamaican restaurant. Good food.  Good service.  Nice ambiance.
how come there aren't more carribean spots?? i had to venture all the way out to Palo Alto to get some good jerk chicken! this place has great food. the oxtail and the jerk chicken were my favorites. i also had a guava-colada that was fan-friggin-tastically refreshing after wolfing down those spices! the place is super laid back and casual. there was a group of black women sitting at a table near us laughing their heads off and being loud, just like i'd imagine the carribean being! and i mean that in a good way. please don't take it the wrong way.
Wow, what's up with the four stars? Came here for lunch the other day so maybe that's the first differentiator. We ordered the jerk salmon and jerk chicken lunch plates, which came with rice and salad on the side. Food was pretty flavorful, although nothing on the plates screamed "freshly made"..in fact I suspect that everything was probably premade a day or two before and just heated up. So the negatives? The table was already set when we walked in, but the glasses/table were sticky. There were flies everywhere. The waiter showed up once to take our our order, and one more time to give us the check. He forgot my side of corn festival, but I couldn't remind him because he had disappeared. Overall, gotta say I'm disappointed. I thought this place was going to be fun and yummy, but the cleanliness and service leaves something to be desired.
Coconuts is probably one of the best Caribbean places in the South Bay for a nice place to eat. Everything here is just delicious and there is a good amount of seating for even the largest of parties. The food I recommend heavily is the Jerked Pork and Chicken, the chicken is a bit spicy that doesn't hit you right away until just a bit later. The pork is just straight out delicious. I've never had desert here but I imagine it's good. The chicken curry can get a bit overcooked, the meat just falls off the bone too easily to be correct (maybe that's fine but I've never had that before). They can get super busy, so I recommend using the OpenTable integration. The reason for 3 stars though is the service. I have never been happy with my service here, they are usually slow on getting water, getting our food, and just pretty much everything. Even getting seated takes a while. I feel like they are always just 2-3 people understaffed. Basically, for me, this place is here not only for the food but the atmosphere and the service. If I just wanted good Caribbean food, I would go Backyard Caribbean in Menlo Park. Same quality (if not better) food quality, cheaper, but the place is small. But they again, they suck at service so no go. If you want Caribbean food and have a big party or a guest, or want to impress. I recommend Coconuts, otherwise there are better places.
I enjoyed my food here, but not enough to give it 4 stars. I used http://opentable.com to book us a table for 4 at the very last minute. I like using Open Table, but I hate using it when it comes to local restaurants. I know I was not in the mood to wait so I used it. In under an hour we were seated for a party of 4. FYI - I always wondered what the fees were for Open Table. Though insanely easy to use and extremely convenient, I always wondered what the actual cost was for the actual restaurant. Incanto's blog had a good write up on it -- http://incanto.biz/2010/... . I use Open Table for big chain restaurants or restaurants that I feel can handle their exorbitant fees...but even then, I use it sparingly. For an appetizer we ordered the corn festival. Speechless. Absolutely speechless. It was a sweet corn dough that was deep fried. Honestly, so good, but what a heart attack of an appetizer. I'll make sure to order it again. Chicken Curry - good, nice kick. Chopped Salad with Steak - Hubby's order...and he was disgruntled. More meat than veggies. Normally he wouldn't complain, but in that rare moment he wanted a salad. I told him to order something else, but he didn't listen to me. I saved my TOLD YOU SO dance for later. Sides: Plantains, rice and beans, sweet potato fries and mac and cheese -- all were delicious. Parking was easy with the parking garage right across the street. Seating in the restaurant is a bit on the...um, intimate/cozy side? Euphemism for hella squishy for those who don't do subtle well... Service was friendly and fast. I'd like to give this place another shot and see if the 3 star rating can become 4.
2  stars for food.  1 star for service. Tried it one more time last weekend to see if the service quality has improved.  It has not.  Very slow service.  We were mostly ignored during our entire meal.  Large time gap between our appetizer and our meal.  Decent food but not good enough to warrant the awful service.  Will never come back. Save your time and go to Back-A-Yard.
Great food!  Just as good as I remember from Back-A-Yard.  Good location.  Clean and bright inside.... Read more 
Took pops and my sis here for father's day. Staff was amazing and the place had a great ambiance. All was clean and comforting. The problem is food at this price should not be a la carte. We ordered appetizers, sides and meals. Drinks galore. Still felt like something was missing. Ox tail bowl with delicious sauce left...what a waste. Platanos aka tostones :) were perfectly cooked and at the peak of ripeness. Food was prepared well but not great. I might come back but not singing any praises. Its a spot you try once and come back during happy hour. Still enjoyed the meal with my awesome fam.
I enjoyed this place and the people were really friendly.  We basically went with the recommendations. Coconut Shrimp (washed down with a Red Stripe) - these were tasty Jerk Chicken - also good He recommended 2 sides so we got the sweet potato fries and the plantains. I didn't care for the plantains and the sweet potato fries came out with the shrimp so basically I ate the chicken alone. There were a bunch of big groups and families so seems like this would be a great place for kids.  For 2 grown-ups on a dinner date it was a bit chaotic.
Due to the acoustics, it is impossible to hold a coherent conversation for long here.  This unfortunate fact outweighs the cheerful ambience, cool drinks, and excellent food if you are there primarily to talk. As at other popular places with this problem (e.g. City Pub in Redwood City), even when it's half-full, the sound from the louder tables seems to be amplified, with the result that everyone else has to raise their voice.  This in turn causes a gradual feedback loop, where the original table becomes even louder subliminally responding to the escalating background (and due to their ongoing alcohol intake).  Soon there is a constant roar of yelling people and shrieking laughter that will make communication roughly as challenging as in a top-volume nightclub with a big sound system. Some people have special abilities to deal with this. For example I've observed that women in loud clubs often seem to have long effortless exchanges possibly due to the higher frequencies of their voices, which gives them a higher bandwidth (right, engineers?)--or perhaps it's a gender-specific high-intensity language similar to dolphin squeaks.  If you have these advanced abilities, you'll be fine at Coconuts.  Otherwise, you should confine your dialogue to brief one liners and long periods of intoxicated roaring laughter, like most of the other patrons. Dear Coconuts: if you read this, *please* do something to moderate the acoustics... fabric panels... wall hangings... plants... something. Everything else is fine.
Wow.  I haven't had Caribbean food this good since my days in Flatbush in Brooklyn.    The crab soup was amazing.  The curry goat had incredible flavor (I also appreciated the diced habanero on the side).  And the sweet potato pie, wow!  Definitely will be back.
loved it
Great atmosphere with delicious food makes this place a fun place to eat.  You can share your food family style (which I recommend) or order separate plates.
So they've changed their menu after I went there in 9/10.  They are now doing family style entrees and sides. Only their specials have all the sides on one plate. Still fantastic flavors: had curried goat and the much vaunted braised oxtail and they both were really good, if a bit too bony for my complete liking. The plantains still rock and the Corn Festivals should be served freakin' everywhere, they are so good. The only thing is again what many others have mentioned: this place needs some sound control. I mentioned this to both the head waitress and the front desk manager and suggested some acoustic paneling on the ceiling or parts of the wall to cancel noise reflection. They seemed to take this seriously and will pass it on to the owner.
If Yelp didn't tell me about this place, I would not have looked here. It is off of University by a... Read more 
Our host was very friendly and tongue-in-cheek hilarious. The chef came out to say hello to everyone. The mojitos were huge and just perfect. The oxtail was the best I've ever had, the coconut shrimps were hot, crispy and fresh (with a really good tangy sauce) and the caesar salad was authentic. I'd totally go back!
After passing by Coconuts many a times, we finally stopped in. It was jam packed, but we scored two seats at the bar - where we usually prefer to sit anyway. The bartender was really friendly and mixed up two pretty amazing cocktails. We split the appetizer combo, which had a mix of things to try. The jerk chicken was t-a-s-t-y. I think I'd opt to get that as a meal if I wanted something semi small. For our meal, we took the recommendation of the bartender and ordered the Curried Goat. Neither on of us had ever eaten goat, and like to try new things--so we were quite excited. Wow, was it good! It fell right off the bone, as if it had been cooking all day. It was the perfect amount of spicy and a great meal over rice. We couldn't finish it all and took it home for leftovers---which were just as good. We were forewarned that it would "look gross" after it sat over night....which it did. The goat turned hue of green, but it tasted just as it did the night before. Next time, we were told to try the Oxtail. Can't wait to go back!
OH WOW, Goat curry is super awesome! ate here with some mates, everything was very good and tasty, except for the jerk tofu...if you eat meat get the goat curry, it is simply great! If you want to save some $ and time hit up backayard for a less classy but some food on the other side of 101!
I was pretty impressed by the quality of the food and of the service. We called ahead on a Saturday night around 6:30 to try to make reservations for 7:30, and the guy who answered was pretty honest with us and told us it would be about a 40 minute wait, and that his next reservation wasn't until 9:00. We decided to show up anyway, and arrive at the place around 7:20.  The hostess us greets us warmly, and lets us know that if we would like to wait for a table, the wait would be around an hour or so, but that we are welcome to sit at the bar if we'd like. Since we both were hankering for Caribbean food, we decide to sit at the bar for drinks and appetizers. I ordered the Bahama Mama cocktail, and it was absolutely delicious--a perfect blend of flavors, and a generous size for the $8 pricetag.  My husband ordered the chili mango margarita, which was both fruity and just enough spiciness with the sprinkling of habanero pepper. We also ordered the Jamaican jerk wings.  These were perfectly seasoned and the jerk sauce gave a nice extra spicy kick to it.  They were meaty and moist, and there was enough for 4 each, which was pretty filling. For our main course, I ordered the shrimp creole served with plantain chips.  We had rice and beans as a side.  We were amazed by how quickly the dishes came to the table -- within 10 minutes of ordering, they arrived.  While the shrimp dish was on the smaller side, I still had some left over, as I was pretty full from the jerk wings and the cocktail I had.  The sauce it came in was very  flavorful -- notes of curry and onion with finely diced bell peppers in the sauce.  My husband ordered the goat curry dish, which was heartier in terms of portion size, and he, too, had enough leftover. All in all, we had a great experience at this place.  Everything that we ordered had a unique flavor, from the drinks to the appetizers to the main course.  My main criticism of this place is that the decor is a little kitsch-y, so if that doesn't matter too much to you, I'd say the food is definitely worth trying here.
First of all, I'm a huge fan of  Back A Yard in Menlo Park. So when I heard Coconuts was owned by the Chef Robert, I knew I had to pay a visit. In a nutshell, Coconuts is just a nicer version of Back A Yard. However, the food authenticity and flavor remain the same. If you're into appetizers and small plates, I highly recommend the following: coconut shrimp, pork bites, fried yuca, and fried plantains. As for main courses, the oxtail definately lives up to its Yelp reputation! It very juicy, tender and flavorful. The NY steak, it's your average NY steak, however it's served with this amazing butter and sauce. Makes it so good, so good! So yeah, if you ever wanted to try authentic Jamaican food without hopping on a plane, I definitely recommend Coconuts.
Date night with B after a super last minute reservation. I think he ordered the punch, which was deliciously fruit-juice like, and also deliciously strong. The waiter recommended I get the pina-colada, and I always forget that I'm not a fan until I take the first sip. ah well. B's drink made up for it. We ordered the Jerk Pork Bakes appetizer; generous amounts of jerk pork heaped on top of some sort of airy pasty - kind of like a savory funnel cake. DE-LISH. best part of the whole meal. For entrees we ordered the six-hour braised ox-tail and the chicken crab pelau. The ox-tail was pretty fall-off-the-bone tender, but it was extremely saucy and heavily spiced for a dish that didn't come with rice. The pelau I thought would be like a paella, but again, they were heavy-handed with the sauce and spices, to which the overall effect was that everything started tasting the same. Like the 3-stars say, it's just 'a-ok'. But since I don't think we'll be back, their rating got dropped down to 2.5 stars. The half star is for the charming waiter flirting outrageously with the middle-aged ladies celebrating a birthday at the table next to ours.
Coconuts...Let's just say I wanted to lick my plate after we finished our meal. The goat curry was so tender and melted in your mouth. The jerk pork had an amazing flavor. The Kiwi Colada didn't really rub me the right way but I would go back again and again and again!
Compared to Back A Yard, we really though Back A Yard wins. While this restaurant is definitely a step up in terms of location and ambiance, the food just wasn't as good. The jerk pork came out in slices...totally different from the usual cubes of meat. The slices were also just not as flavorful or juicy. The oxtail was pretty good, but the chicken curry and seafood pasta was lacking. The roasted veggies were also kind of meh. One thing we did really enjoy was the appetizer platter- jerk wings, patties, fried shrimp...etc. The jerk wings were really good.
This place is my new obsession. Went on a whim after seeing so many favorable Yelp reviews and the reviews did not let me down. If anything, they didn't rave enough. Got there around 5:30 before it started getting busy and sat outside. The wait staff was very attentive and definitely friendly. Our waiter was hysterical, made tons of recommendations and made sure we werase taken care of. The chef himself came out to introduce himself to us (which I've never had happen to me at a restaurant in Palo Alto....ever) and made sure we were doing ok. Since it was getting cooler they kept checking to make sure we were ok or if we wanted them to light the heated lamp. Happy Hour runs from 5 to 6:30pm with $4 appetizers (from a set list) and discounted beers. Mixed drinks are still full price but they're so delicious you won't care. Btwn me and two others, we made a meal out of the appetizers easily. Definitely recommend the Jerk wings, coconut shrimp and the pork bites. This place will need to become a regular stop for me.
What happened to this place? The menu is completely different. The chicken used to be so juicy and soft, it felt like it was melting in my mouth. Now they throw an entire chicken at you on a skillet and make you cut it yourself. Everything seems to be family style now and doesn't come with any side dishes. I will not be returning. I'll risk my life and go to Back-A-Yard from now on.
Came here for lunch this past weekend and ordered the lunch specials. I got a jerk pork plate and... Read more 
Went here for the first time yesterday. I had the Jerk Chicken, which was awesome. I like the fact that the restaurant is off the beaten path as far as downtown PA goes...I can't be bothered with the heavy traffic of University Ave. The jerk chicken had a great marinade (although I added some habenero sauce on the side to spice it up a bit more...but I'm Pakistani and that's how we roll). We had a quick stop-in during downtime (2:30p on a Friday), so it was dead empty which provided for great service. Prices are very reasonable, staff is friendly and meticulous, the outdoor seating is nice, and food is top notch.
Open the door and a drift of spice aromas makes your acquaintance.  The decor and music are perfect, pulling off the promise of a Jamaican experience right along with Sharon the waitress who fits the part perfectly.  Pork, goat, chicken, crab, and tofu are among the media used to deliver a jerk and curry experience.  There aren't many places in the Valley you can get goat. I had the curried goat, very tender and not too gamy, with a nice side salad of mixed greens, red beans with rice, and corn bread muffins - scrumptious.  Bob had the jerk pork; mouth-watering as well. Washed it all down with a Rid Stripe of course, bob went with the ice tea.
Decided to bring a group of friends here for lunch since it's been on my list to try. The place was pretty poppin' on a weekday around 1PM. We got our menus and here's what we ordered: -chef sampler platter ($17.25): jerk wings, ackee rolls, garlic bread, beef patties (like empanadas), and a small bowl of something else. I would just get an order of the jerk wings since the jerk spice/rub is what they're known for -curried chicken ($12.95): mildly spicy with lots of sauce to eat with your rice -irie tofu ($12.50): not bad for a vegetarian dish -brown rice x2 ($3.25/order): soft and mushy...I think it was overcooked We also ordered 3 desserts (forgot the name and their online menu isn't updated) and I found the chocolate cake to be the best. Service was a bit spotty but friendly nevertheless. It was quite loud inside so pretty hard to carry a conversation unless you don't mind screaming.
I wasn't too impressed with this place.  Although the host and our waiter were very friendly, closing up our meal and getting our check took a long time.  We were sitting there for a while waiting for our waiter to come by. GUACAMOLE W/POSTONES: Just the right amount of salt.  It was nothing great, but a good start until our food came out. HALF JERK CHICKEN:  Seasoned well.  It was a little too salty, but had a good, spicy kick to it.  The meat was tender (most of the reviews below say their chicken was dry). JERK PORK W/ROASTED SWEET POTATOES AND GREEN BEANS:  The pork was overcooked and dry.  The sweet potatoes and green beans had too much cinnamon on it. SWEET POTATO PUDDING:  pretty good.  drizzled with carmel w/a scoop of vanilla ice cream & a hint of coconut. I'm not sure if I would eat here again.  I recommend getting their lunch plates because it comes with sides but will cost you almost $10 alone.
Very nice place for dinner if you're not in a hurry. Had a fun dinner here on a Friday night - the place was really packed even though it's a couple of blocks off University Ave and it was later on in the evening (which is a good sign). We enjoyed everything we ordered: goat curry, jerk salmon were pretty good and the grilled veggies and cocktails were especially delicious! One note: we did have to wait 30 mins for a table *with* reservation. But on the other hand they were very apologetic and gave us beers and an appetizer on the house. So as long as you're patient, you'll have a great time.
HOLY AWESOMENESS BATMAN!!! Good for the belly, good for the soul. My wife and I had dinner here last night and it was nearly a religious experience. I can honestly say that everything we ate was delicious. The BBQ sauce on the chicken and ribs was so good I sucked the bones dry, ate the remainder of the plate with a spoon and tried to suck remnants out of my mustache. Side dishes chosen were: red bean & rice, corn bread, collard greens, caramelized sweet plantains and of course key lime pie for dessert. The key lime had a sweet mango sauce that was done in a way that I have never had before. It was also really good. My wife also asked for some hot sauce, as she often does, and they brought two varieties. One was black pepper based and the other was jabanero based. My wife gave both a big thumbs up. A word of warning though: If you are not at all serious about your hot sauces you should tread carefully here. Specifically the jabanero based sauce will melt your face off. You've been warned. I tried only a very little bit and thought I may need a new tongue afterward. Dont misunderstand, its delicious but H-O-T! The staff was very friendly, responsive and always eager to be of help. The chef/owner even came out to greet everybody to make sure their experience was a good one. Add to this a well done caribbean island theme with reggae music softly playing in the background. It made us want to take another trip to the tropics as soon as possible. Not to mention it helped us to forget our workdays. We will definetly be going back to the gem of a place! Tanks for di food man!
This is my first "real" exposure to Caribbean food - not counting all those Caribbean "inspired" food served at chain restaurants. And it was good! Of course, you can't go wrong with sweet potato fries. For our main dishes, we tried a couple: shrimp and crab pasta, chicken crab pelau, and jerk chicken and ribs. The ribs was probably the best, with the meat just falling off the bones. The sauce had just a hint spiciness. The crab dishes were pretty good too - once you finished ripping out the shell. The best part was that it's served family style so everyone gets to try the different dishes.
I came here with two of my girlfriends (one of them is Tina A. who just wrote a review) and I just didn't really like the food at all. I've had Caribbean food at Cha Cha Cha in Los Angeles and thought that was much better (if you go, get the mango chicken). We started the meal the blue crab dip and coconut shrimp. The coconut shrimp was a little oily and didn't really have a strong coconut flavor. While the blue crab dip was delicious, it wasn't unique with any distinct flavors. Just crab + cheese served with bread. We ordered half of a jerk chicken and I actually thought the chicken was a little dry (and I was eating dark meat). Not tender and juicy like other yelp people had mentioned. The spices were flavorful though. I thought the plantains were weird. They were fried and I'm used to plantains being almost caramelized... is that because I've only had it at Cuban restaurants?? Is there some major difference between plantains that I'm missing and if so, I apologize for my ignorance. I really won't be going back. This is always the struggle... finding good food in the Peninsula. It always amazes me how I can't find really great food (I grew up in that area) when the proximity to SF is so close.
Hands down the best Caribbean place I've been to since the closing of my circle of friends' fabled memories of Caribbean Spice in Berkeley back in the 90s. I had the Baked Eggplant, which had the best qualities of a eggplant parm and a ratatouille. We had the Spinach roll things for an appetizer, and they were very tasty (and really, unlike anything else I've had). The crown jewel for me, though, was that they had incredibly gingery homemade ginger beer for their dark and stormy (a fine rum and ginger drink) I love spicy things, and I can't wait to go back.
Coconuts...so so so good. Have you had jerk sauce?  If you haven't gone here you haven't yet. There are a number of reasons why this place is awesome. 1. Jerk %s % Chicken, Pork, Salmon All Delicious!  Ask for spicy jerk sauce.  All 3 are good, but I like getting the combo with pork and salmon.  The salmon is cooked so well here.  Flakes off and isn't dry at all.  Chicken moist falls off the bone.  Pork comes in long cubes of porky goodness. 2. Corn Festivals! Festival!  Party! In your mouth!  What is it?  It's fried dough.  Still need more info?  Think...of a funnel cake taste with a corn bread texture and a crispy fried outside with a soft doughy center.  It's good.  Get it. 3. Tons of food!  I can never finish a whole meal here so I'm always able to enjoy the jerk goodness a 2nd time. 4. Price.  For what you're getting I think it's a great deal.  Don't forget you've gotta pay a little extra cause you're in downtown PA and the place is pretty nice.
OMG... the Blue Crab dip was amazingly delicious!!! My jerk chicken with rice was amazing... i wanted to try the plantain small dish but had to be good on my diet! Intimate fun crazy atmosphere but very friendly and everyone there seemed like to be having a good time! I can't wait to come back to try other dishes!  Seriously, a cute lil gem in Palo Alto!  Yeah the decor and paintings on the wall may seem tacky but it fits well with the fun carefree environment! Oh and I hear the sangria is the bombshizzle... I didn't have any because I'm on a no drinking streak here... but I will next time!!!
I've always heard of Caribbean food; well, actually only the "jerk"-ness of the food. I had to go and figure out if i could understand this type of cuisine. Decor - I'm not quite sure what the ambiance of a Caribbean restaurant is supposed to contain; but, I was glad that it felt cozy and homely. You could tell that anyone was welcomed with opened arms. Staff - From walking through the front doors to the dining table, each member of the staff made my friends and I feel very welcomed. The host greeted us kindly and lead us to the table right away. It was our first time, as stated previously, so the server and the manager (or at least I think he was a manager) gave us honest advice on what to eat and what to drink. Food/Drink - My friends and I ordered Jerk Salmon, Broiled NY Steak, Half Jerk Chicken, Corn bread, and mac and Cheese. The jerk entrees were at the mild level since we didnt know how extreme HOT would be. Everything was delicious and cooked perfectly. Personally, I thought the corn bread was a tad dry, but y friends didnt mind at all. This restaurant is definitely family style, which adds to its charm. My friend tried the punch, and, i tried the Ting (the server said that it tastes like squirt..and holy cow, that's exactly what it tastes like!!! it was good). My friends would definitely come back to this place!
First of all, Caribbean Cuisine in any way is not similar to Indian cuisine. Those people who come in here thinking they all all about food...sigh. But here's a take on the place: It's Loud. And It's Lively. And it tastes tremendously like someone wanted to intensify your taste buds with steroids. Simply amazing. Waiters and the manager will constantly make sure you're all right. +1 right there for good service. Drinks? Of course, a boatload of margaritas and cocktails right where you want it. And of course, everyone should try the Oxtail and the Jerk Chicken, no doubt about it. Make sure to get some sauteed brown rice, the plantains might go well for mature tastes, but I'm sure not everyone has Caribbean cuisine before. 3 dishes are all you need for four people. it's worth the investment and time to get a reservation or just go on a Sunday night. Seriously a great place to go. Wouldn't bring your girlfriend there, but friends are a hit here.
I've eaten here a few times.  It's been mixed.  Once was very good.  The other times were mixed.  My most recent experience prompted my review.  There were two basic problems: - food that was very obviously reheated (dry, tasted like microwaved leftovers, some parts cold) - slow service - no drinks refills Now the wait to see if I get food poisoning.
I stopped in here the other night on a whim...was headed to another fave Paly restaurant but saw this one and remembered a friend had recommended it so I decided to try it. I was a little hesistant at first - the inside isn't chic but the atmosphere was pretty lively. The menu items looked incredible but they are a little on the expensive side. Being by myself, I ordered the jerk wings and the oxtail on recommendation of the bartender. I also got a glass of chardonnay (the only one by the glass on the list). First of all, the charddonnay was great. I hoped it would be, but being that it was the only one by the glass available, you never know. On to the jerk wings....oh, my, god. SO AMAZING. I have never had jerk sauce like this before. Incredible. I killed them. The oxtail was also outta this world. Awesome cinnamon rice with beans and carmelized plaintains. Just delish. After destroying the wings, I couldn't finish the oxtail. The owner and I chatted a bit and after some convincing on his part, I agreed to taste his curried goat (which I originally nixed thinking it would be gamey). Let's just say I can't wait to come back and have that as my main. Overall - incredible food, great service, a little expensive. A Tip - You can get a bottle of their jerk sauce to go! (A little pricey at $14.50, but worth it to recreate the taste at home)
Very standard food. Not great, not terrible. Short staffed, but friendly. Food quality is ok, but salad was drenched in dressing. Flavors not subtle.
I have no idea how I haven't been to this place before. A big thank you to the yelpers - this place is spot on. It is opposite a big underground (free) parking lot, I have always found parking there. We were welcomed with a warm friendly smile and great aroma from the restaurant. The service was very friendly, polite, helpful and our waitress had something funny to say all the time. A+ The menu was great - we ordered way too much because we had decided to try a number of things and take leftovers home. We tried, Jerk wings and Jerk Pork bites, Entrees: Oxtail and Jerk Salmon, Sides: Corn bread and fried plantains, Drinks: mixed cocktails (pain killer and some else). We were so full that we couldn't think of desert. All the food was perfect, and the waitress told us that the spicy food tastes better the next day and it was true for our leftovers. Highly recommended.
Solid fit for a foodie
Lots of food. I loved their Jerk Chicken, rice, and plantains !! Try the red stripe beer with this meal - it's delicious! There's a public parking garage across the street as well.
The best Big Ting here is the tender braised oxtail. OMG, it's SO delicious. The meat just falls off the bone, and it's amazingly flavorful. They must braise it for hours. I also had the Jamaican jerk chicken, which was well seasoned, but I preferred the oxtail. It's jamakin me salivate just thinking about it! Har, har. The plantains were also tasty, as were the rice and beans. None of my girlfriends had eaten here before, and now we can't wait to go back. It's a fun and festive spot to dine with a date or a big group!
Finally decided to review after a 2nd visit to make sure I wasn't biased by my crazy hunger the 1st time. BRAISED OXTAIL.  Fall-off-the-bone meat with some rich, meaty sauce combined with a side of rice and plantains makes Coconuts worth checking out at least once.  I got a hint it was good when I saw the tables around us crane their necks around and mouth to each other "what is that?".  For the uninitiated -- oxtail bone looks funky, but believe me, a little work around the nooks and crannies is well worth it.  Second hint it was good was when the wait staff put it down on our table with a knowing smile both times we ordered it.  POC -- y'all feel me. Jerk chicken and jerk pork were both solid second entrees during our visits.  Also had the blue crab dip during a visit and wished there were more toast points to scrape up the goodness.  Chicken curry was nothing spectacular but provided some nice balance with all the jerk meat we had around us. BTW, Coconuts encourages family-style dining; one could probably down an entree and side if you were really starving, but not nearly as much fun or as tasty.  A bunch of Palo Altans around us didn't seem to understand the family-style concept and ended up with a half-eaten entree with no side to accompany it for the next time (if they even took the delicious leftovers home).  For a group of five, we were pretty solid with three entrees, a few sides, and an appetizer or two.  Add a pitcher of mojitos and good times all around.
She put the lime in da coconut! I love me some Sangria! We tried the White Sangria. I was *really* looking forward to this drink. It was very different from what I was expecting. The orange/pineapple juice was a smidge overpowering. It looked more like orange juice than Sangria. Be careful, the alcohol has a way of sneaking up on you. Small Ting: Codfish fritters. Crispy fried goodness with the most delicious dipping sauce. I'll quote my friend, "anything that has fritter in the name is always good" Oh and she was right...they were gooood! Big Ting: Jerk Burger with sweet potato fries. This burger was awesome! The sauce and bun were the best part. The meat was jerky but not that jerky. I was surprised that the fries were crinkle cut and not shoe string. But they still had that great sweet potato flavor. I have no complaints about the food. Then why the 3 stars you ask? The service could have been much better. There was a large party of 12 people sitting near us. Apparently the focus was more about them than anyone else in the restaurant. Unfortunate. The poor service this time won't stop me from coming back. I believe in second chances. I know they can redeem themselves. Plus I have to have an excuse to try their Red Sangria. Ya mon!
My boyfriend had been raving about this place and when we finally went I was just underwhelmed. The food was good but nothing spectacular. I got ox-tail soup which was pretty good. The atmosphere is nice and the waitress was helpful. My boyfriend admitted that the chef must have been changed since he last went since many of his favorite items were no longer on the menu and he also agreed that the food was nothing to rave about. Overall, a solid place to eat but really nothing to go out of your way for.
I got your coconuts right here. Decided to have our quarterly team lunch here. Ordered the screwdriver drink and the ox tail and chicken entree. Drink could be stronger. As for the lunch plate, wow, hold me down, that ox tail is GOOD. Fall off the bone deliciously GOOD. I could eat a tub of that. Flavored well with the perfect Caribbean spices and the accompanied plantains was a touch of paradise to the taste buds! I highly recommend this restaurant for a lunch gathering. Heck, I would go here for dinner too, why not. 4 solid stars. I am a fan of Coconuts and so should you.
This place is amazing! It is hard to find authentic and tasty Caribbean food in the bay area, and this place delivers. If the weather permits, make sure to sit outside on the patio. I highly recommend the Curried Goat. The sauce is one of a kind, the meat is always tasty and the portion is generous. The Spinach Ackee rolls are amazing as well, complete with a coconut dipping sauce. The only complaint I have about this place is that portions are kinda small, so you need to order a bunch of things. Then again, you get to taste it all, which is a good thing. You really can't go wrong here!
The service was spectacular, the food was amazing (loved the jerk chicken, so yay) and the fellow customers all very pleasant. The bartender did a great job making my cocktail not very sweet. We'll definitely be going back.
OMG! This place is amazing. True Jamaican Flavor! The ambiance felt like a Jamaican all inclusive resort. The food was terrific! I had the island screw driver to drink; well, I had 2 :). For appetizers, my girlfriend & I shared the mini beef & chicken patties as well as the pepper pot soup. It was excellent! For lunch, we shared the Jerk Chicken & Oxtail combo, which had us licking our fingers upon completion. Dessert!...Oh my God-Dessert. Please, if you must indulge, please try the pineapple cheesecake. It comes with caramelized pineapples drizzled on top of the most delicious cheesecake ever! We complemented our cheesecake with the most amazing pineapple coconut ice cream! There was nice reggae music playing in the background. We went for lunch on Saturday but I hear that there is a band on Friday & Saturday nights. We'll probably check it out this upcoming weekend.
Great food, i was less than impressed with service. The fastest wait was for the waitress to pick up the check, Front-of-house couldn't get their stuff together!  Food was great, but damn, the experience was most colored by the quality of service :/
This is an AMAZING find! The food, yummmmmmm. The drinks, so much to choose from! The service, friendly. This place isn't a fancy restaurant, has a very local feel to it. What to order: Jerk Salmon- soooo good! The jerk sauce is delicious. Coconut Martini- creamy and sweet =) The fried bananas that came with the Jerk Pork taste like candy! I definitely recommend this place!!!
Deliciousness!  I'll be coming back to try the other things on the menu.  I ordered the curried goat, and I loved the flavors - truly a party in my mouth!  Everything on my plate was cooked well, from the goat to the veggies to the delicious plantains.  (Ahh, I never could resist fried plantains!) The table next to us had some yummy looking mixed drinks that I want to try next time; might be a good place for a happy hour, actually.  I'll have to keep that in mind.  Prices weren't too bad, ranging from 11-17 bucks each for the entrees. The only thing I have to complain about is the noise level.  It's really hard to have a conversation; the din of other conversation is just so loud!  I don't know if it's because the tables are set too close together or if perhaps the walls are echo-conducive, but I had a hard time hearing my friend's words even though he was sitting right next to me. Oh well, good food that's worth coming back for!  :)
Coconuts was on of the 4 restaurants I frequented last Wednesday for my food crawl (for http://www.battledish.com ).  It was sooo delicious! The server recommended the oxtail, we we got the oxtail and jerk chicken plate. The plate was huge and full of deliciously cooked meat!  Not to mention the plantains were amazing... I love plantains!  You can see that the chef truly cares about the art of food and values the down-home goodness of doing it right.
A colorful dining getaway in the uppity streets of downtown Palo Alto.  With prominent island artwork splashed on the walls, there is also live music on the weekends from a featured band or artist.  We booked a cute and cozy private room for a group birthday party; we were also seated near the outdoor patio where the musician from Trinadad was performing.  Great Caribbean ambiance and vibe! William, one of the professional staff, was super accommodating for our group.  Since  our group was larger than 10, he sent us an email of a special family fixed priced menu, which comes with an appetizer, salad, three entrees, and three sides for just $21.50 per person!  The only thing is that they need to have the order placed 24 hours in advance, so that the chef can prepare the food.  Those who plan group events, there are always going to be some last minute "adjustments."  However, William was very easy going and even appreciated the heads-up... even after about four phone calls! Here's where I wish things were better.  The food did not wow me as much as I was hoping; some of the dishes were tasty and a hit though the entrees were a miss in flavor or in texture. The Breakdown Appetizer: Jamaican Jerk Chicken Wings, Jerk Dipping Sauce *Juicy and flavorful.  Perfectly marinated!  I licked the bones clean on this dish. Salad: Chef's Seasonal Salad Selection with Simple Fruit Vinaigrette *Your typical salad.  Nothing amazing, but healthy and fresh. Mains: Coconuts Curried Tofu with Creole Vegetable *Slightly watered down curry with chunks of tofu and green string beans and carrots.  Pretty simple dish. Tender Braised Oxtail - *Big disappointment.  The oxtail was not at all tender, as it proclaimed on the menu.  Chewy and not too flavorful (think pot roast). Jerk Salmon *Salmon with a papaya mustard sauce on top, which tasted like a better version of mayonnaise.  There wasn't enough jerk seasoning on the salmon to give it the same taste as the jerk wings. Sides: Coconut Rice and Beans * mixed in together.  Yum! Fried Plantain * drool...  great soft texture and caramelization on the outside Sweet Potato Fries *delicious... I wish we had these to snack on earlier in the meal. Sangria: red and white - oh my goodness, can you say strong AND delicious?  The white Sangria had Chardonnay, Brandy, and vodka - yikes.  Pour me another glass! Despite some of the entrees being a bit disappointing, we all had a great time.  Service was hospitable and friendly, and the setting is a wonderful way to relax and have fun with friends. The musician from Trinidad even sang and did a Caribbean "Happy Birthday" for my friend that night.  Don't forget to cap off your evening with a cheesy group photo in front of the Island at Sunset painting on the wall. 3.5*first impression.  Will definitely be open to a second try.
Yelp advised me that Coconuts was a great place to get Caribbean food. The decor reminds me of the places in Belize. It is super bright and colorful. The food came out in under 10 mins and the waitress apologized for the wait. My fiancee and I ordered: Ox tail: amazing! The meat literally fell off the bone. It was so tender and was packed with flavor. Chicken: amazingly tender and juicy. Tons of flavor as well! Plantains and coconut rice w/ beans: all the plantains were cooked well, no hard parts (I hate it when some of them are hard). I was never a big fan of coconut rice, so I ate a tad here and there. My tastes buds were very happy with the food. Bill totaled $40.
Coconuts will definitely be my first when it comes to Caribbean food mon! Ok that was cheesy. I came to this establishment a few weeks ago for my girl friend's birthday. When I first walked in I was immediately welcomed with bright colors and some island music. I made my way to the group room that was charming but claustrophobic. Our waiter started speaking to us in a Jamaican accent, I definitely dug that! Immediately he asked us if we wanted drinks and our friends yelled out "$2 Red Stripes till 8!" We had 2 minutes and secured our beer orders. We didn't even have to sweat since our waiter was way cool enough to order us another round for $2 a pop after 8! I always wanted to try Jamaican Jerk Chicken so I ordered the dish on the menu which came with peanut seasoned rice, plantains, and steam vegetables. The Chicken was incredibly tender, juicy, and full of flavor. I fancied the combination of tangy and savory. As if the chicken wasn't good by itself, the habenero sauce topped on it gave it a spicy sustaining kick! Strangely the rice reminded me of a Vietnamese comfort food my mommy makes called "Soi" I loved it. Even the vegetables were worth devouring...perfectly cooked and seasoned.  I have had a plantain in my life and i have to say I am a fan although bananas are my least favorite fruit. All in all I had a great experience here, superb service, splendid food, and the birthday girl was all smiles! I will make an effort to come back to Palo Alto once of these days to try their other offerings.
Coconuts was fortuitous choice for dinner last weekend. Faced with horrendous traffic, we decided to stop, take a break, and eat in downtown Palo Alto. On a Friday night, the atmosphere was lively, with a entertaining musician and a vibrant crowd, and we quickly got to placing our order. Jerk chicken and ox tail - a combo dish offering two Coconuts favorites. I found the jerk spices flavorful but was disappointed by the dry, white chicken meat.  The ox tail, on the other hand, was delicious with perfect flavor and fall off the bone tenderness. I'd order this in a heartbeat and loved it over rice. Jerk salmon - similar in flavor to the chicken, the salmon was cooked much better. Moist and flaky, it was a nice preparation. Overall, we had a nice meal at Coconuts. If you like Back-a-Yard but want a nicer atmosphere, this place is a good choice. Coconuts accepts credit cards, including American Express.
Amazing eatery and very friendly atmosphere.  It's been a while since I've had Caribbean food and it was a wonderful treat to eat here. We ordered a bunch of appetizers.... codfish fritters, irie jerk wings, and curried garbanzo avocado guacamole... yum!  every appetizer had their own distinct flavor.... For dinner, I had the oxtail........ this dish is definitely worth trying, slow roasted and falls right off the bone.  Other dishes we ordered were the jerk chicken, jerk salmon, and one of their specials, slow roasted pork.  All the dishes came with crunchy, well seasoned saute veggies, and either rice and beans or potatoes.  Everything was very well cooked, seasoned, and paired with the perfect sides to enhance the main ingredient. I highly recommend this place.  We came on a Saturday and they had live music.  Awesome!
Luv luv luv this place!  Man, I could have me some ox tail, jerk chicken and mac'n'cheese right now... Coconuts Caribbean restaurant is a good place to have a unique lil meal of comfort food.  It's not healthy, service is hit and miss and it's not too cheap but, it's gooood.  I like meeting friends there as it's a crowd pleaser and there's a parking garage right across the street. It gets busy so make reservations if possible. See ya there!
My friends and I ordered the coconut shrimp and blue crab dip to share. For entrees, I had the jerk shrimp cobb salad with a side of plantains, and the other two shared the jerk chicken - the spice definitely has a kick to it, but I enjoyed it. This was my first time going to a Caribbean restaurant, so I was satisfied, but my friends said they'd had better. I am docking stars because the service was spotty. They brought a white sangria to my friend, instead of the passion fruit juice she ordered - but swore the order was correct and did not offer to exchange. I also had an encounter with the waitress who claimed I ordered the rice & beans side, when all I did was ask what type of beans they used. Packed, lively atmosphere with good lighting. I'd probably return again, if someone else would be willing to join ;)
Food is excellent! 4 star because we waited a while until the waiter came and took our order. But after wards food came really fast! Jerk Chicken Wings were EXCELLENT!! Oxtail MUST ORDER! Love the Brown Rice!! Forgot what kind of salad but it was really GOOD!! I recommend groups so that you can order food to share.
While I was walking down Ramona from University looking for the Coconuts Caribbean Restaurant, a very distinct fun happy steel drum sound of music comes toward me.  As I walked closer, a live band was playing Caribbean steel drums in the court yard of the restaurant where I planned to go.  Wow, it was a surprise. This restaurant is really fun.  They have two big dinner rooms and a big patio with outdoor sittings.  The musicians were playing music in the court yard.  I was told you can bring dogs and dine in the court yard. The food is really good.  For vegan they have curried garbanzo avocado guacamole as appetizer, and Tofu with jerk source.  The size of serving is big and presentation is pretty.    The price is very reasonable and the service is excellent. I highly recommend this place.  It not only has good food, the atmosphere and the music really set you mood for the rest of the evening. Waidy
"Put the lime in the coconut and drink it all up You put the lime in the coconut and drink it all up You put the lime in the coconut and drink it all up You put the lime in the coconut and call the doctor woke him up I said Doctor! Is there nothing I can take I said Doctor! To relieve this bellyache I said Doctor! Is there nothing I can take I said Doctor! To relieve this bellyache " (by BAHA) Yep!!!!  "Coconuts" is the cure my friends You can not go wrong if you order the Oxtail and Jerk Chicken Combo.  It is simply delicious!!!  Their keylime tart dessert is soo good.  The service is excellent. Not too many peeps in the dining area but more are gathered where the bar is (where the tv is on and The World Series is on "Go Yankees") "Put the lime in the coconut and drink it all up You put the lime in the coconut and drink it all up You put the lime in the coconut and drink it all up You put the lime in the coconut and call the doctor woke him up I said Doctor! Is there nothing I can take I said Doctor! To relieve this bellyache I said Doctor! Is there nothing I can take I said Doctor! To relieve this bellyache ........
2.5 star average rating, with the breakdown below: Before dinner: Gosh, I can't help but feel very disappointed for the lack of service that I received while planning for a friend's birthday party. When I had first called the restaurant a couple weeks back to see what reservations would be like if we booked a party of 20, a young gentleman on the phone was really nice to me, telling me that I either had a choice of going a la carte or family-style. But for family-style, it would cost $22.50 per person before tax and gratuity, which I didn't really want to do because some of the folks in our party eat a lot, whereas others don't. I felt that it might be unfair for them, so I told the guy that we'd probably prefer a la carte. He told me to call back after we get an estimate on the number of folks coming, and that was the end of that. Two days later, I called back and the manager of the restaurant happened to pick up. He told me that I didn't have a choice when it came to the menu and that we had to do family-style. I said fine, and told him that we're expecting 20 people. He then said that he would email me to confirm the reservation, as well as send over the pre-fix menu. I repeated back to him what he said just to confirm details and he totally sounded annoyed! Way to be, mister. Anyway, I received the confirmation email, but no menu was attached. I then had to call the restaurant back a couple days later to follow up on the situation, and lo and behold, the manager picked up the phone and once again was giving me nasty attitude. Yippee. When I read the menu, I wasn't sure whether or not I had to choose dishes for everyone in our party or if everyone chose dishes for themselves. I called back again just to clarify, and the young gentleman who helped me in the first place was really nice, saying that I didn't necessarily need to go with their pre-fix menu if I'd prefer not to. And right when he said that, the manager takes the phone and starts telling me about how the pre-fix menu was mandatory. Oh goodness gracious, I wanted to seriously bang my head against the wall. Our party of 20 shrunk to 16 because some people found out that they couldn't make it to dinner. I didn't think it would be a big deal since most restaurants like to know if MORE people show up, not less. But just to be courteous, I called the restaurant just to give them an updated number today. And of course with my luck, the manager picks up and gives me a lecture about how I can't change my number, etc. etc. Seriously? At least I frickin' called!!! During dinner: I absolutely dreaded coming to the restaurant because of the unpleasant experience I had with planning for the event. But I'm glad I did, because the server who was assigned to our party was awesome. He was attentive, NICE, and brought each course out at great timing. The family-style dining did work out, with some leftovers for a couple of us to take home at the end of the evening. It came out to be around $26 per person including tax and gratuity. The birthday girl loves Sprinkles cupcakes, so her boyfriend brought in 2 dozen. Our server got the guy playing reggae music to play Happy Birthday as he brought out a Sprinkles cupcake for the birthday girl on a plate. And then afterward, he surprised all our guests with cupcakes on a huge platter. Very thoughtful. So my breakdown of stars goes as follows: 4 stars for: - our server - the hostess - corn festival appetizer - jerk salmon - not making it a big deal that some ppl were arriving late 3 stars for: - jerk chicken - oxtail - curried garbanzo with avocado guacamole 2 stars for: - getting 2 different sets of information from 2 different workers while planning for the event 1 star for: - manager's attitude throughout the planning process Therefore, 2.5 stars for the whole experience. And about a year ago, I also had given this place 2.5 stars. We were just never meant to be.
2.5 stars. Our food took FOREVER to come out. I started the timer on my watch and it stopped at 39.45... Read more 
Hello my little coconutty Caribbean friend...how are you today? Why yes, your jerk chicken is spicy. I love spicy. Your oxtail though? Just a little too greasy. Oh how you make up for it with your luscious plantains, how I wish there were more on my plate!. Oh, and your rice and beans has that subtle coconut flavor. How original of you! How delightful! I'll just sit here and drink this yummy red sangria while nibbling on your succulent chicken legs...shall I? Oh, now, all good things much come to an end. Sadly, your finish, the coconut creme brulee does disappoint, both in texture and flavor, but you gave it the old college try. I'll be back, my lovely bamboo accented restaurant, don't you worry. For your plantains, if nothing else...
I read the reviews on yelp for most of the restaurants around this area, and decided to try out this place. Just off the main drag of downtown Palo Alto, it seems like more of a hidden gem with many local regulars. I wouldn't say this is a romantic place, as the decor is ooh so cheesy! The service was on point, but nothing special there. I'd say ALL four stars go to the AMAZING food. We had the jerk tofu and ribs. Such great spice, perfect portions... to sum it up, I'd come here every week if I lived close enough! To drink I tried the sangria which I normally love, however I wouldn't recommend it. It was waaay to sweet and tasted like pure passion fruit juice. Piece of advice.... stick to their wine menu, instead of their cocktails.
Coconuts is so good that I went there two times in a row in a recent visit to Palo Alto. It was easily the best food I've had in the last few months. The Jerk Chicken came with an extra spicy habanero sauce and great "jerk" style seasoning (which in of itself is spicy enough), cooked thoroughly and quite satisfying. The fried plantains were also amazing. The staff is also extremely friendly and helpful. Would recommend to anyone trying to explore some Caribbean cuisine.
This is a lovely restaurant which deserves a huge clientel. It's that good. The place has a cheery decor. Good enough for a date but not overly romantic. Think bright and Caribean..Many (all?)  of the servers seem to have come from the Caribbean as well. That adds a nice touch of authenticity. The great news in this place is the food and the drinks. We had the Curried Shrimp and the Jerk Chicken. Each came with a different kind of rice. One a plain tice and the other a rice and bean mixture that was quite tasty. Plaintains, vegetables, and mango chutney were also accompanyments. We were given a choice of hot or mild and went for the hot. That's the default option. They do mean hot. OK it's not vindaloo hot but it's the hottest jerk chicken I've ever had. Wonderful! The spicing was perfect too. The jerk chicken is one breast-sized. The curried shrimp wasn't as hot.but it sure was tasty. The bar drinks were imaginative. My only complaint is their website doesn't list them so I can't give you the details. The pometranete martini was awesome. I had a tea concoction with chamomile tea, rum, and blue curacao. I'd never thought of putting tea and rum together and it's odd to be drinking blue tea. The resulting taste was quite pleasant. For dessert we had the reason you must come to this place, if no other: the sweet potato pudding. Wow. Let me say that again. Awesome. Wow. Amazing. Competes with chocolate and just may win. Yes, that good. We had Caribean Coffee (coffee, dark rum, whipped cream, and a cherry) to top it off. A perfect balance of strong coffee and the sweet pudding. Service was excellent. The waiter and servers knew the menu and could accurately describe dishes. They genuinely seemed to like working there. Food came out very promptly. A one star off for bringing us a bill without being asked. The place wasn't crowded. There was no need to turn the table. In all a good dinning experience.
Carribbean food is something I'm not too familiar with.  All I really know is 'JERK'.  If you want to know something about their cuisine you would probably have to start with their 'jerk' items.  Coconuts was no different.  The jerk chicken was really great.  The three friends that were my company for dinner also ordered jerk chicken. The atmosphere is fairly relaxed and there is weird happenings outside the window (it was my first time dining in Palo Alto).  Although, I will say that the vegetables tasted like hotel/airplane vegetables.  I'm not sure if it's the spices or the vegetables themselves, but I got that distinct feeling.  Not that there was anything bad about them.  The vegetables were crisp and fresh.  The flavor just gave me a response that I was in a hotel.
*3.5 Stars*  This restaurants reminds me of when Taqueria Los Charros opened up their more pricier and bigger version - Los Charros on El Camino. I ordered the Jerk Chicken Wrap which really didn't taste like jerk chicken.  It wasn't flavorful and had more lettuce than meat.  They give you a choice of ranch or Italian dressing for the dipping sauce.  It would tasted a whole lot better if they had just given jerk sauce with it. We also waited at least 30 minutes to get served for 3 people.  Other customers who had been seated after us, received their food first.  We asked our server why there was a long wait for our food.  She replied that they had only been open for 3 days at that time and the kitchen staff was still working out the kinks.  I'll give them the benefit of the doubt that the restaurant will improve but for now, I'll stick with Back-a-Yard in EPA for now!
I can't believe I am giving this place 3 stars!?! But, until they get their game down right, they gotta work for those stars. Typically, I would give a mom and pop 4 stars because they are getting their hustle on, but for all the reasons, Jen S. stated, I have to say, this place doesn't hold a light to their Menlo Park location on Willow. To me, the prices are higher and the portions are smaller compared to their other spot. That is understandable, given the new start up costs and probably the higher lease cost, but really? 20 bucks for a plate that is 13 at the other? with less portions? I hope they survive, but we will see.
I can't really speak to the prices because I came here for a company recruiting event. I love Back A Yard, and I have to say, I enjoy the yumminess, simplicity, and inexpensiveness of that place over Coconuts (which I'm almost positive is more expensive). That being said, the jerk chicken is still delicious, and the oxtail was memorable.  It's a classier place than Back A Yard, and I can understand why they opened it, but I'm still more likely to get take out from Back A Yard than to come in for sit down here.
I was so proud to be one of the first to try Chef Robert new restaurant , downtown Palo alto.After the huge success of backayard cafe , east Palo alto, Chef Robert is finally going 2 step up, a real restaurant with nice cocktail and great tasty food. good luck to you
Cool date spot, In terms of decoration a little bit nicer than Mango Carribean which is down the street. Wow, I just wish the 3 Palo Alto Caribbean (Back-a-yard, Coconuts, Mango) restaurants would combine their best traits and that would be like the ultimate. Just when someone decided to put cheese, avocado, and bacon on a burger. Damm. Genius. Food itself - Back a yard - my mouth is drooling just thinkin about their oxtails / jerk pork Decor - Coconuts - very cool original artwork Location - Coconuts - you got like some bars right next door. + Back a yard can get shady at night. Atmosphere - Mango is super chill with their happy hour red stripe specials.
I'd made a reservation on OpenTable about 30 minutes before we arrived (on a Saturday evening), but the maitre d' didn't seem to use that system or care about it.. still, she was friendly and started setting up for our group of 5, who were parking their cars. She was really nice and told me the specials and made some dish recommendations and kept me company while I waited for my friends. Right as the 5th person in our group arrived, another single girl came into the restaurant asking for a table for 2. The maitre d' promptly gave her our table, which was 2 smaller tables pushed together, by pulling them apart. What the heck.. that was our table. And I'd been there for 10 minutes. Then she brusquely told us that there was a table outside. We went to check it out - it wasn't even cleaned off, and there were leftovers on the table still. It was a chilly night and even with the heat lamps, we decided for a table inside. She asked for a few minutes and set another table for us. Shouldn't the first thing a server does when her table gets sat be to come and fill our waters? At the very LEAST? I don't think this happened for a good 5-10 minutes. We were lucky we had menus to look at. When she did come around and I said, we just need 2 minutes to finalize our decision, it was another 5-10 before she came back. I saw her go around to her other tables several times and kind of ignore us. Otherwise she made some good recommendations in terms of what we should get to complement our meal (e.g. 1 side order of brown rice). Food was pretty ok.. almost the saving grace. The menu spells its sections with funny Caribbean pronunciations ("Dem Big Tings", "Dem Sweet Tings", etc). "Dem Big Things" are shared dishes, supposed to serve 2 people. I didn't find they were any bigger than a normal entree at a restaurant.. good thing none of us were super hungry. We got: Sides: Plaintains - excellent. Crispy, sweet, delicious. Corn bread - the maitre d' specifically told me they are sweet & moist, just like I like 'em. They were sweet alright.. but extremely dry. I mentioned this to our server and she said she'd tell the kitchen, but we didn't get any replacement or compensation. Brown rice - very moist & good. Needed as a complement to most dishes. "Dem Big Tings": Chicken jerk - Pretty good, just spicy enough, fairly tender & moist chicken. Curried Goat - Good flavor, a little spicier than chicken jerk so you'll need brown rice to neutralize it. But there was just so much bone & tendons to get around. I'm Chinese and fairly used to having to work for my meat, but this was almost too much. Chicken crab pelau - Not much crab to speak of. The chicken was good.. similar to chicken jerk but more spices; it was a little on the dry side in this dish. There was rice mixed in with this dish as well. "Dem Sweet Tings": Warm Sweet Potato pudding - not so much a pudding as a piece of pie, with ice cream on top. Not complaining.. this one went fast (we got one for the whole table), there was no politeness around who got the last bite. This tasted delicious but it could've used a larger scoop of ice cream, and the pie was a little hard, almost like an old piece of pie about to go stale. Not too bad pricewise.. came out to about $15pp without tip. They accept credit cards but no more than 3 per group, so we had to re-figure out how to split the bill.
We went to Coconuts for dinner with a group of friends on Fri night. Jerk chicken wings were definitely the most favorite item on our table. Rest of the food we ordered including Curried chicken, Shrimp creole, Boneless jerk pork, Mac and cheese, Rice and beans and Fried Plantains was great - 4 stars. But what made me drop a star was their Service. Even though our server was really nice and patient but the service throughout the night was very slow and uncoordinated. First one of us ordered a beer but then we noticed they served sangria and instead ordered a pitcher of sangria for the table and cancelled the beer. But guess what? they still brought the beer. Later after we were done paying, we looked through the bill and noticed that we were charged for an extra side of fried plantains and rice and beans which we didn't order or eat. But we figured it was too much hassle to try to find someone and get our money back. So note for future, double check your bill before you pay and try not to go on a busy (weekend) night..
Peter H. and I dropped in for lunch yesterday.  I knew it was going to be great when I found a big fat parking spot right in front of the restaurant.  We were seated right away and both picked Jerked Chicken with a salad. The salad was A-OK - nothing too fancy except a garbanzo bean dressing, which was interesting, but the Jerked Chicken was great.  In case you are unfamiliar, picture drumsticks and thighs covered with garlicky, spicy rub and served with a zesty, garlicky sauce.  Did I mention the garlic?
I had never had Caribbean food before coming to Coconut's, but I loved it.  The atmosphere is great (bamboo and murals on the walls, etc.) and the food is delicious.  I got the jerk chicken and loved it, even though I'm not usually one for eating such spicy dishes.  My fiance got the Irie stew and loved it.  Really great place!
Really loved the place... The food was amazingly good . Some of my fav's are Jerk Chicken, Goat Curry , Ox Tail curry , the Pina Colada and so on... A must try and a cool environment
Went here for an extended work lunch on a Friday and the whole experience was superb. Because we're all workaholics, everyone ordered cocktails and NO ONE didn't finish to the last sip. They were so tasty! Lots of Caribbean style drinks to please!! I recommend the white sangria and the banana boat. The food was great! Everyone thoroughly enjoyed their food. Again, no one had a single complaint. Most people ordered some type of jerk dish, but there were even TONS of possibilities in that category. Jerk Chicken (of course), jerk salmon, jerk tofu (my FAV), jerk veggies, jerk burger. you name it, they jerk it! The atmosphere really makes you feel more relaxed and in the Caribbean vibe from the moment you walk through the door. The owner and chef is from the Caribbean and stays true to the dishes of the area. Our server had also recently moved from Jamaica and was also an amazing bartender. Overall our party of 8 had a wonderful time and everyone has been singing this place's praises since we left. They also do catering and we're hiring them soon for sure! Just be sure you're NOT IN A HURRY because they really embrace the whole Jamaican vibe = very laid back. The server told us all about growing up in Jamaica and stuff and the restaurant was completely packed. Just order one of the delicious cocktails and I promise it won't feel as long. We were there for like 2 hours...
I am sure my experience was probably an outlier and they are usually better than this but man did they drop the ball. I ordered the steak and crab cake combo which took a little long to come out. Luckily they had an NBA game on TV so I didn't mind as much and I am willing to wait for a nice meal. So with my raised expectations compounded with the building hunger, I expected a bomb diggity meal. I cut open the steak and it was straight raw; I like steaks rare but this was like sashimi so they had to recook it. The crab cake had a great flavor with the curry but then there's bits of shells in it which is annoying. Again, this is probably one of their bad nights with Murphy's Law and hopefully I just took a bad one for the team so no one will go thorugh the same ordeal.
Good restaurant! Came here before an Elite Event and was surprised that the restaurant was completely dead at 5:15pm. My boyfriend and I had to get an employees attention before we were seated, I guess they don't expect anyone when they open.. We were given menus and water by our server who was very funny and who checked up on us regularly. My boyfriend ordered the oxtail and jerk chicken combination for $16 and I ordered the Caesar Salad ($6) and a side of Mac n Cheese ($3.50)... (I"m not a big fan of Caribbean food but the boyfriend is haha...) Oxtail & Jerk Chicken: The oxtail fell right off the bone.. it was delicious (I tried a bit.. mmm). I'm not a fan of chicken but the bf said it tasted really good and kept talking about how it was cooked perfectly where it stayed moist. Caesar Salad: It was good. They put a lot of grated cheese on top but oh well.. nothing I can't scrape off. Mac n Cheese: I think overall this made me really enjoy my meal. I've never had REAL mac n cheese till now and I totally love it! It was baked in a dish where the cheese was melty, creamy, gooey mmm... Definitely try the mac n cheese.. plus their "side" of mac n cheese could of fed me easily for dinner.. it was huge! I ordered coffee after my meal and was surprised when the server brought me out a new cup after he saw that I was finished with my first. How nice (: Overall it was a great meal, cute restaurant, delicious mac n cheese for ONLY $30!!! niceeee
2nd time here. Ginger beer was not the typical beer with suds. I like ginger but this one was too sugary. Where's the alcohol? Raspberry Hurricane was good. Really enjoyed the Oxtail. Curry Goat was spicy. I was sweating but kept eating it. Plantain was good. Jerk pork a bit tough. Key lime pie was quite good. Corn bread was dry. Red beans & rice was typical.  Still liked the place and the family-style atmosphere.
When I heard that Back A Yard was opening another restaurant in downtown PA I was pretty excited.  I have to say, I've been there twice since it opened and I've loved it.  I see a lot of people commenting on the prices between Back A Yard and Coconuts, but this ain't the same game.  All I have to say is location, seating, and a bathroom. The last time I was there I had the ox tail...awesome.  I've never eaten ox tail besides my mom's Filipino version, and sorry mom but you just got beat.  The sweet potato creme brulee destroyed me.  I'm not sure if it's on the menu or not, but ask for a pomegranate soda (7-up and pomegranate syrup)...it's really good. This place is totally different from Back A Yard in my mind since I always have to order my food to go.
LOUD, but fun.  Very casual and well priced Caribbean food.  Goat curry is a stand-out.  Cocktails good too!
First off... I love carribean food, and thus am highly critical of it as well. I've come here for my last two birthdays. They handle large parties well by requiring family style ordering. Prepare yourself for a feast! TONS of food, and pretty easy on the wallet. They do carribean food right! I've explored a ton of things on the menu and have not encountered a single item that was sub-par. I have always experienced excellent customer service as well. For both my birthdays, the chef came out to greet and everything was done to perfection. Can't recommend this place enough. Heard they have some good happy hour options as well. Gonna have to explore that soon (although the actual bar area is pretty small).
This used to be the Huki Lau, a tropical Tiki-type bar. I love island bars, so when the place shuttered I was a little sad. Then I saw Coconuts come in, and I was curious. We came here as part of a large group, and they were good about seating us. At the bar waiting for the table I was able to order a Dark and Stormy, made with ginger beer that was created on premises. That was bomb, I love me a good D&S. The offerings here are different from Mango, and the reason for that is because this place focuses solely on Jamaican dishes. So, you won't see roti bread on the menu here, because that's more of a Trinidad thing (ting). But they do have jerk everything, including goat (which I highly recommend).
Been here maybe 4 or 5 times and everytime the food and service has been consistently good. Stewed OXTAILS is a must. Nice and tender, well seasoned, and the gravy actually compliments the meat and not just a broken sauce to keep it moist. I recommend it with white rice. The fried whole fish is also good. I had it twice and I can honestly say the fish outshined most of the other dishes, better than the jerk chicken. The jerk chicken here is usually over cooked but the jerk pork is da biznizz Bar service is quick and pours a heavy hand. Rum punch always does the trick. Swirly Bird a.k.a "$1000 drink"  is better. Parking usually sucks out there, you can try the parking garage across the street but if its full goodluck. Servings are now served family style, so 1 entree will serve 2 at least. Dinner for 2 w/ drinks about $50, BTW island rythms playing all night long.
The ONLY reason I am giving this place four stars, and not five, is that my taste-buds are pathetically intolerant of hot & spicy, and some of the dishes should come with a warning!  Our waiter was attentive, and friendly . . . I would just suggest that they ask customers whether they'd prefer their dish mild or spicy, because some of us can't handle the heat! My salad was delicious, the vegetarian tofu dish was tasty but still a little painful after scrapping the offending spices off and downing a couple of hurricanes, and my water, and my friends water.  My friend, on the otherhand, is a fan of all things spicy, and really enjoyed his meat-dish (sorry, wasn't paying attention to the details of his entree). He also liked the martini that he ordered, and especially enjoyed the plantains. Interesting artwork, and a fun atmosphere . . . I really like this place!
I've gone to Coconuts on numerous occasions, mostly for lunches and always left full and happy. I usually get jerk chicken with fried plantains, but tried the salmon, ox tail, tofu, shrimps and pretty much everything on the menu. Absolutely love the fried plantains - next time I think I'll just order a huge plate of that! The chicken and salmon are still my staples, well spiced, not over cooked and their rice and beans is sooo yummy. Not a huge fan of ox tail, but I guess you have to develop a taste for it:) Not crazy about desserts here - I've had coconut creme brulee which came out really cold. I guess they just took it out of the fridge and torched the top. I'd prefer a warm version, but maybe it's just me. The service is nice, smiling and very laid back. I guess that's Jamaican style:)
Delicious food, great noisy environment, all-around fantastic spot.
More and more, Palo Alto food is really disappointing me.  You would think with Back a Yard right in Coconuts' backyard, that the two would be comparable but that's not the case at all. I started out with the Codfish fritters which were really salty and didn't taste fresh.  I don't know how popular of an appetizer this is but it had striking similarities to the frozen fish my dad got from Costco with the murky taste and heavy feeling.  It comes with creole sauce which tastes good but because the fish is already so salty, you just don't want to use this.  Unfortunately I chose this dish because nothing else in the appetizer section stood out. I then moved on to the two popular items, the Beef Oxtail and Jerk Chicken.  The oxtail was really tender and had a lot of tendon to it.  The chicken was dry and I wasn't a fan of their sauce.  They also like to put a lot of cinnamon in the rice which threw me off.  I did like the veggies though; they were cooked to a crunch which I prefer.  We also got a side of the corn muffins which has a nice sweet and sticky top layer but once you get past that, it's all dry from there on out. The people here are terrific and very friendly.  My man and I were sharing the food and usually they apply a $2 split charge but they didn't for us.  When ordering I asked the waiter if he recommended the Bammy (yucca cake) and he immediately said -- appreciate the honesty.  We ordered the right amount of food for the two of us but for some reason, we felt really heavy and not in a good way after. The restaurant looks like what you would imagine a Caribbean restaurant in the U.S. would look like.  It's colorful and has tropical decor.  I didn't have any drinks tonight but the alcohol menu does look enticing with their fruity concoctions.  The only bad thing is that the  location of this place is on an unpopulated side street which explained why it was just two of us at one point during our meal.  Sad for the restaurant, romantic for me.
What a find, so right up my alley.  Nothing fancy but straight solid.  Smooth Caribbean rhythms and beats, local art work with the "islands" theme, and superb food and drinks.  They definitely deliver the Island Flavor, in this joint.  And I went on a late, cold weeknight, imagine being here on a hot summer's night, sitting out on the patio.  I can't wait to come back. Not terribly hungry, 3 of us sit down for a casual dinner and order 3 straight entrees.  I order the Braised Ox Tail and it was very good.  Super tender, great hearty portions and very unique flavors, all contributed to this dish.  The meat was accompanied with a Coconut Rice n Beans, Fried Plantains, and sauted veggies.  All were solidly executed.  I can't really explain the flavor in the braised meat cuz it was so unique, but it definitely had a nice balance of a little sweetness, perfectly salted and pungently spiced.  They cook with soul in this kitchen. I was told the Jerk Pork (special of the day) was darn good, with tender chunks that were vibrantly seasoned.  I did taste my cousin's Curried Goat cuz I was hella curious and it was suprisingly delicious.  Braised til shredded, it was aggresively spiced and seasoned without being cloying.  The curry was not one would associate with the Asian variety, whether Indian, Thai or Malaysian but it's own unique flavor profile.  It did share the similiar qualities of blending spices with chiles and coconut milk.  And the goat had enough of a distinguishing flavor and texture that you were reminded that it wasn't lamb or beef. Great food, very accomodating service and Mojitos and Calypso Coffees a flowin', I was feelin' a bit IRIE, I must say.  Entrees ranged from $10-$16 and drinks were about $5-$7.  To say the least, I be bok mon.
Went here for lunch today after I typed in "Puerto Rican food" on my Yelp app and Coconuts showed up...and am I ever so glad it did. We ordered the crab dip for an appetizer which was super delicious. It was a pretty dip and it kind of reminded me of creme brulee and I felt the need to "break" the top. We also ordered the pulled pork, shrimp creole, fried plantains, and a side of rice. Everything was delicious! I love the roasted sweet potatoes that come with the pork. I seriously couldn't get enough of it. The shrimp creole with the side of rice was another super mega delicious with tostones! We also ordered a pitcher of mojitos and it came out in a LARGE pitcher. I am not used to seeing restaurants serve this much liquor in a pitcher unless it's beer. Oh how delighted we were when this came to our table. Instead of dessert we decided to get a pitcher of white sangria (drink much?) and this was a perfect ending to our fantastic meal! Can't wait to come back for "Crab Thursday's!"
They should've called this place "Ginger" Caribbean Restaurant & Bar! I was told that the owners of this place is the same as that of Back-A-Yard and so our expections were pretty high.  Don't get me wrong...the food was good, jerk was tasty and the plantains....mmmm....but I would prefer B-A-Y over it any day! The jerk here tasted like it had a lot of ginger, and not as spicy (I ordered spicy) like B-A-Y.  But I'm not mad at it!  The coconut rice, the beef oxtail and curried goat was just as awesome and that coconut creme brulee was the perfect finish to our meal!
Wow, already great reviews and it's only the 2nd night this place is open. Had dinner at Coconut with some friends each with a different background, such that we could have been an old school Benetton commercial (for those of us old enough to remember those). Every single one of us finished every bite of our entree and dessert.  And every mixed drink that was ordered was slurped down to the last drop (until another round was ordered). My husband had the adobo steak and I had the jerk chicken/salmon combo - On the drive home we couldn't help but talk about how each one was cooked perfectly. The server was still getting to know the menu so he had to go check on a few things when questions came up (like what sides come with the combo, if a certain item was available, etc) but all in all, very professional and courteous. Obviously experienced, because he didn't get frazzled at questions, simply double checked after getting everyone orders and came right back  with a positive answer and was as calm and helpful as ever. The desserts were delicious, we shared the key lime pie, the sweet potato creme brulee, and something listed as a "trifle" which had pound cake, berries, and whipped cream. All were yummy. Entree size was just enough. Meats were cooked perfect for their particular type (beef, poultry, fish), even the veggies (green beans in my case) were cooked just crisp enough where they weren't raw but had great color with just enough crunch to it. Desserts were "just enough" - you got the delicious sweet chaser after a zesty meal without the guilt because the presentation was humble and not too too sweet. We will definitely go back to try again and see if things are consistent. But for tonight, I'm "happy full".
I'm already a big fan of Mango Cafe and I found Coconuts meeting my expectations of a tasty, hearty, Caribbean meal. Food: I had the Jerk Chicken wrap which was a perfect portion of tender jerk chicken, greens and jerk sauce. Coworkers had half soup/sandwich of jerk chicken soup and bbq chicken sandwich; pork sandwich with choice of fried/salad - these all looked delicious. White sangria is indeed good. Decor: Maybe because I still have Hukilau in my mind, but I couldn't warm up to the decor. I will say that it's an improvement on the ambiance from the previous decor. Staff: Our waiter was very friendly and the manager came to check on us a couple times. Excellent service. Surprisingly, the place was very empty for Friday lunch time. I'm not sure if this is because people just do not know about it yet. In any case, I think Coconuts has great potential to be a hit!
The first time I came here was about a year ago for a friend's bday dinner, on that night there was really live!  Great band playing live Caribbean music, we were with lots of friends laughing and talking.  I don't recall the food and customer service for that night was so long ago, however, I came back with my husband on a date night, and this evening really rubbed me the wrong way.  We walked in and the waiter smelled like BO. I know that seems petty, but it was sooo strong I couldn't even smell anything else, it literally filled the room.  Not really something you want to smell when you're about to eat.  I was sooo relieved that he only sat us and brought our drinks. So as far as food goes, the jerk chicken I ordered was extremely salty and dry.  The beans and rice it came with was dry and really flavorless.  I liked the plantain. The customer service was ok, our waiter looked annoyed and like he wished he was some where else. All in all I wasn't too thrilled about this place, but I'd be willing to try it again and see if I would have a different experience, but based on this experience 2 & 1/2 stars : /
Coconuts = BEEF OXTAIL.  If you love oxtail, then you're going to love this restaurant! I don't know too much about Caribbean food but their jerk chicken, beef oxtail,  and plantains, are tasty!  The decor of the restaurant is a bit loud with the bright colors but maybe that's what the Caribbean is all about? Who knows!  They do have some cool wall paintings as well.  They also have an outdoor patio which is great on a summery evening.  It's a nice restaurant for group settings or dinner for two. The service can be slow; it's not a place for you to eat and get the hell out of there.  It's a spot to chill out, enjoy your food and company.  It's located in the cutest part of downtown Palo Alto.  Very nice neighborhood. I've enjoyed each and every visit.
Ate on a Saturday at lunch.  Loved this place.  Good cocktails, great curries and the collard greens were awesome.  If you have that "Island feeling", give this place a try!
we jes came here for a goin away lunch for 2 of us that are resigning from work and we had a lovely lunch party! our waitress was so helpful and attentive and they took good care of us all! the appetizer samplers were delicious and the lunch specials, jerk chicken wrap to salmon wrap were bomb! 5 stars indeed
they have some bomb jerk chicken!!!!!!!!!!
I can still hear the steel drums ringing in my ears. . .it's been 2 weeks. The good: patties - chicken or beef.  The pastry is moist and flavorful.  Jerk wings - spicy, wish I had more than one.  Rice & beans - unexpectedly good, another simple dish done right.  Very friendly service. The bad: Four of us crammed in the corner, our table the closest to the live music.  Jerk salmon - "a coconuts must?"  hmm . . . cooked well, a bit fishy, not as good as it was hyped up to be.  Oh, don't forget the interesting painting that distracted us throughout the evening. Maybe the horribly rainy weather affected my judgement.  I would give Coconuts a second try since the wings were so good.
7/16/10 my friends, gf and me Dinner for 4. 1x Chefs Sampler Platter $16 I forgot what came with it, but everything came in 4 piece. 1x Tender Braised Oxtail $14.75 Boss-It's jelly look and test like bone marrow. 1x Jerk Chicken $12.95 me- never had a jerk before. It's just a chicken rub in a special spice. 1x Adobo Steak and Crabcake $19.50 Lady Boss & my GF-Different from Philippine Adobo, but it was good. Drinks 1x Bahama Mama $8 GF- She end up giving it to me and she took my Colada. 1x Hurrican $8 Lady Boss-Originated from the Big Easy and it's used to be my favorite drink for me. 1x Spicy Mango Margarita $7 Boss- I didn't tried it, but he said it was spicy. 1x Drink of the day $8 Watermelons Colada Me- the name side it all, but it was good. Dessert 1x Coconut Creme Brulee $7.50 I love creme brulee so 4* 1x Ice Cream Basket $5 came in a waffle bowl like cups. I forgot what the waffle made from. It was not that spectacular for me. 3* Total: $120.12 + tips $15 Pro: Parking garage, street parking, live music. Con: Noise, it's get very noisy when pack.
Darn it, i had to come back! Out of all the places in Palo Alto, we found ourselves sitting our tushes down for some good ol' Caribbean food.  This time around we ordered an appetizer of the Jerk wings, which was excellent. The sauce served along side the wings was the perfect kicker to start a heavy salivation process and work up your appetite; BUT be careful, when they say spicy, it is no joke! As an entree, we got the salmon and jerk chicken combo. The salmon blew me away! Definitely A MUST! The papaya mustard that topped it was something of another world! and the side of plantains left me speechless. DEEE---LISH.  I could of ate their whole supply. I wish they gave more because these things seriously have got it going on.  The Jerk Chicken was pretty standard. Juicy? Yes, but the flavors didn't make me jump for joy like the Salmon. Escort your food with one of their cocktails or beers-on-tap to light out the fire and you're good to go!
This place is excellent! After a few minutes of "ooing" and "ahhing" at other places along... Read more 
Really good coconut creme brulee and white wine sangria. The curried goat was also just as good as all the reviewers said it was going to be. I feel like it was a little expensive for what it was. I will go back and try the jerk chicken, and update accordingly when I do.
Coconuts!!! I like! What a great happy place with delicious food at the right price. Atmosphere: Bright colorful, including the staff and patrons. Saturday night there was live music playing in the outdoor patio area. It's a loud noisy but happy place. Food: Started with the Fish Fritters ($7.25). 10 big balls of fish and batter fried with a side creamy dip. It was tasty but a little dense. Had the Ox Tail and Jerk Chicken Combo ($16.25), comes with a blended rice, plantains and veggies. Ox tail was very very tender. Meat does come right off. The stew that it comes with is flavorful and delicious. I only wished that the oxtail was one big piece rather than little cuts. It takes more work this way. The Jerk Chicken was also well seasoned, and nicely moist. It was a leg and thigh so we ended up having a lot of leftovers. My friend ordered the Adobo Marinated Steak with Coconut Shrimp ($19.50) which came with mashed potatoes, and string beans. The steak was fantastic. I loved the marinade and the tenderness of the meat. The shrimp were 3 large butterflied prawns fried with shredded coconut. Very nicely done. Service: The staff is very friendly but a little absent. It took them 5-10 minutes just to seat us even though the table was ready because they were constantly attending to different customers. Then it took a little while to get their attention to take our order and refill our water glasses. But if you're not in a rush and can just enjoy the lively mood of Coconuts, you should have a good time. We all enjoyed our food and the reasonable price. I definitely would come back.
One of the most average dining experiences I can remember. It was so average that I know I ate, I remember what I ordered, and I remember tasting a number of other dishes, but no one flavor stands out. For a restaurant dedicated to food that is all about pizazz and explosive flavor, that's kind of disappointing. There are a few things to note about my meal here. Though the restaurant was almost entirely empty (we went at 2pm on Sunday, which is the time that they open on that day of the week), the service was very, very slow. Our waiter was good enough when he was around, but I often found myself wanting water at the exact moment the waiter chose to disappear for 20-30 minutes at a time. We were also hoping for a lunch menu, but Sunday is the dinner menu, all day long. Bummer. So I went with the baby back ribs, which sounded too good to pass up, as well as the garbanzo bean and avocado appetizer. Other things that were ordered were the goat curry, the jerk chicken (an automatic order for a Caribbean restaurant), jerk pork bites (probably the best thing on the menu) and jerk spiced burgers. The ribs were dry, a bit burnt (but not in a good way), and kind of lacking in any real flavor. The jerk chicken I tried was good enough, but not as intensely flavored as I'd want. I do have to say there was a decent kick of heat on it, though. The pork bites, as I've mentioned, was the best thing I tried - the pork was totally tender and flavorful. The curried garbanzo dish I had was a bit of a letdown, as the guac tasted like store bought guac rather than freshly made. The goat curry was pretty good, and not as gamey as goat tends to be at times. Overall, though, I wasn't blown away. I mean, I ate everything and enjoyed the food reasonably enough, but it wasn't eye-poppingly flavorful, which a lot of the earlier reviews had led me to believe it would be. I don't think we'll return, either way.
Absolutely fantastic!  Food was excellent and flavorful. Great service! We'll definitely go back!
I had food euphoria after this meal it was like home cooking but better then I could do.  My friends and I had a early dinner so it was not busy around 5:30.  service was fine probably due to that. my friend had a ceaser salad with jerk shrimp.  the shrimp are worth it, they are so juicy and with a kick! I tried the jerk chicken and beef oxtail combo which came with rice that had a hint of clove and plantains.  the oxtail was so tender and delicious and the chicken was spicy spicy but addicting. the ribs were also very good, but I preferred my plate more. and with a couple pina coladas, my sunday was over, I was in euphoria and fine with ending my day here anytime. for 3 people and 3 drinks bill was around 84, not bad at all.
This is Back-a-yard's more upscale sister.  The jerk pork appetizer is great, maybe the best thing on the menu.  The jerk chicken dinner is excellent, it is usually the white meat but you can ask them to substitute dark meat.  They also make a good oxtail. Happy hour here can be fun, they often have a live band.  It also helps that there is a parking garage across the street.
Oxtail - 4/5 Grilled Veggies - 2/5
I came here after a recommendation from my sister and a quick skim over the reviews on Yelp. I used this place as a semi first date-ish kinda deal because I figured, hey why not try something out of the ordinary and go with Caribbean food? The place was easy to find (as long as you Mapquest it) and there's a parking garage less than a block away. I went on a Friday night and there was no need to reservations because the place was half full, if not less than. We got seated right away and shortly after we were given a description of the special for the day. The restaurant itself is a cute little place with a weird nice but casual feel to it (the wait staff were all wearing flower print shirts). I'm sure that means you can sport your sarong or little black dress and you'll feel at home. Being a vegetarian, I think I had about 2 edible dishes at my disposal, which is more than most places can offer. I went with jerk tofu, which was really good and a bit spicy (but the helpful waiter informed me of that before I ordered it.). The guy I went with got jerk salmon and jerk chicken. He liked the chicken, but not so much the fish. Actually, to be honest, I'm not quite sure if he liked the restaurant as much as I did, but hey, if he wants to write a review for this place, that's his business. Hah. Anyway, I liked the vibe of the place, the food was good, and the wait staff seemed to have a sixth sense for good timing. I would go again, I think.
My first time experiencing jamaican food was here yesterday. I read all the reviews about this place having really good jerk chicken & cocanut shrimp, once again yelp was correct. I ordered the Jerk Chicken Wings & Cocanut Shrimp, both amazing. The jerk sauce made the food 10x better, and the meat was so tender & juicy, literally falling off the bone. The cocanut shrimp was nice and crispy, but the jerk sauce made this place rememberable. Highly Recommend coming here.
Go here for some absolutely delicious food! Regardless of whether or not you're craving some Caribbean fare, this place is flat out delicious. I took David K's advice and ordered the Jerk Pork and Salmon (I'll try the Chicken the next time I go back). Both are great, though I prefer the salmon. He is right on when he says the salmon flakes right off and isn't at all dry. We also, ordered the corn festivals; they were indeed a party in your mouth. One order gets you 3 large pieces; be sure to get it. For dessert, we ordered a 2-item combo: warm sweet potato (a must-get) and key lime pie. Both were quite good! I will be back whenever I make the trek down to Palo Alto from the city. Coconuts was fantastic!
Went to Coconuts on a weeknight. It wasn't too crowded.. the place was clean, and service was good. I had the oxtail and jerk chicken.. Both good, but didn't knock me the fk out. I think I expected more, which is why its 3 stars instead of 4. I got this froofie drink with midori, rum, and coconut.. it was like a green pina colada. Sure, I was a little embarrassed, but I went with coworkers, and there's no shame shed with them because they ordered similar drinks. Anyhow, that bastard glass was near $10. SURE it was good, but $10 drinks? Good enough place to satisfy your Caribbean/Jamaican tastes..
SO the ambiance of this place is a little better then what it used to be with Hukilau, and the menu seems to have a little more hometown spice and flavor to it. The first time I went here, I had the jerk pork, they didn't warn me how spicy it was. I cried!!! It was so hoooot. They have very loud music here on the weekends. It is good for a dinner or lunch spot, but their bar doesn't seem to be "hopping". The next time I went here I had their burger. It is no normal burger, It has all these yummy island spices, and comes with a side of sweet potato fries. Yummmy. They have good drinks too. I ordered a Bahama Mama, and it was made really well. The service however has never been up to par. It seems they like to have one or two servers for the entire restaurant at a time, which means they have 8 to 10 tables to themselves, and therefore are never available to you.
This is the first time I have Caribbean food and I loved it! The food is very flavorful.   The mango mojito is sweet and tasty.  The appetizer Jerk Wings is served with delicious spicy sauce.  We had a dinner special Jerk Salmon, which is juicy and well marinated.  The dessert potato pudding topped with vanilla icecream is extraordinary. Top notched service as our waiter is cheerful and very attentive throughout the dinner.
- Damn good goat curry - Mango Salsa jerk pork with some mac & cheese - Warm summer night - Outdoor seating - STEEL FRIKKIN drums with live music on a Friday night - Little kids running around bopping to the steel drums Ridiculous.  They had me at the Goat. Now my favorite restaurant in Palo Alto.
So glad we came here for dinner for girls night out!! The server was very welcoming and seated us girls almost immediately! The hawaiian themed restaurant setting reminded me of the movie 50 First Dates. Lots of colorful decorations and chill setting. It was a family style dinner. So we decided to order the mahi mahi, salmon, shrimp pasta and the sampler to all share. The food came out in a timely manner and the dishes tasted quite good! Everything was quite satisfying....especially the 2 pints of sangria that we had ordered to compliment our food. OMG! The red sangria is to die for!!!! Very flavorful and fruity! But be careful because it'll creep up on you! All in all, great place to hang out and chill with your girlfriends. Good food, great service, good company = fun times!
Brightly lit and easy to spot (it's got quite a loud awning), Coconuts combines a full bar with some tasty Caribbean food. The jerk chicken is described as one of the house specialties, and it is quite fantastic - tender and juicy, and intensely flavorful without being too spicy at all.  (The jerk sauce comes in mild and hot versions - the mild is lightly spicy.  The hot I didn't try.) The oxtail, while quite tasty, appears swimming in oil and is about 20% meat, 20% fat, and 60% bone.  It's not recommended if you're (a) really hungry, (b) on a health kick, or (c) don't enjoy having to work for your meal.  But it is incredibly tender and rich. Most dishes come with 2 or 3 of: beans & rice (quite good), fried plantains, sauteed veggies, or whipped potatoes.  They don't do substitutions, though, so don't expect to be able to pick & choose the sides you want. The salmon is farm-raised Atlantic, which is bad (see http://www.montereybayaq... ).  I strongly encourage you to not order it, and help convince them to change it to something else. I was also slightly distracted by, but mostly amused by their lights, which seemed to constantly be slightly dimming and brightening.  Quirky.
